


"I GUESS my daughter's in here/' the old man 
said, leading the way into the little salon de 
lecture. He was not of the most advanced age, 
but that is the way George Flack considered him, 
and indeed he looked older than he was. George 
Flack had found him sitting in the court of the 
hotel (he sat a great deal in the court of the 
hotel), and had gone up to him with characteristic 
directness and asked him for Miss Francina. Poor 
Mr. Dosson had with the greatest docility disposed 
himself to wait upon the young man : he had as 
a matter of course got up and made his way across 
the court, to announce to the personage in question 
that she had a visitor. He looked submissive 
almost servile, as he preceded the visitor, thrust- 
ing his head forward in his quest ; but it was not 

e B 



 



in Mr. Flack's line to notice that sort of thing. 
He accepted the old gentleman's good offices as 
he would have accepted those of a waiter, mur- 
muring no protest for the sake of making it 
appear that he had come to see him as well. An 
observer of these two persons would have assured 
himself that the degree to which Mr. Dosson 
thought it natural that any one should want to 
see his daughter was only equalled by the degree 
to which the young man thought it natural her 
father should find her for him. There was a 
superfluous drapery in the doorway of the salon 
de lecturey which Mr. Dosson pushed aside while 
George Flack stepped in after him. 

The reading-room of the Hotel de TUnivers 
et de Cheltenham was not of great proportions, 
and had seemed to Mr. Dosson from the first 
to consist principally of a bare, highly-polished 
floor, on which it was easy for a relaxed elderly 
American to slip. It was composed further, to 
his perception, of a table with a green velvet cloth, 
of a fireplace with a great deal of fringe and no 
fire, of a window with a gi'eat deal of curtain and 
no light, and of the Figaro, which he couldn't read, 
and the New York Herald, which he had already 
read. A single person was just now in possession 
of these conveniences — a young lady who sat with 
her back to the window, looking straight before 
her into the conventional room. She was dressed 
as for the street; her empty hands rested upon 



 



the arms of her chair (she had withdrawn her 
long gloves, which were lying in her lap), and she 
seemed to be doing nothing as hard as she could. 
Her face was so much in shadow as to be barely 
distinguishable ; nevertheless as soon as he saw 
her the young man exclaimed — "Why, it ain't 
Miss Francie — it's Miss Delia 1 " 

"Well, I guess we can fix that," said Mr. 
Dosson, wandering further into the room and 
drawing his feet over the floor without lifting 
them. Whatever he did he ever seemed to 
wander: he had a transitory air, an aspect of 
weary yet patient non-arrival, even when he sat 
(as he was capable of sitting for hours) in the 
court of the inn. As he glanced down at the 
two newspapers in their desert of green velvet he 
raised a hopeless, uninterested glass to his eye. 
"Delia, my dear, where is your sister?" 

Delia made no movement . whatever, nor did 
any expression, so far as could be perceived, pass 
over her large young face. She only ejaculated, 
" Why, Mr. Flack, where did you drop from ? " 

" Well, this is a good place to meet," her father 
remarked, as if mildly, and as a mere passing 
suggestion, to deprecate explanations. 

" Any place is good where one meets old friends," 
said George Flack, looking also at the newspapers. 
He examined the date of the American sheet 
and then put it down. " Well, how do you like 
Paris ? " he went on to the young lady. 

B 2 



 



**We quite enjoy it; but of course we're 
familiar now/* 

*' Well, I was in hopes I could show you some- 
thing," Mr. Flack said. 

" I guess they've seen most everything," Mr. 
Dosson observed. 

" Well, we've seen more than you 1 " exclaimed 
his daughter. 

"Well, I've seen a good deal — just sitting 
there." 

A person with a delicate ear might have 
suspected Mr. Dosson of saying '* setting ; " but he 
would pronounce the same word in a different 
manner at different times. 

" Well, in Paris you can see everything," said 
the young man. "I'm quite enthusiastic about 
Paris." 

"Haven't you been here before?" Miss Delia 
asked. 

" Oh, yes, but it's ever fresh. And how is Miss 
Francie ? " 

"She's all right. She has gone up stairs to 
get something; we are going out again." 

" It's very attractive for the young," said Mr. 
Dosson to the visitor. 

"Well, then, Pm one of the young. Do you 
mind if I go with you ? " Mr. Flack continued, 
to the girl. 

"It'll seem like old times, on the deck," she 
replied. *' We're going to the Bon March^." 



 



" Why don't you go to the Louvre ? It's much 
better." 

** We have just come from there : we have had 
quite a morning." 

** Well, it's a good place," the visitor continued. 

" It's good for some things but it doesn't come 
up to my idea for others." 

" Oh, they've seen everything," said Mr. Dosson. 
Then he added, " I guess I'll go and call Francie." 

** Well, tell her to hurry," Miss Delia returned, 
swinging a glove in each hand. 

"She knows my pace," Mr. Flack remarked. 

" I should think she would, the way you raced ! " 
the girl ejaculated, with memories of the XJmbria. 
"I hope you don't expect to rush round Paris 
that way." 

" I always rush. I live in a rush. That's the 
way to get through." 

" Well, I am through, I guess," said Mr. Dosson, 
philosophically. 

"Well, I ain't!" his daughter declared, with 
decision. 

"Well, you must come round often," the old 
gentleman continued, as a leave-taking. 

"Oh, I'll come round! I'll have to rush, but 
I'U do it." 

" I'll send down Francie." And Francie's father 
crept away. 

"And please to give her some more money!" 
her sister called after him. 



 



"Does she keep the money?" George Flack 
inquired. 

'* Keep it?'* Mr. Dosson stopped as he pushed 
aside the portUre, "Oh, you innocent young 
man ! " 

" I guess it's the first time you were ever called 
innocent," Delia remarked, left alone with the 
visitor. 

"Well, I was — before I came to Paris." 

" Well, I can't see that it has hurt us. We are 
not extravagant." 

"Wouldn't you have a right to be?" 

" I don't think any one has a right to be." 

The young man, who had seated himself, looked 
at her a moment. " That's the way you used to 
talk." 

"Well, I haven't changed." 

"And Miss Francie — ^has she?" 

" Well, you'll see," said Delia Dosson, beginning 
to draw on her gloves. 

Her companion watched her, leaning forward 
with his elbows on the arms of his chair and his 
hands interlocked. At last he said, interrogatively : 
" Bon March6 ? " 

"No, I got them in a little place I know." 

" Well, they're Paris, anyway." 

"Of course they're Paris. But you can get 
gloves anywhere." 

** You must show me the little place, anyhow," 
Mr. Flack continued, sociably. And he observed 



 



further, with the same friendliness — "The old 
gentleman seems all there/' 

" Oh, he's the dearest of the dear." 

"He's a real gentleman — of the old stamp," 
said George Flack. 

''Well, what should you think our father 
would be?" 

''I should think he would be delighted!" 

''Well, he is, when we carry out our plans." 

" And what are they — ^your plans ? " asked the 
young man. 

"Oh, I never tell them." 

"How then does he know whether you carry 
them out?" 

"Well, I guess he'd know it if we didn't," said 
the girl. 

" I remember how secretive you were last year. 
You kept everything to yourself." 

"Well, I know what I want," the young lady 
pursued. 

He watched her button one of her gloves, 
deftly, with a hairpin which she disengaged from 
some mysterious function under her bonnet. There 
was a moment's silence and then they looked up ' 
at each other. " I have an idea you don't want 
me," said George Flack. 

"Oh, yes, I do — as a friend." 

" Of all the mean ways of trying to get rid of 
a man, that's the meanest ! " he exclaimed. 

" Where's the meanness, when I suppose you 



 



are not so peculiar as to wish to be anything 
more ! " 

"More to your sister, do you mean — or to 
yourself ? " 

" My sister is myself — I haven't got any other," 
said Delia Dosson. 

"Any other sister?" 

'Don't be idiotic. Are you still in the same 
business ? " the girl went on. 

" Well, I forget which one I was in." 

" Why, something to do with that newspaper — 
don't you remember?" 

" Yes, but it isn't that paper any more — ^it's a 
different one." 

" Do you go round for news — in the same way ? " 

" Well, I try to get the people what "they want. 
It's hard work," said the young man. 

" Well, I suppose if you didn't some one else 
would. They will have it, won't they? " 

"Yes, they will have it." But the wants 
of the people did not appear at the present 
moment to interest Mr. Flack as much as his 
own. He looked at his watch and remarked 
that the old gentleman didn't seem to have much 
authority. 

" Much authority ? " the girl repeated. 

" With Miss Francie. She is taking her time, 
or rather, I mean, she is taking mine." 

" Well, if you expect to do anything with her 
you must give her plenty of that." 



THE HEVERBERATOR. 



" All right : I'll give Ler all I have/' And Miss 
Dosson's interlocutor leaned back in his chair 
with folded arms, as if to let his companion 
know that she would have to count with his 
patience. But she sat there in her expressionless 
placidity, giving no sign of alarm or defeat. He 
was the first indeed to show a symptom of rest- 
lessness : at the end of a few moments he asked 
the young lady if she didn't suppose her father 
had told her sister who it was. 

"Do you think that's all that's required?" 
Miss Dosson demanded. But she added, more 
graciously — "Probably that's the reason. She's 
so shy." 

"Oh, yes — she used to look it." 

" No, that's her peculiarity, that she never looks 
it, and yet she is intensely so." 

" Well, you make it up for her then, Miss Delia," 
the young man ventured to declare. 

"No, for her, I'm not shy — not in the 
least." 

" If it wasn't for you I think I could do some- 
thing," the young man went on. 

" WeU, you've got to kiU me first ! " 

"I'll come down on you, somehow, in the 
Reverberator," said George Flack. 

" Oh, that's not what the people want." 

"No, unfortunately they don't care anything 
about my affairs." 

" Well, we do : we are kinder, Francie and I," 



10  

said the girl. ** But we desire to keep them quite 
distinct from ours." 

*' Oh, yours — yours : if I could only discover what 
they are ! " the young journalist exclaimed. And 
during the rest of the time that they sat there 
waiting he tried to find out. If an auditor had 
happened to be present for the quarter of an hour 
that elapsed and had had any attention to give 
to these vulgar young persons he would have 
wondered perhaps at there being so much mystery 
on one side and so much curiosity on the other — 
wondered at least at the elaboration of inscrutable 
projects on the part of a girl who looked to the 
casual eye as if she were stolidly passive. Fidelia 
Dosson, whose name had been shortened, was 
twenty-five years old and had a large white face, 
with the eyes very far apart. Her forehead was 
high, but her mouth was small : her hair was light 
and colourless, and a certain inelegant thickness 
of figure made her appear shorter than she was. 
Elegance indeed had not been conferred upon 
her by Nature, and the Bon Marche and other 
establishments had to make up for that. To a 
feminine eye they would scarcely have appeared 
to have acquitted themselves of their oflSce ; but 
even a woman would not have guessed how little 
Fidelia cared. She always looked the same; all 
the contrivances of Paris could not make her 
look diflferent, and she held them, for herself, 
in no manner of esteem. It was a plain, blank 



 11 

face, not only without movement, but with a 
suggestion of obstinacy in its repose; and yet, 
with its limitations, it was neither stupid nor 
displeasing. It had an air of intelligent calm — 
a considering, pondering look that was superior, 
somehow, to diffidence or anxiety; moreover, the 
girl had a clear skin and a gentle, dim smile. 
If she had been a young man (and she had, a 
little, the head of one) it would probably have 
been thought of her that she nursed dreams of 
eminence in some scientific or even political 
line. 

An observer would have gathered, fiirther, that 
Mr. Flack's acquaintance with Mr. Dosson and his 
daughters had had its origin in his crossing the 
Atlantic eastward in their company more than a 
year before and in some slight association imme- 
diately after disembarking; but that each party 
had come and gone a good deal since then — come 
and gone however without meeting again. It was 
to be inferred that in this interval Miss Dosson 
had led her father and sister back to their native 
land and had then a second time directed their 
course to Europe. This was a new departure, 
said Mr. Flack, or rather a new arrival : he under- 
stood that it was not, as he called it, the same 
old visit. She did not repudiate the accusation, 
launched by her companion as if it might have 
been embarrassing, of having spent her time at 
home in Boston, and even in a suburban portion 



12  



of it : she confessed that, as Bostonians, they had 
been capable of that. But now they had come 
abroad for longer — ever so much : what they had 
gone home for was to make arrangements for a 
European sojourn of which the limits were not to 
be told. So far as this prospect entered into her 
plans she freely acknowledged it. It appeared 
to meet with George Flack's approval — he also 
had a big job on that side and it might take years, 
so that it would be pleasant to have his friends 
right there. He knew his way about in Paris — 
or any place like that — much more than in Boston ; 
if they had been poked away in one of those 
clever suburbs they would have been lost to him. 
"Oh, well, youll see as much as you want to 
of us — the way you'll have to take us," Delia 
Dosson said : which led the young man to inquire 
what way that was and to remark that he only 
knew one way to take anything — just as it came. 
" Oh, well, you'll see," the girl rejoined ; and she 
would give for the present no further explanation 
of her somewhat chilling speech. In spite of it, 
however, she professed an interest in Mr. Flack's 
"job" — an interest which rested apparently upon 
an interest in the young man himself. The 
slightly surprised observer whom we have supposed 
to be present would have perceived that this latter 
sentiment was founded on a conception of Mr. 
Flack's intrinsic brilliancy. Would his own im- 
pression have justified that? — would he have 



 

found such a conception contagious? I forbear 
to say positively no, for that would charge me 
with the large responsibility of showing what 
right our accidental observer might have had to 
his particular standard. I prefer therefore to note 
simply that George Flack was quite clever enough 
to seem a person of importance to Delia Dosson. 
He was connected (as she supposed) with literature, 
and was not Hterature one of the many engaging 
attributes of her cherished little sister? If Mn 
Flack was a writer Francie was a reader : had not 
a trail of forgotten Tauchnitzes marked the former 
line of travel of the party of three ? The elder 
sister grabbed them up on leaving hotels and 
railway-carriages, but usually found that she had 
brought odd volumes. She considered, however, 
that as a family they had a sort of superior affinity 
with the young journalist, and would have been 
surprised if she had been told that his acquaintance 
was not a high advantage. 

Mr. Flack's appearance was not so much a 
property of his own as a prejudice on the part 
of those who looked at him : whoever they might 
be what they saw mainly in him was that they 
had seen him before. And, oddly enough, this 
recognition carried with it in general no ability 
to remember — ^that is to recall — ^him : you could 
not have evoked him in advance, and it was only 
when you saw him that you knew you had seen 
him. To carry him in your mind you must have 



14  

liked him very much, for no other sentiment, 
not even aversion, would have taught you what 
distinguished him in his group: aversion in 
especial would have made you conscious only of 
what confounded him. He was not a particular 
person, but a sample or memento — ^reminding one 
of certain "goods" for which there is a steady 
popular demand. You would scarcely have 
expected him to have a name other than that of 
his class : a number, like that of the day's news- 
paper, would have been the most that you would 
count on, and you would have expected vaguely 
to find the number high — somewhere up in the 
millions. As every copy of the newspaper wears 
the same label, so that of Miss Dosson's visitor 
would have been " Young commercial American." 
Let me add that among the accidents cf his ap- 
pearance was that of its sometimes striking other 
young commercial Americans as fine. He was 
twenty-seven years of age and had a small square 
head, a light gray overcoat, and in his right fore- 
finger a curious natural crook which might have 
served, under pressure, to identify him. But for 
the convenience of society he ought always to have 
worn something conspicuous — a green hat or a 
scarlet necktie. His job was to obtain material 
in Europe for an American " society-paper." 

If it be objected to all this that when Francie 
Dosson at last came in she addressed him as if 
she easily placed him, the answer is that she had 



 15 

been notified by her father — ^more punctually than 
was indicated by the manner of her response. 
"Well, the way you do turn up/' she said, 
smiling and holding out her left hand to him: 
in the other hand, or the hollow of her right 
arm, she had a largeish parcel. Though she had 
made him wait she was evidently very glad to 
see him there ; and she as evidently required and 
enjoyed a great deal of that sort of indulgence. 
Her sister's attitude would have told you so even 
if her own appearance had not. There was that 
in her manner to the young man — a perceptible 
but indefinable shade — which seemed to legitimate 
the oddity of his having asked in particular for 
her, as if he wished to see her to the exclusion of 
her father and sister : a kind of special pleasure 
which had the air of pointing to a special relation. 
And yet a spectator, looking from Mr. George Flack 
to Miss Francie Dosson, would have been much 
at a loss to guess what special relation could exist 
between them. The girl was exceedingly, extra- 
ordinarily pretty, and without discoverable resem- 
blance to her sister; and there was a brightness 
in her — a kind of still radiance — which was quite 
distinct from what is called animation. Rather 
tall than short, slim, delicate and evidently as 
light of hand and of foot as it was possible to be, 
she yet gave no impression of quick movement, of 
abundant chatter, of excitable nerves and irre- 
pressible life — no hint of being of the most usual 



16  



(which is perhaps also the most graceful) American 
type. She was brilliantly but quietly pretty, 
and your suspicion that she was a little stiff 
was corrected only by your perception that she 
was extremely soft There was nothing in her 
to confirm the implication that she had rushed 
about the deck of a Cunarder with a newspaper- 
man. She was as straight as a wand and as fine as 
a gem ; her neck was long and her gray eyes had 
colour ; and from the ripple of her dkrk brown hair 
to the curve of her unaffirmative chin every line 
in her face was happy and pure. She had an 
unformed voice and very little knowledge. 

Delia got up, and they came out of the little 
reading-room — this young lady remarking to her 
sister that she hoped she had got all the things. 
''Well, I had a fiendish hunt for them, we 
have got so many," Francie replied, with a curious 
soft drawl. "There were a few dozens of the 
pocket-handkerchiefs I couldn't find; but I 
guess I've got most of them, and most of the 
gloves." 

" Well, what are you carting them about for ? " 
George Flack inquired, taking the parcel from her. 
"You had better let me handle them. Do you 
buy pocket-handkerchiefs by the hundred ? " 

" Well, it only makes fifty apiece," said Francie, 
smiling. " They ain*t nice — we're going to change 
them." 

"Oh, I won't be mixed up with that — ^you 



^ t 



 17 

can't work that game on these Frenchmen ! " the 
young man exclaimed. 

"Oh, with Francie they will take anything 
back," Delia Dosson declared. "They just love 
her, all over." 

"Well, they're like me then," said Mr. Flack, 
with friendly hilarity. "I'll take her back, if 
she'll come." 

"Well, I don't think I am ready quite yet,'* 
the girl replied. "But I hope very much we 
shall cross with you again." 

" Talk about crossing — ^it's on these boulevards 
we want a life-preserver ! " Delia remarked. They 
had passed out of the hotel and the wide vista 
of the Rue de la Paix stretched up and down. 
There were many vehicles. 

" Won't this thing do ? I'll tie it to either of 
you," George Flack said, holding out his bundle. 
" I suppose they won't kill you if they love you," 
he went on, to the younger girl. 

"Well, you've got to know me first," she 
answered, laughing and looking for a chance, 
while they waited to pass over. 

"I didn't know you when I was struck." He 
applied his disengaged hand to her elbow and 
propelled her across the street. She took no notice 
of his observation, and Delia asked her, on the 
other side, whether their father had given her 
that money. She replied that he had given her 
loads— she felt as if he had made his will ; which 
•' '^ c 



18  



led George Flack to say that he wished the old 
gentleman was his father. 

"Why, you don't mean to say you want to be 
our brother!*' Francie exclaimed, as they went 
down the Eue de la Paix. 

" I should like to be Miss Delia's, if you can 
make that out," said the young man. 

"Well, then, suppose you prove it by calling 
me a cab," Miss Delia returned. " I presume you 
and Francie don't think this is the deck." 

" Don't she feel rich ? " George Flack demanded 
of Francie. "But we do require a cart for our 
goods;" and he hailed a little yellow carriage, 
which presently drew up beside the pavement. 
The three got into it and, still -emitting innocent 
pleasantries, proceeded on their way, while at the 
Hotel de I'Univers et de Cheltenham Mr. Dosson 
wandered down into the court again and took his 
place in his customary chair. 






I 



II. 



The court was roofed with glass ; the April air 
was mild ; the cry of women selling violets came 
in from the street and, mingling with the rich 
hum of Paris, seemed to bring with it faintly the 
odour of the flowers. There were other odours 
in the place, warm, succulent and Parisian, which 
ranged from fried fish to burnt sugar ; and there 
were many things besides: little tables for the 
post-prandial coffee; piles of luggage inscribed 
(after the initials, or frequently the name, R. P. 
Scudamore or D. Jackson Hatch), Philadelphia, 
Pa., or St. Louis, Mo. ; rattles of unregarded bells. 
Sittings of tray-beariug waiters, conversations 
with the second-floor windows of admonitory 
landladies, arrivals of young women with coffin- 
like bandboxes covered with black oilcloth and 
depending from a strap, sallyings forth of persons 
staying and arrivals, just afterwards, of other 
persons to see them ; together with vague prostra- 
tions on benches of tired heads of American 

G 2 



20  

families. It was to this last element that Mr. 
Dosson himself in some degree contributed, but 
it must be added that he had not the extremely 
bereft and exhausted appearance of certain of his 
fellows. There was an air of meditative patience, 
of habitual accommodation in him ; but you would 
have guessed that he was enjoying a holiday 
rather than panting for a truce, and he was not 
so enfeebled but that he was able to get up from 
time to time and stroll through the porte cocMre 
to have a look at the street. 

He gazed up and down for five minutes, with 
his hands in his pockets, and then came back; 
that appeared to content him ; he asked for very 
little — had no restlessness that these small 
excursions would not assuage. He looked at the 
heaped-up luggage, at the tinkling bells, at the 
young woman from the ling^re, at the repudiated 
visitors, at everything but the other American 
parents. Something in his breast told him that 
he knew all about these. It is not upon each other 
that the animals in the same cage, in a zoological 
collection, most turn their eyes. There was a silent 
sociability in him and a superficial fineness of 
grain that helped to account for his daughter 
Francie*s various delicacies. He was fair and spare 
and had no figure; you would have seen in a 
moment that the question of how he should hold 
himself had never in his life occurred to him. He 
never held himself at all; providence held him 



 21 

rather (and very loosely), by an invisible string, 
at the end of which he seemed gently to dangle 
and waver. His face was so smooth that his thin 
light whiskers, which grew only far back, scarcely 
seemed native to his cheeks: they might have 
been attached there for some harmless purpose 
of comedy or disguise. He looked for the most 
part as if he were thinking over, without exactly 
understanding it, something rather droll which 
had just occurred; if his eyes wandered his atten- 
tion rested, and hurried, quite as little. His feet 
were remarkably small, and his clothes, in which 
light colours predominated, were visibly the work 
of a French tailor : he was an American who still 
held the tradition that it is in Paris a man dresses 
himself best. His hat would have looked odd 
in Bond Street or the Fifth Avenue, and his 
necktie was loose and flowing. 

Mr. Dosson, it may further be mentioned, was 
a man of the simplest composition, a character 
as cipherable as a sum of two figures. He had 
a native financial faculty of the finest order, a gift 
as direct as a beautiful tenor voice, which had 
enabled him, without the aid of particular strength 
of will or keenness of ambition, to build up a 
large fortune while he was still of middle age. 
He had a genius for happy speculation, the quick, 
unerring instinct of a " good thing ; " and as he sat 
there idle, amused, contented, on the edge of the 
Parisian street, he might very well have passed 



22 THE REVERBERATOR 



for some rare performer who had sung his song 
or played his trick and had nothing to do till the 
next call. And he had grown rich not because 
he was ravenous or hard, but simply because he 
had an ear, or a nose. He could make out the 
tune in the discord of the market-place ; he could 
smell success far up the wind. The second factor 
in his little addition was that he was an unassum- 
ing father. He had no tastes, no acquirements 
nor curiosities, and his daughters represented 
society for him. He thought much more and much 
oftener of these young ladies than of his bank- 
shares and railway-stock; they refreshed much 
more his sense of ownership, of accumulation. 
He never compared them with other girls; he 
only compared his present self to what he would 
have been without them. His view of them was 
perfectly simple. Delia had a more unfathomable 
profundity and Francie a wider acquaintance with 
literature and art. Mr. Dosson had not perhaps 
a full perception of his younger daughter's beauty : 
he would scarcely have pretended to judge of 
that, more than he would of a valuable picture 
or vase, but he believed she was cultivated up to 
the eyes. He had a recollection of tremendous 
school-bills and, in later days, during their travels, 
of the way she was always leaving books behind 
her. Moreover was not her French so good that 
he could not understand it ? 

The two girls, at any rate, were the wind in 



THE KEVERBERATOR. 23 

-J — — - — — » ■- 

his sail and the only directing, detennining force 
he knew ; they converted accident into purpose ; 
without them, as he felt, he would have been the 
tail without the kite. The wind rose and feU, 
of course ; there were lulls and there were gales ; 
there were intervals during which he simply floated 
in quiet waters — cast anchor and waited. This 
appeared to be one of them now; but he could 
be patient, knowing that he should soon again 
inhale the, brine and feel the dip of his prow. 
When his daughters were out the determining 
process gathered force, and their being out with a 
brilliant young man only deepened the pleasant 
calm. That belonged to their superior life, and 
Mr. Dosson never doubted that George M. Flack 
was brilliant. He represented the newspaper, 
and the newspaper for this man of genial 
assumptions represented Mind — it was the great 
shining presence of our time. To know that 
Delia and Francie were out with an editor or a 
correspondent was really to see them dancing 
in the central glow. This is doubtless why Mr. 
Dosson had slightly more than usual his air of 
recovering slowly from a pleasant surprise. The 
vision to which I allude hung before him, at 
a convenient distance, and melted into other 
bright confused aspects: reminiscences of Mr. 
Flack in other relations — on the ship, on the 
deck, at the hotel at Liverpool, and in the cars. 
Whitney Dosson was a loyal father, but he would 



24 THE KEVEKBERATOK. 

have thought himself simple had he not had 
two or three strong convictions: one of which 
was that the children should never go out with a 
gentleman they had not seen before. The sense 
of their having, and his having, seen Mr. Flack 
before was comfortable to him now : it made it 
mere placidity for him personally to forego the 
young man's society in favour of Delia and Francie. 
He had not hitherto been perfectly satisfied that 
the streets and shops, the general immensity of 
Paris, were just the right place for young ladies 
alone. But the company of a pleasant gentleman 
made them right — a gentleman who was pleasant 
through being up to everything, as one connected 
with that paper (he remembered its name now, 
it was celebrated) would have to be. To Mr. 
Dosson, in the absence of such happy accidents, 
his girls somehow seemed lonely ; which was not the 
way he struck himself. They were his company 
but he was scarcely theirs; it was as if he had 
them more than they had him. 

They were out a long time, but he felt no anxiety, 
as he reflected that Mr. Flack's very profession 
was a prevision of everything that could possibly 
happen. The bright French afternoon waned 
without bringing them back, but Mr. Dosson 
still revolved about the court, till he might have 
been taken for a valet de place hoping to pick up 
custom. The landlady smiled at him sometimes, as 
she passed and re-passed, and even ventured to 



i 



THE KEVERBERATOR. 26 

remark disinterestedly that it was a pity to waste 
such a lovely day indoors — ^not to take a turn 
and see what was going on in Paris. But Mr. 
Dosson had no sense of waste : that came to him 
much more when he was confronted with historical 
monuments, or beauties of nature or art, which he 
didn't understand nor care for : then he felt a little 
ashamed and uncomfortable — ^but never when he 
lounged in that simplifying way in the court. It 
wanted but a quarter of an hour to dinner (that 
he could understand) when Delia and Francie 
at last met his view, still accompanied by Mr. 
Flack and sauntering in, at a little distance from 
each other, with a jaded air which was not in the 
least a tribute to his possible solicitude. They 
dropped into chairs and joked with each other, 
with a mixture of sociability and languor, on the 
subject of what they had seen and done — a 
question into which he felt as yet a delicacy as to 
inquiring. But they had evidently done a good 
deal and had a good time : an impression suffi- 
cient to rescue Mr. Dosson personally from the 
consciousness of failure. 

" Won't you just step in and take dinner with 
us ? " he asked of the young man, with a friendli- 
ness begotten of the circumstances. 

" Well, that's a handsome offer," George Flack 
replied, while Delia remarked that they had each 
eaten about thirty cakes. 

"Well, I wondered what you were doing so 



26 THE KEVERBERATOR. 



long. But never mind your cakes. It's twenty 
minutes past six, and the table cChSte is on time.*' 

"You don't mean to say you dine at the table 
cVhdtel" Mr. Flack ejaculated. 

"Why, don't you like that?" Francie drawled 
sweetly. 

"Well, it isn't what you most build on when 
you come to Paris. Too many flower-pots and 
chickens' legs." 

" Well, would you like one of these restaurants ? " 
asked Mr. Dosson. " I don't care, if you show us 
a good one." 

"Oh, I'll show you a good one^-don't you 
worry." 

" Well, you've got to order the dinner then," 
said Francie. 

"Well, you'll see how I could do it!" And 
the young man looked at her very hard, with an 
intention of softness. 

"He has got an interest in some place," Delia 
declared. "He has taken us to ever so many 
stores, and he gets his commission." 

"Well, I'd pay you to take them round," said 
Mr. Dosson; and with much agreeable trifling 
of this kind, it was agreed that they should sally 
forth for the evening meal under Mr. Flack's 
guidance. 

If he had easily convinced them on this occa- 
sion that that was a more original proceeding 
than worrying those old bones, as he called it, 



 27 

iat the hotel, he convinced them of other things 
besides in the course of the following month and 
by the aid of repeated visits. What he mainly 
made clear to them was that it was really most 
kind of a young man who had so many great 
public questions on his mind to find sympathy 
for problems which could fill the telegraph and 
the press so little as theirs. He came every day 
to set them in the right path, pointing out its 
charms to them in a way that made them feel 
how much they had been in the wrong. He 
made them feel indeed that they didn't know 
anything about anything, even about such a 
matter as ordering shoes — an art in which they 
vaguely supposed themselves rather strong. He 
had in fact great knowledge, and it was wonder- 
fully various, and he knew as many people as 
they knew few. He had appointments — very often 
with celebrities — for every hour of the day, and 
memoranda, sometimes in shorthand, on tablets 
with elastic straps, with which he dazzled the 
simple folk at the Hotel de TUnivers et de Chel- 
tenham, whose social life, of narrow range, consisted 
mainly in reading the lists of Americans who 
"registered" at the bankers' and at Galignani's. 
Delia Dossou, in particular, had a way of poring 
solemnly over these records which exasperated 
Mr. Flack, who skimmed them and found what he 
wanted in the flash of an eye : she kept the others 
waiting while she satisfied herself that Mr. and 



28  



Mrs. D. S. Bposenheim and Miss Cora Rosenheim 
and Master Samuel Rosenheim had "left for 
Brussels." 

Mr. Flack was wonderful on all occasions in 
finding what he wanted (which, as we know, was 
what he believed the public wanted), and Delia 
was the only one of the party with whom he was 
sometimes a little sharp. He had embraced from 
the first the idea that she was his enemy, and 
he alluded to it with almost tiresome frequency, 
though always in a humorous, fearless strain. 
Even more than by her fashion of hanging over 
the registers she provoked him by appearing to 
think that their little party was not sufficient 
to itself; by wishing, as he expressed it, to work 
in new stuff. He might have been easy, however, 
for he had sufficient chance to observe how it 
was always the fate of the Dossons to miss their 
friends. They were continually looking out for 
meetings and combinations that never came off, 
hearing that people had been in Paris only after 
they had gone away, or feeling convinced that 
they were there but not to be found through 
their not having registered, or wondering whether 
they should overtake them if they should go to 
Dresden, and then making up their minds to 
start for Dresden, only to learn, at the eleventh 
hour, through some accident, that the elusive 
party had gone to Biarritz. "We know plenty 
of people if we could only come across them," 



THE KEVERBERATOR. 29 



Delia had said more than once : she scanned the 
continent with a wondering, baffled gaze and 
talked of the unsatisfactory way in which friends 
at home would "write out" that other friends 
were " somewhere in Europe." She expressed the 
wish that such correspondents as that might be 
in a place that was not at all vague. Two or three 
times people had called at the hotel when they 
were out and had left cards for them, without any 
address, superscribed with a mocking dash of the 
pencil, " Off to-morrow 1 " The girl sat looking at 
these cards, handling them and turning them over 
for a quarter of an hour at a time ; she produced 
them days afterwards, brooding upon them afresh 
as if they were a mystic clue. George Flack gener- 
ally knew where they were, the people who were 
" somewhere in Europe." Such knowledge came 
to him by a kind of intuition, by the voices of the 
air, by indefinable and unteachable processes. But 
he held his peace on purpose ; he didn't want any 
outsiders ; he thought their little party just right. 
Mr. Dosson's place in the scheme of providence 
was to go with Delia while he himself went with 
Francie, and nothing would have induced George 
Flack to disfigure that equation. 

The young man was professionally so occupied 
with other people's affairs that it should doubt- 
less be mentioned to his praise that he still 
managed to have affairs — or at least an affair — 
of his own. That affair was Francie Dosson, and 



30 THE KEVERBERATOR. 

he was pleased to perceive how litttle she cared 
what had become of Mr. and Mrs. Rosenheim 
and Master Samuel and Miss Cora. He counted 
all the things she didn't care about — her soft 
inadvertent eyes helped him to do that ; and they 
footed up so, as he would have said, that they gave 
him a pleasant sense of a free field. If she had 
so few interests there was the greater possibility 
that a young man of bold conceptions and cheerful 
manners might become one. She had usually 
the air of waiting for something, with a sort of 
amused resignation, while tender, shy, indefinite 
little fancies hummed in her brain; so that she 
would perhaps recognise in him the reward of 
patience. George Flack was aware that he exposed 
his friends to considerable fatigue; he brought 
them back pale and taciturn from suburban ex- 
cursions and from wanderings often rather aimless 
and casual among the boulevards and avenues of 
the town. He regarded them at such moments 
with complacency, however, for these were hours 
of diminished resistance : he had an idea that he 
should be able eventually to circumvent Delia 
if he could only watch for some time when she 
was tired. He liked to make them all feel help- 
less and dependent, and this was not difficult 
with people who were so modest and artless, so 
unconscious of the boundless power of wealth. 
Sentiment, in our young man, was not a scruple 
nor a source of weakness; but he thought it 



THE KEVERBERATOR. 31 

really touching, the little these good people knew 
of what they could do with their money. They 
had in their hands a weapon of infinite range 
and yet they were incapable of firing a shot for 
themselves. They had a kind of social humility ; 
it appeared never to have occurred to them that, 
added to their amiability, their money gave them 
a value. This used to strike George Flack on cer- 
tain occasions when he came back to find them 
in the places where he had dropped them while 
he rushed off to give a turn to one of his screws. 
They never played him false, never wearied of 
waiting ; always sat patient and submissive, usually 
at a caf6 to which he had introduced them or 
in a row of chairs on the boulevard, or in the 
Tuileries or the Champs Elys(5es. 

He introduced them to many cafes, in different 
parts of Paris, being careful to choose those which 
(in his view) young ladies might frequent with 
propriety, and there were two or three in the 
neighbourhood of their hotel where they became 
frequent and familiar figures. As the late spring 
days grew warmer and brighter they usually sat 
outside on the "terrace** — the little expanse of 
small tables at the door of the establishment, 
where Mr. Flack, on the return, could descry 
them from afar at their post in exactly the same 
position to which he had committed them. They 
complained of no satiety in watching the many- 
coloured movement of the Parisian streets; 



32 THE KEVEKBERATOK. 



and if some of the features in the panorama 
were base they were only so in a version which 
the imagination of our friends was incapable of 
supplying. George Flack considered that he was 
rendering a positive service to Mr. Dosson : 
wouldn't the old gentleman have sat all day in the 
court anyway? and wasn't the boulevard better 
than the court? It was his theory, too, that 
he flattered and caressed Miss Francie's father, 
for there was no one to whom he had furnished 
more copious details about the aflfairs, the projects 
and prospects, of the Reverberator. He had left 
no doubt in the old gentleman's mind as to the 
race he himself intended to run, and Mr. Dosson 
used to say to him every day, the first thing, 
" Well, where have you got to now ? " as if he 
took a real interest. George Flack narrated his 
interviews, to which Delia and Francie gave 
attention only in case they knew something of 
the persons on whom the young emissary of the 
Reverberator had conferred this distinction; 
whereas Mr. Dosson listened, with his tolerant 
interposition of " Is that so ? " and " Well, that's 
good," just as submissively when he heard of 
the celebrity in question for the first time. 

In conversation with his daughters Mr. Flack 
was frequently the theme, though introduced much 
more by the young ladies than by himself, and 
especially by Delia, who announced at an early 
period that she knew what he wanted and that it 



THE KEVERBERATOR. '33 

wasn't in the least what she wanted. She amplified 
this statement very soon — at least as regards her 
interpretation of Mr. Flack's designs: a certain 
mystery still hung about her own, which, as she 
intimated, had much more to recommend them. 
Delia's vision of the danger as well as the advantage 
of being a pretty girl was closely connected (and 
this was natural) with the idea of an " engage- 
ment " : this idea was in a manner complete in 
itself — her imagination failed in the oddest way 
to carry it into the next stage. She wanted 
her sister to be engaged but she wanted her not 
at all to be married, and she had not clearly 
made up her mind as to how Francie was to 
enjoy both the promotion and the arrest. It was 
a secret source of humiliation to her that there 
had as yet to her knowledge been no one with 
whom her sister had exchanged vows : if her con- 
viction on this subject could have expressed itself 
intelligibly it would have given you a glimpse 
of a droll state of mind — a dim theory that a 
bright girl ought to be able to try successive 
aspirants. Delia's conception of what such a trial 
might consist of was strangely innocent : it 
was made up of calls and walks and buggy-drives 
and above all of being spoken of as engaged; 
and it never occurred to her that a repetition of 
lovers rubs off a young lady's delicacy. She felt 
herself a born old maid and never dreamed of a 
lover of her own — he would have been dreadfully 



34  



in her way ; but she dreamed of love as something 
in its nature very delicate. All the same she dis- 
criminated ; it did lead to something after all, and 
she desired that for Francie it should not lead to 
a union with Mr. Flack. She looked at such a 
union in the light of that other view which she 
kept as yet to herself but which she was ready 
to produce so soon as the right occasion should 
come up ; and she told her sister that she would 
never speak to her again if she should let 

this young man suppose ^And here she 

always paused, plunging again into impressive 
reticence. 

" Suppose what ? " Francie asked, as if she were 
totally unacquainted (which indeed she really was) 
with the suppositions of young men, 

" Well, you'll see, when he begins to say things 
you won't like." This sounded ominous on Delia's 
part, but she had in reality very little apprehen- 
sion; otherwise she would have risen against the 
custom adopted by Mr. Flack of perpetually com- 
ing round : she would have given her attention 
(though it struggled in general unsuccessfully 
with all this side of their life) to some prompt 
means of getting away from Paris. She told her 
father what in her view the correspondent of the 
Reverberator was " after " ; but it must be added 
that she did not make him feel very strongly on 
the matter. This however was not of importance, 
with her inner sense that Francie would never 



 35 

really do anything — ^that is would never really like 
anything — they didn't like. 

Her sister's docility was a great comfort to 
her, especially as it was addressed in the first 
instance to herself. She liked and disliked cer- 
tain things much more than the younger girl did 
either; and Francie was glad to take advantage 
of her reasons, having so few of her own. They 
served — Delia's reasons — for Mr. Dosson as well, 
so that Francie was not guilty of any particular 
irreverence in regarding her sister rather than her 
father as the controller of her fate. A fate was 
rather a cumhersome and formidable possession, 
which it relieved her that some kind person should 
undertake the keeping of. Delia had somehow 
got hold of hers first — ^before even her father, and 
ever so much before Mr. Flack ; and it lay with 
Delia to make any change. She could not have 
accepted any gentleman as a husband without 
reference to Pelia, any more than she could have 
done up her hair without a glass. The only action 
taken by Mr. Dosson in consequence of his elder 
daughter's revelations was to embrace the idea as 
a subject of daily pleasantry. He was fond, in his 
intercourse with his children, of some small usual 
joke, some humorous refrain; and what could 
have been more in the line of true domestic sport 
than a little gentle but unintermitted raillery 
upon Francie's conquest ? Mr. Flack's attributive 
intentions became a theme of indulgent parental 

D 2 



36  



chaff, and the girl was neither dazzled nor annoyed 
by such familiar references to them. "Well, he 
has told us about half we know," she used often 
to reply. 

Among the things he told them was that this was 
the very best time in the young lady's life to have 
her portrait painted and the best place in the 
world to have it done well; also that he knew a 
*' lovely artist," a young American of extraordinary 
talent, who would be delighted to undertake the 
work. He conducted them to this gentleman's 
studio, where they saw several pictures by which 
they were considerably mystified. Francie pro- 
tested that she didn't want to be done that yra.j, 
and Delia declared that she would as soon have 
her sister shown up in a magic lantern. They 
had had the fortune not to find Mr. Waterlow at 
home, so that they were free to express themselves 
and the pictures were shown them by his servant. 
They looked at them as they looked at bonnets 
and confections when they went to expensive 
shops ; as if it were a question, among so many 
specimens, of the style and colour they would 
choose. Mr. Waterlqw's productions struck them 
for the most part in the same manner as those 
garments which ladies classify as frights, and 
they went away with a very low opinion of the 
young American master. George Flack told them, 
however, that they couldn't get out of it, inasmuch 
as he had already written home to the Reverberator 



 37 

that Francie was to sit. They accepted this 
somehow as a kind of supernatural sign that she 
would have to ; for they believed everything that 
they heard quoted from a newspaper. Moreover 
Mr. Flack explained to them that it would be 
idiotic to miss such an opportunity to get something 
at once precious and cheap ; for it was well known 
that Impressionism was going to be the art of 
the future, and Charles Waterlow was a rising 
Impressionist. It was a new system altogether 
and the latest improvement in art. They didn't 
want to go back, they wanted to go forward, and 
he would give them an article that would fetch 
five times the money in a couple of years. They 
were not in search of a bargain, but they allowed 
themselves to be inoculated with any reason which 
they thought would be characteristic of earnest 
people; and he even convinced them, after a 
little, that when once they had got used to Impres- 
sionism they would never look at anything else. 
Mr. Waterlow was the man, among the young, 
and he had no interest in praising him, because he 
was not a personal friend; his reputation was. 
advancing with strides, and any one with any 
sense would want to secure something before the 
rush. 



III. 



The young ladies consented to return to the 
Avenue de Villiers, and this time they found the 
celebrity of the future. He was smoking cigarettes 
with a friend, while cofifee was served to the two 
gentlemen (it was just after luncheon), on a vast 
divan, covered with scrappy oriental rugs and 
cushions ; it looked, Francie thought, as if the 
artist had set up a carpet-shop in a corner. She 
thought him very pleasant; and it may be men- 
tioned without circumlocution that the young lady 
ushered in by the vulgar American reporter, whom 
he didn't like and who had already come too often 
to his studio to pick up "glimpses" (the painter 
wondered how in the world he had picked her up), 
this charming cajididate for portraiture struck 
Charles Waterlow on the spot as an adorable model. 
She made, it may further be declared, quite the same 
impression on the gentleman who was with him 
and who never took his eyes oflf her while her own 
rested, afresh, on several finished and unfinished 



 39 

canvases. This gentleman asked of his friend, at 
the end of five minutes, the favour of an intro- 
duction to her ; in consequence of which Francie 
learned that his name (she thought it singular) 
was Gaston Probert. Mr. Probert was a kind- 
eyed, smiling youth, who fingered the points of his 
moustache ; he was represented by Mr. Waterlow 
as an American, but he pronounced the American 
language (so at least it seemed to Francie) as if 
it had been French. 

After Francie had quitted the studio with Delia 
and Mr. Flack (her father, on this occasion, was 
not of the party), the two young men, falling 
back upon their divan, broke into expressions 
of aesthetic rapture, declared that the girl had 
qualities — oh, but qualities, and a charm of line ! 
They remained there for an hour, contemplat- 
ing these rare properties in the smoke of their 
cigarettes. You would have gathered from their 
conversation (though, as regards much of it, 
only perhaps with the aid of a grammar and 
dictionary) that the young lady possessed plastic 
treasures of the highest order, of which she was 
evidently quite unconscious. Before this however 
Mr. Waterlow had come to an understanding 
with his visitors — it had been settled that Miss 
Fraacina should sit for him at his first hour of 
leisure. Unfortunately that hour presented itself 
as still remote and he was unable to make a 
definite appointment. He had sitters on his 



40  

hands — ^he had at least three portraits to finish 
before going to Spain. And he adverted with 
bitterness to the journey to Spain — a little ex- 
cursion laid out precisely with his friend Probert 
for the last weeks of the spring, the first of the 
southern summer, the time of the long days and 
the real light. Gaston Probert re-echoed his regrets, 
for though he had no business with Miss Francina 
(he liked her name), he also wanted to see her 
again. They half agreed to give up Spain (they 
had, after all, been there before), so that Waterlow 
might take the girl in hand 'without delay, the 
moment he had knocked ofif his present work. 
This amendment did not hold however, for other 
considerations came up and the artist resigned 
himself to the arrangement on which the Miss 
Dossons had quitted him : he thought it so charac- 
teristic of their nationality that they should settle 
a matter of that sort for themselves. This was 
simply that they should come back in the autumn, 
when he should be comparatively free : then there 
would be a margin and they might all take their 
time. At present, before long (by the time he 
should be ready), the question of Miss Francina's 
leaving Paris for the summer would be sure to 
come up, and that would be a tiresome interrup- 
tion. She liked Paris, she had no plans for the 
autumn and only wanted a reason to come back 
about the twentieth of September. Mr. Waterlow 
remarked humorously that she evidently bossed 



THE KEVERBERATOR. 41 



the shop. Meanwhile, before starting for Spain, 
he would see her as often as possible — ^his eye 
would take possession of her. 

His companion envied him his eye ; he intimated 
that he was jealous of his eye. It was perhaps 
as a step towards establishing his right to be 
jealous that Mr. Probert left a card upon the 
Miss Dossons at the Hdtel de TUnivers et de 
Cheltenham, having first ascertained that such 
a proceeding would not, by the young American 
sisters, be regarded as an unwarrantable liberty. 
Gaston Probert was an American who had never 
been in America, and he was obliged to take 
counsel on such an emergency as that. He knew 
that in Paris young men did not call at hotels 
on honourable damsels; but he also knew that 
honourable damsels did not visit young men in 
studios ; and he had no guide, no light that he 
could trust, save the wisdom of his friendWaterlow, 
which, however, was for the most part communi- 
cated to him in a derisive and misleading form. 
Waterlow, who wa^ after all himself an ornament 
of the French and the very French school, jeered 
at his want of national instinct, at the way he 
never knew by which end to take hold of a com- 
patriot. Poor Probert was obliged to confess that he 
had had terribly little practice, and in the great 
medley of aliens and brothers (and even more of 
sisters), he couldn't tell which was which. He 
would have had a country and countrymen, to say 



42  



nothing of countrywomen, if he could ; but that 
matter had not been settled for him and there is 
a difficulty in settling it for one's self. Bom in 
Paris, he had been brought up altogether on 
French lines, in a family which French society 
had irrecoverably absorbed. His father, a Carolinian 
and a Catholic, was a Gallomaniac of the old 
American type. His three sisters had married 
Frenchmen, and one of them lived in Brittany 
and the others much of the time in Touraine. 
His only brother had fallen, during the terrible 
year, in defence of their adoptive country. Yet 
Gaston, though he had had an old Legitimist 
marquis for his godfather, was not legally one of 
its children: his mother had, on her deathbed, 
extorted from him the promise that he would not 
take service in its armies; she considered, after 
the death of her elder son (Gaston, in 1870, 
was a boy of ten), that the family had been 
patriotic enough for courtesy. 

The young man therefore, between two stools, 
had no clear sitting-place: he wanted to be as 
American as he could and yet not less Frencli than 
he was; he was afraid to give up the little that 
he was and find that what he might be was less 
— he shrank from a flying leap which might drop 
him in the middle of the sea. At the same time 
he was aware that the only way to know how it 
feels to be an American is to try it, and he had 
many a purpose of making the westward journey. 



THE REVEKBERATOR. 43 



His family, however, had been so completely 
Gallicised that the affairs of each member of it 
were the affairs of all the rest, and his father, 
his sisters and his brothers-in-law had not yet 
sufficiently made this scheme their own for him 
to feel that it was really his. It was a family 
in which there was no individual but only a 
collective property. Meanwhile he tried, as I say, 
by safer enterprises, and especially by going a 
good deal to see Charles Waterlow in the Avenue 
de Villiers, whom he believed to be his dearest 
friend, formed for his affection by Monsieur 
Carolus. He had an idea that in this manner he 
kept himself in touch with his countrymen ; and 
he thought he tried especially when he left that 
card on the Misses Dosson. He was in search of 
freshness, but he need not have gone far: he 
need only have turned his lantern upon his own 
young breast to find a considerable store of it. 
Like many unoccupied young men at the present 
hour he gave much attention to art, lived as 
much as possible in that alternative world, where 
leisure and vagueness are so mercifully relieved of 
their crudity. To make up for his want of talent 
he espoused the talent of others (that is, of several), 
and was as sensitive and conscientious about 
them as he might have been about himself. He 
defended certain of Waterlow's purples and greens 
as he would have defended his own honour; and 
in regard to two or three other painters had 



4 

1 



44  

convictions which belonged almost to the undiscuss- 
able part of life. He had not in general a high 
sense of success, but what kept it down particu- 
larly was his indocile hand, the fact that, such 
as they were, Waterlow's purples and greens, for 
instance, were far beyond him. If he had not failed 
there other failures would not have mattered, not 
even that of not having a country; and it was 
on the occasion of his friend's agreement to paint 
that strange, lovely girl, whom he liked so much 
and whose companions he failed to like, that he 
felt supremely without a vocation. Freshness 
was there at least, if he had only had the method. 
He prayed eaniestly, in relation to methods, for 
a providential reinforcement of Waterlow's sense 
of this quality. If Waterlow had a fault it was 
that he was sometimes a little stale. 

He avenged himself for the artist's bewildering 
treatment of his first attempt to approach Miss 
Francie by indulging, at the end of another week, 
in a second. He went about six o'clock, when he 
supposed she would have returned from her day's 
wanderings, and his prudence was rewarded by 
the sight of the young lady sitting in the court of 
the hotel with her father and sister. Mr. Dosson 
was new to Gaston Probert, but the visitor's in- 
telligence embraced him. The little party was as 
usual expecting Mr. Flack at any moment, and 
they had collected down stairs, so that he might 
pick them up easily. They had, on the first floor, 



 45 



an expensive parlour, decorated in white and 
gold, with sofas of crimson damask; but there 
was something lonely in that grandeur and the 
place had become mainly a receptacle for their 
tall trunks, with a half-emptied paper of chocolates 
or marrons glac^ on every table. After young 
Probert'a first call his name was often on the lips 
of the simple trio, and Mr. Dosson grew still more 
jocose, making nothing of a secret of his percep- 
tion that Francie hit the bull's-eye " every time." 
Mr. Waterlow had returned their visit, but that 
was rather a matter of course, because it was 
they who had gone after him. They had not gone 
^ter the other one; it was he who had come 
after them. When he entered the hotel, as they 
sat there, this pursuit and its probable motive 
became startlingly vivid. 

Delia had taken the matter much more gravely 
than her father; she said there was a great deal 
she wanted to find out. She mused upon these 
mysteries visibly, but without advancing much, 
and she appealed for assistance to George Flack, 
with a candour which he appreciated and returned. 
If he knew anything he ought to know who Mr. 
Probert was ; and she spoke as if it would be in 
the natural course that he should elicit the reve- 
lation by an interview. Mr. Flack promised to 
'* nose round " ; he said the best plan would be 
that the results should "come back" to her in 
the Reverberator ; he appeared to think that the 



46  



people could be persuaded that they wanted about 
a column on Mr. Probert. His researches, how- 
ever, were fruitless, for in spite of the one fact 
the girl was able to give him as a starting- 
point, the fact that their new acquaintance had 
spent his whole life in Paris, the young journalist 
couldn't scare up a single person who had even 
heard of him. He had questioned up and down 
and all over the place, from the Rue Scribe to £he 
far end of Chaillot, and he knew people who knew 
others who knew every member of the American 
colony; that select body which haunted poor 
Delia's imagination, glittered and re-echoed there 
in a hundred tormenting roundabout gHmpses. 
That was where she wanted to get Francie, as 
she said to herself; she wanted to get her right in 
there. She believed the members of this society 
to constitute a little kingdom of the blest ; and 
she used to drive through the Avenue Gabriel, 
the Rue de Marignan and the wide vistas which 
radiate from the Arch of Triumph and are always 
changing their names, on purpose to send up 
wistful glances to the windows (she had learned 
that all this was the happy quarter) of the envi- 
able but unapproachable colonists. She saw these 
privileged mortals, as she supposed, in almost every 
victoria that made a languid lady with a pretty 
head flash past her, and she had no idea how 
little honour this theory sometimes did her expa- 
triated countrywomen. Her plan was already made 



 47 



to be on the field again the next winter and take 
it up seriously, this question of getting Francie 
in. 

When Mr. Flack said to her that young Probert's 
set couldn't be either the rose or anything near 
it, since the oldest inhabitant had never heard 
of them, Delia had a flash of inspiration, an in- 
tellectual flight that she herself did not measure at 
the time. She asked if that did not perhaps prove 
on the contrary quite the opposite — ^that they 
were just the cream and beyond all others. Was 
there not a kind of inner circle, and were they not 
somewhere about the centre of that ? George 
Flack almost quivered at this pregnant sugges- 
tion from so unusual a quarter, for he guessed on 
the spot that Delia Dosson had divined. "Why, 
do you mean one of those families that have 
worked down so far you can't find where they 
went in ? " that was the phrase in which he recog- 
nised the truth of the girl's idea. Delia's fixed 
eyes assented, and after a moment of cogitation 
George Flack broke out — '* That's the kind of 
family we want a sketch of ! " 

" Well, perhaps they don't want to be sketched. 
You had better find out," Delia had rejoined. 

The chance to find out might have seemed to 
present itself when Mr. Probert walked in that 
confiding way into the hotel ; for his arrival was 
followed, a quarter of an hour later, by that of 
the representative of the Keverberator. Gaston 



48  



liked the way they treated him ; though demon- 
strative it was not artificial. Mr. Dosson said they 
had been hoping he would come round again and 
Delia remarked that she supposed he had had 
quite a journey — Paris was so big ; and she urged 
his acceptance of a glass of wine or a cup of tea. 
She added that that wasn't the place where they 
usually received (she liked to hear herself talk of 
"receiving"), and led the party up to her white 
and gold saloon, where they should be so much 
more private ; she liked also to hear herself talk 
of privacy. They sat on the red silk chairs and 
she hoped Mr. Probert would at least taste a 
sugared chestnut or a chocolate; and when he 
declined, pleading the imminence of the dinner- 
hour, she murmured, "Well, I suppose you're 
so used to them — ^living so long over here." 
The allusion to the dinner-hour led Mr. Dosson 
to express the wish that he would go round and 
dine with them without ceremony; they were 
expecting a friend — he generally settled it for 
them — who was coming to take them round. 

" And then we are going to the circus," Francie 
said, speaking for the first time. 

If she had not spoken before she had done 
something still more to the purpose ; she had 
removed any shade of doubt that might have 
lingered in the young man's spirit as to her charm 
of line. He was aware that his Parisian educa- 
tion, acting upon a natural aptitude, had opened 



 49 

him much— rendered him perhaps even mor- 
bidly sensitive — ^to impressions of this order; 
the society of artists, the talk of studios, the 
attentive study of beautiful works, the sight of 
a thousand forms of curious research and experi- 
ment, had produced in his mind a new sense, 
the exercise of which was a conscious enjoyment, 
and the supreme gratification of which, on several 
occasions, had given him as many ineffaceable 
memories. He had once said to his friend 
Waterlow : " I don't know whether it's a confession 
of a very poor life, but the most important things 
that have happened to me in this world have 
been simply half-a-dozen impressions — impres- 
sions of the eye." " Ah, malheureux, you're lost ! " 
the painter had exclaimed, in answer to this, 
and without even taking the trouble to explain 
his ominous speech. Gaston Probert however 
had not been frightened by it, and he continued 
to be thankful for the sensitive plate that nature 
(with culture added), enabled him to carry in his 
brain. The impression of the eye was doubtless 
not everything, but it was so much gained, so 
much saved, in a world in which other treasures 
were apt to slip through one's fingers; and 
above all it had the merit that so many things 
gave it and that nothing could take it away. He 
had perceived in a moment that Francie Dosson 
gave it; and now, seeing her a second time, he 
felt that she conferred it in a degree which made 

HI* 



50 THE REVERBERATOK. 

acquaintance with her one of those " important " 
facts of which he had spoken to Charles Waterlow. 
It was in the case of such an accident as this 
that he felt the value of his Parisian education 
—his modem sense. 

It was therefore not directly the prospect of 
the circus that induced him to accept Mr. Dosson's 
invitation ; nor was it even the charm exerted by 
the girFs appearing, in the few words she uttered, 
to appeal to him for herself It was his feeling 
that on the edge of the glittering ring her type 
would form his entertainment and that if he knew 
it was rare she herself did not. He liked to be 
conscious, but he liked others not to be. It 
seemed to him at this moment, after he had told 
Mr, Dosson he should be delighted to spend the 
evening with them, that he was indeed trying 
hard to discover how it would feel to be an 
American; he had jumped on the ship, he was 
pitching away to the west. He had led his sister, 
Mme. de Br^court, to expect that he would dine 
with her (she was having a little party), and if 
she could see the people to whom, without a 
scruple, with a quick sense of refreshment and 
freedom, he now sacrificed her ! He knew who 
was coming to his sister's, in the Place Beauvau ; 
Mme. d'Outreville and M. de Grospr^, old M. 
Courageau, Mme. de Brives, Lord and Lady 
Trantum, Mile, de Saintonge ; but he was fascinated 
by the idea of the contrast between what he pre- 



 51 

ferred and what he gave up. His life had long 
been wanting — painfully wanting — in the element 
of contrast, and here was a ch-ance to bring it in. 
He seemed to see it come in powerfully with Mr. 
Flack, after Miss Dosson had proposed that they 
should walk off without their initiator. Her father 
did not favour this suggestion ; he said, *' We 
want a double good dinner to-day and Mr. Flack has 
got to order it." Upon this Delia had asked the 
visitor if he couldn't order — a Frenchman like 
him ; and Francie had interrupted, before he could 
answer the question — " Well, are you a French- 
man? that's just the point, isn't it?" Gaston 
Probert replied that he had no wish but to be of 
her nationality, and the elder sister asked him if 
he knew many Americans in Paris. He was obliged 
to confess that he did not, but he hastened to add 
that he was eager to go on, now that he had made 
such a charming beginning. 

" Oh, we ain't anything — if you mean that," 
said the young lady. *' If you go on you'll go on 
beyond us." 

"We ain't anything here, my dear, but we 
are a good deal at home," Mr. Dosson remarked, 
smiling. 

" I think we are very nice anywhere ! " Francie 
exclaimed ; upon which Gaston Probert declared 
that they were as delightful as possible. It was 
in these amenities that George Flack found them 
engaged ; but there was none the less a certain 

E 2 



52  



eagerness in his greeting of the other guest, as if 
he had it in mind to ask him how soon he 
could give him half an hour. I hasten to add 
that, with the turn the occasion presently took, 
the correspondent of the Reverberator renounced 
the effort to put Mr. Probert down. They all went 
out together, and the professional impulse, usually 
so irresistible in George Flack's mind, Suffered a 
modification. He wanted to put his fellow-visitor 
down, but in a more human, a more passionate 
sense. Probert talked very little to Francie, but 
though Mr. Flaxjk did not know that on a first 
occasion he would have thought that violent, even 
rather gross, he knew it was for Francie, and 
Francie alone, that the fifth member of the party 
was there. He said to himself suddenly and in 
perfect sincerity that it was a mean class any 
way, the people for whom their own country was 
not good enough. He did not go so far however, 
when they were seated at the admirable establish- 
ment of M. Durand, in the Place de la Madeleine> 
as to order a bad dinner to spite his competitor ; 
nor did he, to spoil this gentleman's amusement, 
take uncomfortable seats at the pretty circus in 
the Champs Elysees to which, at half-past eight 
o'clock, the company was conveyed (it was a drive 
of but five minutes) in a couple of cabs. The 
occasion therefore was superficially smooth, and he 
could see that the sense of being disagreeable to an 
American newspaper-man was not needed to make 



r I 



1 



 53 



his nondescript rival enjoy it. He hated his accent, 
he hated his laugh, and he hated above all the 
lamblike way their companions accepted him. Mr. 
Flack was quite acute enough to make an import- 
ant observation: he cherished it and promised 
himself to bring it to the notice of his gullible 
friends. Gaston Probert professed a great desire 
to be of service to the young ladies — to do some- 
thing which would help them to be happy in Paris ; 
but he gave no hint of an intention to do that 
which would contribute most to such a result — 
bring them in contact with the other members, and 
above all with the female members, of his family. 
George Flack knew nothing about the matter, but 
he required for purposes of argument that Mr. 
Probert's family should have female members, and 
it was lucky for him that his assumption was just. 
He thought he foresaw the eflfect with which he 
should impress it upon Francie and Delia (but 
above all upon Delia, who would then herself im- 
press it upon Francie), that it would be time for 
their French friend to talk when he had brought 
his mother round. Bid he never would — they 
might bet their pile on that ! He never did, in the 
sequel, in fact — having, poor young man, no mother 
to bring. Moreover he was mum (as Delia phrased 
it to herself) about Mme. de Brdcourt and Mme. 
de Cliche : such. Miss Dosson learned from Charles 
Waterlow, were the names of his two sisters who 
had houses in Paris — gathering at the same time 



54  

the information that one of these ladies was a 
marq^cise and the other a comtesse. She was less 
exasperated by their non-appearance than Mr. 
Flack had hoped, and it did not prevent an ex- 
cursion to dine at Saint-Germain, a week after the 
evening spent at the circus, which included both of 
the new admirers. It also as a matter of 
course included Mr. Flack, for though the party 
had been proposed in the first instance by Charles 
Waterlow, who wished to multiply opportunities 
for studying his fixture sitter, Mr. Dosson had 
characteristically constituted himself host and ad- 
ministrator, with the young journalist as his deputy. 
He liked to invite people and to pay for them, and 
he disliked to be invited and paid for. He was 
never inwardly content, on any occasion, unless a 
great deal of money was spent, and he could be sure 
enough of the magnitude of the sum only when he 
himself spent it. He was too simple for conceit or 
for pride of purse, but he always felt that any ar- 
rangements were a little shabby as to which the 
expenses had not been referred to him. He never 
told any one how he met them. Moreover Delia 
had told him that if they should go to Saint- 
Germain as guests of the artist and his friend Mr. 
Flack would not be of the company : she was sure 
those gentlemen would not invite him. In fact 
she was too acute, for though he liked him little, 
Charles Waterlow would on this occasion have 
made a point of expressing by a hospitable attitude 



THE REVERBERATOR 65 



his sense of obligation to a man who had brought 
him such a subject. Delia's hint however was all- 
suflScient for her father ; he would have thought it 
a gross breach of friendly loyalty to take part in a 
festival not graced by Mr. Flack's presence. His 
idea of loyalty was that he should scarcely smoke a 
cigar unless his friend was there to take another, 
and he felt rather mean if he went round alone to get 
shaved. As regards Saint-Germain, he took over 
the project and George Flack telegraphed for a 
table on the terrace at the Pavilion Henri Quatre. 
Mr. Dosson had by this time learned to trust the 
European manager of the Reverberator to spend 
his money almost as he himself would. 



IV. 



Delia had broken out the evening they took 
Mr. Probert to the circus ; she had apostrophised 
Francie as they each sat in a red-damask chair 
after. ascending to their apartments. They had 
bade their companions farewell at the door of the 
hotel and the two gentlemen had walked off in 
different directions. But up stairs they had 
instinctively not separated ; they dropped into the 
first place and sat looking at each other and at the 
highly-decorated lamps that burned, night after 
night, in their empty saloon. " Well, I want to 
know when you're going to stop," Delia said to her 
sister, speaking as if this remark were a continua- 
tion, which it was not, of something they had 
lately been saying. 

" Stop what ? " asked Francie, reaching forward 
for a marron, 

" Stop carrying on the way you do— with 
Mr. Flack." 

Francie stared, while she consumed her marron; 



 57 



then she replied, in her little flat, patient voice, 
'*Why, Delia Dosson, how can you be so 
foolish ? '' 

" Father, I wish you'd speak to her. Francie, I 
ain't foolish." 

"What do you want me to say to her?'* 
Mr. Dosson inquired. " I guess IVe said about 
all I know." 

" Well, that's in fun ; I want you to speak to 
her in earnest." 

" I guess there's no one in earnest but you," 
Francie remarked. " These are not so good as 
the last." 

" No, and there won't be if you don't look out. 
There's something you can do if you'll just 
keep quiet. If you can't tell diflference of style, 
well, I can." 

" What's the difference of style ? " asked Mr. 
Dosson. But before this question could be 
answered Francie protested against the charge of 
carrying on. Quiet? Wasn't she as quiet as a 
stopped clock ? Delia replied that a girl was not 
quiet so long as she didn't keep others so; and 
she wanted to know what her sister proposed to 
do about Mr. Flack. " Why don't you take him and 
let Francie take the other ? " Mr. Dosson continued. 

" That's just what I'm after — to make her take 
the other," said his elder daughter. 

" Take him — how do you mean ? " Francie 
inquired. 



58  

" Oh, you know how/' 

" Yes, I guess you know how ! " Mr. Dosson 
laughed, with an absence of prejudice which 
might have been thought deplorable in a 
parent. 

" Do you want to stay in Europe or not ? that's 
what I want to know," Delia declared to her sister. 
" If you want to go bang home you're taking the 
right way to do it." 

''What has that got to do with it?" asked 
Mr. Dosson. 

"Should you like so much to reside at that 
place — where is it ? — where his paper is published ? 
That's where you'll have to pull up, sooner or 
later," Delia pursued. 

" Do you want to stay in Europe, father ? " 
Francie said, with her small sweet weariness. 

" It depends on what you mean by staying. I 
want to go home some time." 

*'Well, then, you've got to go without Mr. 
Probert," Delia remarked with decision. " If you 
think he wants to live over there " 

"Why, Delia, he wants dreadfully to go — ^he 
told me so himself," Francie argued, with passion- 
less pauses. 

"Yes, and when he gets there he'll want to 
come back. I thought you were so much interested 
in Paris." 

" My poor child, I am interested ! " smiled 
Francie. " Ain't I interested, father ? " 



 59 



"Well, I don't know how you could act 
diflferently, to show it." 

" Well, I do then,'' said Delia. " And if you 
don't make Mr. Flack understand I will." 

" Oh, I guess he understands — he's so bright," 
Francie returned. 

" Yes, I guess he does — ^he is bright," said Mr. 
Dosson. " Good-night, chickens," he added ; and 
wandered oflf to a couch of untroubled repose. 

His daughters sat up half an hour later, but 
not by the wish of the younger girl. She was 
always passive however, always docile when Delia 
was, as she said, on the war-path, and though she 
had none of her sister s insistence she was very 
courageous in suffering. She thought Delia 
whipped her up too much, but there was that in 
her which would have prevented her from ever 
running away. She could smile and smile for an 
hour without irritation, making even pacific 
answers, though all the while her companion's 
grossness hurt something delicate that was in her. 
She knew that DeKa loved her — not loving herself 
meanwhile a bit — as no one else in the world 
probably ever would ; and there was something 
droll in such plans for her — plans of ambition 
which could only involve a loss. The real answer 
tp anything, to everything Delia might say in 
her moods of prefigurement was — " Oh, if you 
want to make out that people are thinking of me 
or that they ever will, you ought to remember 



60  



that no one can possibly think of me half as much 
as you do. Therefore if there is to be any comfort 
for either of us we had both much better just go 
on as we are." She did not however on this 
occasion, meet her sister with this syllogism, 
because there happened to be a certain fascination 
in the way Delia set forth the great truth that the 
star of matrimony, for the American girl, was now 
shining in the east — ^in England and France and. 
Italy. They had only to look round anywhere to 
see it : what did they hear of every day in the 
week but of the engagement of one of their own 
compeers to some count or some lord? Delia 
insisted on the fact that it was in that vast, vague 
section of the globe to which she never alluded 
save as " over here " that the American girl was 
now called upon to play, under providence, her 
part. When Francie remarked that Mr. Probert 
was not a count nor a lord her sister rejoined that 
she didn't care whether he was or not. To this 
Francie replied that she herself didn't care but 
that Delia ought to, to be consistent. 

" Well, he's a prince compared with Mr. Flack," 
Delia declared. 

" He hasn't the same ability ; not half." 
"He has the ability to have three sisters 
who are just the sort of people I want you to 
know." 

" What good will they do me ? " Francie asked. 
"They'll hate me. Before they could turn round 



 61 



I should do something— in perfect innocence— 
that they would think monstrous." 

" Well, what would that matter if he liked 
you ? " 

"Oh, but he wouldn't, then! He would hate 
me too." 

"Then all youVe got to do is not to do it," 
Delia said. 

"Oh, but I should — every time," her sister 
went on. 

Delia looked at her a moment. "What are 
you talking about ? " 

" Yes, what am I ? It's disgusting 1 " And 
Francie sprang up. 

" I'm sorry you have such thoughts," said Delia, 
sententiously. 

"It's disgusting to talk about a gentleman — 
and his sisters and his society and everything 
else — before he has scarcely looked at you." 

*'It's disgusting if he isn't just dying; but it 
isn't if he is." 

" Well, I'll make him skip ! " Francie went on. 

" Oh, you're worse than father ! " her sister 
cried, giving her a push as they went to bed. 

They reached Saint-Germain with their com- 
panionsnearly an hour before the time that had been 
fixed for dinner ; the purpose of this being to enable 
them to enjoy with what remained of daylight — 
a stroll on the celebrated terrace and a study of 
the magnificent view. The evening was splendid 



62  

and the atmosphere favourable to this entertain- 
ment; the grass was vivid on the broad walk 
beside the parapet, the park and forest were fresh 
and leafy and the prettiest golden light hung over 
the curving Seine and the far-spreading city. The 
hill which forms the terrace stretched down among 
the vineyards, with the poles delicate yet in their 
bareness, to the river, and the prospect was 
spotted here and there with the red legs of the 
little sauntering soldiers of the garrison. How it 
came, after Delia's warning in regard to her 
carrying on (especially as she had not failed to feel 
the force of her sister*s wisdom), Francie could not 
have told herself: certain it is that before ten 
minutes had elapsed she perceived, first, that the 
evening would not pass without Mr. Flack's taking 
in some way, and for a certain time, peculiar 
possession of her ; and then that he was already 
doing so, that he had drawn her away from the 
others, who were stopping behind them to exclaim 
upon the view, that he made her walk faster, and 
that he ended by interposing such a distance that 
she was practically alone with him. This was 
what he wanted, but it was not all ; she felt that 
he wanted a great many other things. The large 
perspective of the terrace stretched away before 
them (Mr. Probert had said it was in the grand 
style), and he was determined to make her walk 
to the end. She felt sorry for his determinations ; 
they were an idle exercise of a force intrinsically 



 63 



fine, and she wanted to protest, to let faim know 
that it was really a waste of his great cleverness 
to count upon her. She was not to be counted on ; 
she was a vague, soft, negative being who had 
never decided anything and never would, who had 
not even the merit of coquetry and who only 
asked to be let alone. She made him stop at last, 
telling him, while she leaned against the parapet, 
that he walked too fast ; and she looked back at 
their companions, whom she expected to see, under 
pressure from Delia, following at the highest speed. 
But they were not following; they still stood there, 
only looking, attentively enough, at the absent 
members of the party. Delia would wave her 
parasol, beckon her back, send Mr. Waterlow to 
bring her; Francie looked from one moment to 
another for some such manifestation as that. But 
no manifestation came ; none at least but the odd 
spectacle, presently, of the group turning round 
and, evidently under Delia's direction, retracing its 
steps. Francie guessed in a moment what was meant 
by that : it was the most definite signal her sister 
could have given. It made her feel that Delia 
counted on her, but to such a different end, just as 
poor Mr. Flack did, just as Delia wished to per- 
suade her that Mr. Probert did. The girl gave a 
sigh, looking up at her companion with troubled 
eyes, at the idea of being made the object of con- 
verging policies. Such a thankless, bored, evasive 
little object as she felt herself ! "What Delia had 



64  

•" - ■ — ■ - — I ■ -- m 

said in turning away was — " Yes, I am watching 
you, and I depend upon you to finish him up. 
Stay there with him — go oft* with him (I'll give 
you half an hour if necessary), only settle him 
once for all. It is very kind of me to give you 
this chance ; and in return for it I expect you 
to be able to tell me this evening that he has got 
his answer. Shut him up ! " 

Francie did not in the least disUke Mr. Flack. 
Interested as I am in presenting her favourably to 
the reader I am yet obliged as a veracious his- 
torian to admit that he seemed to her decidedly a 
brilliant being. In many a girl the sort of appre- 
ciation she had of him might easily have been 
converted by peremptory treatment from outside 
into something more exalted. I do not misrepre- 
sent the perversity of women in saying that our 
young lady might at this moment have replied to 
her sister with : " No, I was not in love with him, 
but somehow since you are so very prohibitive I 
foresee that I shall be if he asks me." It is doubt- 
less difficult to say more for Francie's simplicity of 
character than that she felt no need of encourag- 
ing Mr. Flack in order to prove to herself that she 
was not bullied. She didn't care whether she were 
bullied or not ; and she was perfectly capable of 
letting her sister believe that she had carried 
mildness to the point of giving up a man she had 
a secret sentiment for in order to oblige that 
large-brained young lady. She was not clear. 



 65 

herself as to whether it might not be so ; her 
pride, what she had of it, lay in an undistributed, 
inert form quite at the bottom of her heart and 
she had never yet invented any consoling theory 
to cover her want of a high spirit. She felt, as 
she looked up at Mr. Flack, that she didn't care 
even if he should think that she sacrificed him to 
a childish subservience. His bright eyes were hard, 
as if he could almost guess how cynical she was, 
and she turned her own again towards her retreat- 
ing companions. " They are going to dinner ; we 
oughtn't to be dawdling here," she said. 

'* Well, if they are going to dinner they'll have 
to eat the napkins. ' I ordered it and 1 know when 
it will be ready," George Flack replied. " Besides 
they are not going to dinner, they are going to 
walk in the park. Don't you worry, we sha'n't lose 
them. I wish we could ! " the young man added, 
smiling. 

" You wish we could ? " 

" I should like to feel that you were under my 
particular protection." 

" Well, I don't know what the dangers are," said 
Francie, setting herself in motion again. She went 
after the others, but at the end of a few steps he 
stopped her again. 

" You won't have confidence. I wish you would 
believe what I tell you." 

"You haven't told me anything." And she 
turned her back to him, looking away at the 



6G  



splendid view. " I admire the scenery," she added 
in a moment. 

*' Oh, bother the scenery ! I want to tell you 
somethii:^- about myself, if I could flatter myself 
that you would take any interest in it/' He had 
thrust his cane, waist-high, into the low wall of the 
terrace, and he leaned against it, screwing the point 
gently round with both hands. 

" I'll take an interest if I can understand," said 
Francie. 

" You can understand easy enough, if you'll try. 
I've got some news from America to-day that has 
pleased me very much. The Reverberator has 
taken a jump." 

This was not what Francie had expected, but it 
was better. *' Taken a jump ? " she repeated. 

"It has gone straight up. It's in the second 
hundred thousand." 

" Hundred thousand dollars ? " said Francie. 

" No, Miss Francie, copies. That's the circula- 
tion. But the dollars are footing up, too." 

"And do they all come to you ? " 

" Precious few of them ! I wish they did ; it's a 
pleasant property." 

" Then it isn't yours ? " she asked, turning round 
to him. It was an impulse of sympathy that made 
her look at him now, for she already knew how 
much he had the success of his newspaper at heart. 
He had once told her he loved the Reverberator 
as he had loved his first jack-knife. 



i^i^ ■ 



\ 



 67 



" Mine ? You don't mean to say you suppose I 
own it!" George Flack exclaimed. The light 
projected upon her innocence by these words was 
so strong that the girl blushed, and he went on 
more tenderly — ** It's a pretty sight, the way you 
and your sister take that sort of thing for granted. 
Do you think property grows on you, like a mous- 
tache ? Well, it seems as if it had, on your father. 
If I owned the Reverberator I shouldn't be stump- 
ing round here ; I'd give my attention to another 
branch of the business. That is I would give my 
attention to all, but I wouldn't go round with the 
cart. But I'm going to get hold of it, and I want 
you to help me," the young man went on ; " that's 
just what I wanted to speak to you about. It's a 
big thing already and I mean to make it bigger : 
the most universal society-paper the world has seen. 
That's where the future lies, and the man who sees 
it first is the man who'll make his pile. It's afield 
for enlightened enterprise that hasn't yet begun to 
be worked." He continued, glowing, almost sud- 
denly, with his idea, and one of his eyes half closed 
itself knowingly, in a way that was habitual with 
him when he talked consecutively. The effect of 
this would have been droll to a listener, the note 
of the prospectus mingling with the accent of 
passion. But it was not droll to Francie ; she only 
thought it, or supposed it, a proof of the way Mr. 
Flack saw everything in its largest relations. 
" There are ten thousand things to do that haven't 

F 2 



68  



been done, and I am going to do them. .The 
society-news of every quarter of the globe, fur- 
nished by the prominent members themselves (oh, 
they can be fixed — you'll see !) from day to day and 
from hour to hour and served up at every break- 
fast-table in the United States— that's what the 
American people want and that's what the Ameri- 
can people are going to have. I wouldn't say it 
to every one, but I don't mind telling you, that I 
consider I have about as fine a sense as any one of 
what's going to be required in future over there. 
I'm going for the secrets, the chronique intime, as 
they say here ; what the people want Is just what 
isn't told, and I'm going to tell it. Oh, they're bound 
to have the plums ! That's about played out, any 
way, the idea of sticking up a sign of ' private ' 
and thinking you can keep the place to yourself. 
You can't do it — you can't keep out the light of 
the Press. Now what I'm going to do is to set up 
the biggest lamp yet made and to make it shine 
all over the place. We'll see who's private then ! 
I'll make them crowd in themselves with the in- 
formation, and as I tell you, Miss Francie, it's a 
job in which you can give me a lovely push." 

*' Well, I don't see how," said Francie, candidly. 
"I haven't got any secrets." She spoke gaily, 
because she was relieved ; she thought she had in 
reality a glimpse of what he wanted of her. It 
was something better than she had feared. Since 
he didn't own the great newspaper (her conception 



 69 

of such matters was of the dimmest), he desired to 
possess himself of it, and she suflSciently compre- 
hended that money was needed for that. She 
further seemed to perceive that he presented him- 
self to her as moneyless and that this brought 
them round by a vague but comfortable transition 
to a pleasant consciousness that her father was not. 
The remaining induction, silently made, was quick 
and happy : she should acquit herself by asking 
her father for the sum required and just passing 
it over to Mr. Flack. The greatness of his enter- 
prise and the magnitude of his conceptions ap- 
peared to overshadow her as they stood there. 
This was a delightful simplification and it did not 
for a moment strike her as positively unnatural 
that her companion should have a delicacy about 
appealing to Mr. Dosson directly for pecuniary 
aid, though indeed she was capable of thinking 
that odd if she had meditated upon it. There was 
nothing simpler to Francie than the idea of 
putting her hand into her father's pocket, and she 
felt that even Delia would be glad to satisfy the 
young man by this casual gesture. I must add 
unfortunately that her alarm came back to her 
from the way in which he replied : ** Do you 
mean to say you don't know, after all I've 
done ? " 

" I am sure I don't know what you've done." 
"Haven't I tried — all I know — to make you 
like me ? " 



70  



'* Oh dear, I do like you !" cried Francie ; " but 
how will that help you ? " 

" It will help me if you will understand that I 
love you." 

" Well, I won't understand ! " replied the girl, 
walking oflf. 

He followed her; they went on together in 
silence and then he said — " Do you mean to say 
you haven't found that out ? " 

"Oh, I don't find things out — I ain't an editor!" 
Francie laughed. 

" You draw me out and then you jibe at me," 
Mr. Flack remarked. 

" I didn't draw you out. Couldn't you see me 
just straining to get away ? " 

" Don't you sympathise with my ideas ? " 

" Of course I do, Mr. Flack ; I think they're 
splendid," said Francie, who did not in the least 
understand them. 

"Well, then, why won't you work with me? 
Your affection, your brightness, your faith would 
be everything to me." 

** I'm very sorry — but I can't — I can't," the girl 
declared. 

" You could if you would, quick enough." 

" Well, then, I won't ! " And as soon as 
these words were spoken, as -if to mitigate some- 
thing of their asperity, Francie paused a 
moment and said: "You must remember that 
I never said I would — nor anything like it. I 



 71 

thought you just wanted me to speak to ray 
father." 

" Of course I supposed you would do that." 

" I mean about your paper.*' 

" About my paper ? " 

"So as he could give you the money — to do 
what you want." 

"Lord, you're too sweet!" George Flack ex- 
claimed, staring. "Do you suppose I would ever 
touch a cent of your father's money ? " — a speech 
not so hypocritical as it may sound, inasmuch as 
the young man, who had his own refinements, had 
never been guilty, and proposed to himself never 
to be, of the plainness of twitching the purse- 
strings of his potential father-in-law with his own 
hand. He had talked to Mr. Dosson by the hour 
about the interviewing business, but he had never 
dreamed that this amiable man would give him 
money as an interesting struggler. The only 
character in which he could expect it would be 
that of Francie's husband, and then it would come 
to Francie — not to him. This reasoning did not 
diminish his desire to assume such a character, and 
his love of his profession and his appreciation of 
the girl at his side ached together in his breast 
with the same disappointment. She saw that her 
words had touched him like a lash; they made 
him blush red for a moment. This caused her 
own colour to rise — she could scarcely have said 
why — and she hurried along again. He kept close 



72  



to her ; he argued with her ; he besought her to 
think it over, assured her he was the best fellow 
in the world. To this she replied that if he didn't 
leave her alone she would cry — and how would he 
like that, to bring her back in such a state to the 
others ? He said, " Damn the others ! " but that 
did not help his case, and at last he broke out : 
" Will you just tell me this, then — is it because 
you've promised Miss Delia ? " Francie answered 
that she had not promised Miss Delia anything, 
and her companion went on ; " Of course I know 
what she has got in her head : she wants to get 
you into the high set — the grand monde, as they 
call it here ; but I didn't suppose you'd let her fix 
your life for you. You were very diflferent before 
he turned up. " 

" She never fixed anything for me. I haven't 
got any life and I don't want to have," said 
Francie. " And I don't know who you are talking 
about, either ! " 

" The man without a country. He'll pass you 
in — that's what your sister wants." 

" You oughtn't to abuse him, because it was you 
that presented him," the girl rejoined. 

" I never presented him ! I'd like to kick him." 

" We should never have seen him if it hadn't 
been for you." 

"That's a fact, but it doesn't make me love 
him any the better. He's the poorest kind 
there is." 



 



"I don't care anything about his kind/' 

" That's a pity, if you're going to marry him. 
How could I know that when I took you up 
there ? " 

" Good-bye, Mr. Flack," said Francie, trying to 
gain ground from him. 

This attempt was of course vain, and after a 
moment he resumed : " Will you keep me as a 
friend V 

" Why, Mr. Flack, of course I will ! " cried 
Francie. 

"All right," he replied; and they presently 
rejoined their companions. 



V. 



Gaston Probert made his plan, imparting it to 
no one but his friend Waterlow, whose help in- 
deed he needed to carry it out. These confidences 
cost him something, for the clever young painter 
found his predicament amusing and made no 
scruple of showing it. Probert was too much in 
love, however, to bo discountenanced by sarcasm. 
This fact is the more noteworthy as he knew 
that Waterlow scoflfed at him for a purpose- 
had a theoiy that that kind of treg-tment would 
be salutary. The French taste was in Waterlow's 
" manner," but it had not yet coloured his view 
of the relations of a young man of spirit- with 
parents and pastors. He was Gallic to the tip 
of his finest brush, but the humour of his early 
American education could not fail to obtrude itself 
in discussion with a friend in whose life the 
principle of authority played so large a part. He 
accused Probert of being afraid of his sisters, 
which was a crude way (and he knew it) of allud ■ 



 75 

ing to the rigidity of the conception of the family 
among people who had adopted and had even to 
WaterloVs sense, as the phrase is, improved upon 
the usages of France. That did injustice (and 
this the artist also knew), to the delicate nature 
of the bond which united the different members 
of the house of Probert, who were each for all 
and all for each. Family feeling among them was 
not a tyranny but a religion, and in regard to 
Mesdames de Br^court, de Cliche and de Douves 
what Qaston was most afraid of was seeming to 
them not to love them. None the less Charles . 
Waterlow, who thought he had charming parts, 
held that the best way had not been taken to 
make a man of him, and the spirit in which the 
painter sometimes endeavoured to repair this 
mishap was altogether benevolent, though the 
form was frequently roughs Waterlow combined 
in an odd manner many of the forms of the 
Parisian studio with the moral and social ideas 
of Brooklyn, Long Island, where his first seeds 
had been implanted. 

Qaston Probert desired nothing better than to 
be a man; what bothered him (and it is perhaps 
a proof that his instinct was gravely at fault), 
was a certain vagueness as to the constituents of 
this personage. He should be made more nearly, 
as it seemed to him, a brute were he to sacrifice 
in such an effort the decencies and pieties — 
holy things all of them — in which he had been 



76  



reared. It was very well for Waterlow to say 
that to be a genuine man it was necessary to 
be a little of a brute ; his friend was willing, in 
theory, to assent even to that. The difficulty 
was in application, in practice — as to which the 
painter declared that all that would be simple 
enough if it only didn't take so much account 
of the marchioness, the countess and — what was 
the other one ? — the duchess. These young ameni- 
ties were exchanged between the pair (while 
Gaston explained, almost as eagerly as if he were 
, scoring a point, that the other one was only a 
haronne), during that brief journey to Spain of 
which mention has already been made, during 
the later weeks of the summer, after their 
return (the young men spent a fortnight together 
on the coast of Brittany), and above all during 
the autumn, when they were settled in Paris 
for the winter, when Mr. Dosson had reappeared, 
according to the engagement with his daughters, 
when the sittings for the portrait had multiplied 
(the painter was unscrupulous as to the number 
he demanded), and the work itself, bom under 
a happy star, took on more and more the aspect 
of a masterpiece. It was at Grenada that Gaston 
really broke out; there, one balmy night, he 
communicated to his companion that he would 
marry Francina Dosson or would never marry any 
one. The declaration was the more striking as it 
came after an interval ; many days had elapsed 



THE REVERBEKATOR. 77 



since their separation from the young lady and 
many new and beautiful objects had engaged 
their attention. It appeared that poor Probert 
had been thinking of her all the while, and he 
let his friend know that it was that dinner at 
Saint Germain that had finished him. What she 
had been there Waterlow himself had seen : he 
would not controvert the proposition that she 
had been irresistible. 

In November, in Paris (it was months and weeks 
before the artist began to please himself), the 
enamoured youth came very often to the Avenue 
de Villiers, toward the end of a sitting ; and until 
it was finished, not to disturb the lovely model, 
he cultivated conversation with the elder sister : 
Gaston Probert was capable of that. Delia was 
always there of course, but Mr. Dosson had not 
once turned up and the newspaper man happily 
appeared to have taken himself off. The new 
aspirant learned in fact from Miss Dosson that a 
crisis in the affairs of his journal had recalled him 
to the seat of that publication. When the young 
ladies had gone (and when he did not go with 
them — he accompanied them not rarely), the 
visitor was almost lyrical in his appreciation of 
his friend's work; he had no jealousy of the in- 
sight which enabled him to reconstitute the girl 
on, canvas with that perfection. He knew that 
Waterlow painted her too well to be in love with 
her and that if he himself could have attacked 



78  

her in that fashion he would not have wanted to 
marry her. She bloomed there, on the easel, 
as brightly as in life, and the artist had caught 
the sweet essence of her beauty. It was exactly 
the way in which her lover would have chosen 
that she should be represented, and yet it had 
required a perfectly independent hand. Gaston 
Probert mused on this mystery and somehow 
felt proud of the picture and responsible for it, 
though it was as little his property, as yet, as 
the young lady herself. 

When, in December, he told Waterlow of his 
plan of campaign the latter said, " I will do any- 
thing in the world you like — anything you think 
will help you — ^but it passes me, my dear fellow 
why in the world you don't go to them and say, 
' I've seen a girl who is as good as cake and pretty 
as fire, she exactly suits me, I've taken time to 
think of it and I know what I want : therefore I 
propose to make her my wife. If you happen to 
like her so much the better ; if you don't be so 
good as to keep it to yourselves.' That is much 
the most excellent way. Why, gracious heaven, 
all these mysteries and machinations ? " 

*' Oh, you don't understand, you don't under- 
stand ! " sighed Gaston Probert, with many wrinkles 
on his brow. " One can't break with one's traditions 
in an hour, especially when there is so much in 
them that one likes. I shall not love her more if 
they like her, but I shall love them more, and 



 79 

I caxe about that. You talk as a man who has 
nothing to consider. I have everything to con- 
sider — and I am glad I have. My pleasure in 
marrying her will be double if my father and my 
sisters accept her, and I shall greatly enjoy work- 
ing out the business of bringing them round." 
There were moments when Charles Wateilow 
resented the very terminology of his friend : he 
hated to hear a man talk about the woman he 
loved being *' accepted." If one accepted her one's 
self or, rather, were accepted by her, that ended 
the matter, and the effort to bring round those 
who gave her the cold shoulder was scarcely con- 
sistent with self-respoct. Probert explained that 
of course he knew his relatives would only have 
to know Francina to like her, to delight in her; 
but that to know her they would first have to make 
her acquaintance. This was the delicate point, for 
social commerce with such people as Mr. Dosson 
and Delia was not in the least in their usual line 
and it was impossible to disconnect the poor girl 
from her appendages. Therefore the whole question 
must be approached by an oblique movement; it 
would never do to march straight up to it. The 
wedge should have a narrow end and Gaston was 
ready to declare that he had found it. His sister 
Susan was another name for it; he would break 
her in first and she would help him to break in 
the others. She was his favourite relation, his 
intimate friend — the most modern, the most 



80 THE REVERBEKATOR. 



Parisian and inflammable member of the family, 
She was not reasonable but she was perceptive; 
she had imagination and humour and was capable 
of generosity and enthusiasm and even of in- 
fatuation. She had bad her own infatuations and 
ought to allow for those of others. She would not 
like the Dossons superficially any better than his 
father or than Margaret or Jane (he called these 
ladies by their English names, but for themselves, 
their husbands, their friends and each other they 
were Suzanne, Marguerite and Jeanne) ; but there 
was a considerable chance that he might induce 
her to take his point of view. She was as fond of 
beauty and of the arts as he was ; this was one of 
their bonds of union. She appreciated highly 
Charles Waterlow's talent and there had been a 
good deal of talk about his painting her portrait. 
It is true her husband viewed the project with so 
much colder an eye that it had not been carried 
out. 

According to Gaston's plan she was to come 
to the Avenue de Villiers to see what the artist 
had done for Miss Francie ; her brother was to 
have stimulated her curiosity by his rhapsodies, 
in advance, rhapsodies bearing wholly upon the 
work itself, the example of Waterlow*s powers, 
and not upon the young lady, whom he was not 
to let her know at first that he had so much as 
seen. Just at the last, just before her visit, he 
was to tell her that he had met the girl (at the 



 81 



studio), and that she was as remarkable in her 
way as the picture. Seeing the picture and hear- 
ing this, Mme. de Brdcourt, as a disinterested 
lover of charming impressions, would express a 
desire also to enjoy a sight of so rare a creature ; 
upon which Waterlow was to say that that would 
be easy if she would come in some day when Miss 
Francie was sitting. He would give her two or 
three dates and Gaston would see that she didn't 
let the opportunity pass. She would return alone 
(this time he wouldn't go with her), and she 
would be as much struck as he hoped. Everything 
depended on that, but it couldn't fail. The girl 
would have to captivate her, but the girl could 
be trusted, especially if she didn't know who the 
demonstrative French lady was, with her fine plain 
face, her hair so flaxen as to be nearly white, her 
vividly red lips and protuberant, light-coloured 
eyes. Waterlow was to do no introducing and 
to reveal the visitor's identity only after she 
had gone. This was a charge he grumbled at; 
he called the whole business an odious comedy, 
but his friend knew that if he undertook it he 
would acquit himself honourably. After Mme. 
de Br&ourt had been captivated (the question of 
whether Francie would be so received in advance 
no consideration), her brother would throw oflf the 
mask and convince her that she must now work 
with him. Another meeting would be arranged 
for her with the girl (in which each would appear 

G 



82  

in her proper character), and in short the plot 
would thicken. 

Gaston Probert's forecast of his difficulties 
revealed a considerable faculty for analysis, but 
that was not rare enough in the French composition 
of things to make his friend stare. He brought 
Suzanne de Br^court, she was enchanted with 
the portrait of the little American, and the 
rest of the drama began to follow in its order. 
Mme. de Br^court raved, to Waterlow's face (she 
had no opinions behind people's backs), about 
his mastery of his craft ; she could say flattering 
things to a man with an assurance altogether 
her own. She was the reverse of egotistic 
and never spoke of herself; her success in life 
sprang from a much cleverer selection of her 
pronouns. Waterlow, who liked her and wanted 
to paint her ugliness (it was so charming, as he 
would make it), had two opinions about her — 
one of which was that she knew a hundred times 
less than she thought (and even than her brother 
thought), of what she talked about; and the 
other that she was after all not such a humbug 
as she seemed. She passed in her family for a 
rank radical, a bold Bohemian; she picked up 
expressions out of newspapers, but her hands and 
feet were celebrated, and her behaviour was not. 
That of her sisters, as well, had never been 
effectively exposed. 

" But she must be charming, your young lady," 



 83 

she said to Gaston, while she turned her head 
this way and that as she stood before Francie's 
image. "She looks like a piece of sculpture — 
or something cast in silver — of the time of 
Francis the First; something of Jean Goujon 
or Germain Pilon." The young men exchanged 
a glance, for this happened to be a capital com- 
parison, and Gaston replied, in a detached way, 
that she was well worth seeing. 

He went in to have a cup of tea with his sister 
on the day he knew she would have paid her 
second visit to the studio, and the first words she 
greeted him with were — "But she is admirable 
— voire petite — admirable, admirable ! '' There 
was a lady calling in the Place Beauvau at the 
moment — old Mme. d'Outreville, and she naturally 
asked who was the object of such enthusiasm. 
Gaston suffered Susan to answer this question; 
he wanted to hear what she would say. She 
described the girl almost as well as he would 
have done, from the point of view of the plastic, 
with a hundred technical and critical terms, and 
the old lady listened in silence, solemnly, rather 
coldly, as if she thought such talk a good deal of 
a galimatias: she belonged to the old-fashioned 
school and held that a young lady was sufficiently 
catalogued when it was said that she had a 
dazzling complexion or the finest eyes in the world. 

'' Qu'est'Ce que c*est qioe cette merveilleV she 
inquired ; to which Mme. de Br^court replied 

G 2 



84  



that it was a little American whom her brother 
had dug up. "And what do you propose to do 
with her, may one ask?" Mme. d'Outreville 
demanded, looking at Gaston Probert with an eye 
which seemed to read his secret, so that for half 
a minute he was on the point of breaking out : 
" I propose to marry her — ^there ! " But he con- 
tained himself, only mentioning for the present 
that he aspired to ascertain to what uses she was 
adapted; meanwhile, he added, he expected to 
look at her a good deal, in the measure in which 
she would allow him. "Ah, that may take you 
far!" the old lady exclaimed, as she got up to 
go ; and Gaston glanced at his sister, to see if this 
idea struck her too. But she appeared almost 
provokingly exempt from alarm : if she had been 
suspicious it would have been easier to make 
his confession. When he came back from ac- 
companying Mme. d'Outreville to her carriage 
he asked her if the girl at the studio had known 
who she was and if she had been frightened. 
Mme. de Br^court stared ; she evidently thought 
that kind of sensibility implied an initiation 
which a little American, accidentally encountered, 
could not possibly have. '*Why should she be 
frightened? She wouldn't be even if she had 
known who I was; much less therefore when I 
was nothing for her." 

"Oh, you were not nothing for her!" Gaston 
declared; and when his sister rejoined that he 



 85 



was too amiable he brought out his revelation. 
He had seen the young lady more often than he 
had told her ; he had particularly wished that she 
should see her. Now he wanted his father and 
Jane and Margaret to do the same, and above all 
he wanted them to like her, even as she, Susan, 
liked her. He was delighted that she had been 
captivated — he had been captivated himself. Mme. 
de Br^court protested that she had reserved her 
independence of judgment, and he answered that 
if she had thought Miss Dosson repulsive she 
might have expressed it in another way. When 
she inquired what he was talking about and 
what he wanted them all to do with her. Ire 
said : " I want you to treat her kindly, tenderly, 
for such as you see her I am thinking of making 
her my wife." 

"Mercy on us — you haven't asked her?" cried 
Mme. de Br^court. 

" No, but I have asked her sister what she would 
say, and she tells me there would be no difficulty." 

"Her sister? — the little woman with the big 
head ? " 

" Her head is rather out of drawing, but it isn't 
a part of the affair. She is very inoffensive and 
she would be devoted to me." 

" For heaven's sake then keep quiet. She is as 
common as a dressmaker's bill." 

" Not when you know her. Besides, that has 
nothing to do with Francie. You couldn't find 



86  



words enough a moment ago to say that Francie is 
exquisite, and now you will be so good as to stick 
to that. Come, be intelligent ! " 

*' Do you call her by her little name, like that ? " 
Mme. de Brfoourt asked, giving him another cup 
of tea. 

" Only to you. She is perfectly simple. It is 
impossible to imagine anything better. And think 
of the deUght of having that charming object 
before one's eyes — always, always ! It makes a 
different thing of the future." 

" My poor child," said Mme. de Br^court, " you 
can't pick up a wife like that — the first little 
American that comes along. You know I hoped 
you wouldn't marry at all — what a pity I think it 
— for a man. At any rate, if you expect us to 
like Miss — what's her name? — Miss Fancy, all I 
can say is we won't. We can't ! " 

*' I shall marry her then without your approba- 
tion." 

" Very good. But if she deprives you of that 
(you have always had it, you are used to it, it's a 
part of your life), you will hate her at the end of 
a month." 

" I don't care. I shall have had my month." 

" And she — poor thing ? " 

" Poor thing, exactly ! You will begin to pity 
her, and that will make you cultivate her, and that 
will make you find how adorable she is. Then 
you'll like her, then you'll love her, then you'll see 



 87 



how discriminating I have been, and we shall all 
be happy together again." 

" But how can you possibly know, with such 
people, what you have got hold of?" 

" By having the sense of delicate things. You 
pretend to have it, and yet in such a case as this 
you try to be stupid. Give that up ; you might 
as well first as last, for the girls an irresistible fact 
and it will be better to accept her than to let her 
accept you." 

Gaston's sister asked him if Miss Dosson had 
a fortune, and he said he knew nothing about 
that. Her father apparently was rich, but he 
didn't mean to ask for a penny with her. 
American fortunes moreover were the last things 
to count upon ; they had seen too many ex- 
amples of that. "Papa will never listen to 
that," Mme. de Br^court replied. 

" Listen to what ? " 

" To your not finding out — to your not asking 
for settlements — comme cela se fait.*' 

*' Excuse me, papa will find out for himself; and 
he will know perfectly whether to ask or whether 
to leave it alone. That's the sort of thing he does 
know. And he also knows perfectly that I am 
very difficult to place." 

" To place ? " 

"To find a wife for. Tm neither fish nor flesh. 
I have no country, no career, no future; I offer 
nothing ; I bring nothing. What position under 
the sun do I confer ? There's a fatuity in our 



88  



talking as if we could make grand terms. You 
and the others are well enough : qui prend mari 
pi'end pays, and you have names which (at least so 
your husbands say) are tremendously illustrious. 
But papa and I — I ask you 1 " 

" As a family nous sommes trls-hien*' said Mme. 
de Br^court. " You know what we are — it doesn't 
need any explanation. We are as good as anything 
there is and have always been thought so. You 
might do anything you like." 

" Well, I shall never take to marry a French- 



woman." 



It 



Thank you, my dear!" Mme. de Br^court 
exclaimed. 

" No sister of mine is really French," returned 
the young man. 

"No brother of mine is really mad. Marry 
whomever you like," Susan went on ; " only let her 
be the best of her kind. Let her be a lady. Trust me, 
I've studied life. That's the only thing that's safe." 

"Francie is the equal of the first lady in the land." 

"With that sister — with that hat? Never — 
never ! " 

" What's the matter with her hat ? " 

" The sister's told a story. It was a document 
— it described them, it classed them. And such a 
dialect as they speak ! " 

" My dear, her English is quite as good as yours. 
You don't even know how bad yours is," said 
Gaston Probert. 

" Well, I don't say ' Parus ' and I never asked 



 89 



an Englishman to marry me. You know what our 
feelings are," his companion pursued ; "our con- 
victions, our susceptibilities. We may be wrong 
— we may be hollow — we may be pretentious ; we 
may not be able to say on what it all rests ; but 
there we are, and the fact is insurmountable. It 
is simply impossible for us to live with vulgar 
people. It's a defect, no doubt ; it's an immense 
inconvenience, and in the days we live in it's sadly 
against one's interest. But we are made like that 
and we must understand ourselves. It's of the 
very essence of our nature, and of yours exactly as 
much as of mine or of that of the others. Don't 
make a mistake about it — you'll prepare for 
yourself a bitter future. I know what becomes of 
us. We su£Fer, we go through tortures, we die ! " 

The accent of passionate prophecy was in Mme. 
de Br^court's voice, but her brother made her no 
immediate answer, only indulging restlessly in 
several turns about the room. At last he observed, 
taking up his hat: "I shall come to an under- 
standing with her to-morrow, and the iiext day, 
about this hour, I shall bring her to see you. 
Meanwhile please say nothing to any one." 

Mme. de Br^court looked at him a moment; 
he had his hand on the knob of the door. " What 
do you mean by her father's appearing rich ? 
That's such a vague term. What do you suppose 
his means to be ? " 

" Ah, that's a question 8he would never ask I " 
cried the young man, passing out. 



VI. 



The next morning he found himself sitting on 
one of the red satin sofas beside Mr. Dosson, in 
this gentleman's private room at the Hotel de 
rUnivers et de Cheltenham. Delia and Francie 
had established their father in the old quarters; 
they expected to spend the winter in Paris but 
they had not taken independent apartments, for 
they had an idea that when you lived that way it 
was grand but lonely— you didn't meet people on 
the staircase. The temperature was now such as 
to deprive the good gentleman of his usual re- 
source of sitting in the court, and he had not yet 
discovered an eflfective substitute for this recrea- 
tion. Without Mr. Flack, at the cafes, he felt too 
much like a non-consumer. But he was patient 
and ruminant ; Gaston Probert grew to like him 
and tried to invent amusements for him ; took him 
to see the great markets, the sewers and the Bank 
of France, and put him in the way of acquiring 
a beautiful pair of horses (it is perhaps not super- 



THE REVERBERATOE. 91 



fluous to say that this was a perfectly straight 
proceeding on the young man's part), which Mr. 
Dosson, little as he resembled a sporting character, 
found it a welcome pastime on fine afternoons to 
drive, with a highly scientific hand, from a smart 
Am^ricaine, in the Bois de Boulogne. There was 
a reading-room at the banker's, where he spent 
hours engaged in a manner best known to himself, 
and he shared the great interest, the constant topic 
of his daughters — the portrait that was going 
forward in the Avenue de Villiers. This was the 
subject round which the thoughts of these young 
ladies clustered and their activity revolved; it 
gave a large scope to their faculty for endless re- 
petition, for monotonous insistence, for vague and 
aimless discussion. On leaving Mme. de Br^court 
Francie's lover had written to Delia that he de- 
sired half an hour's private conversation with her 
father on the morrow at half-past eleven ; his im- 
patience forbade him to wait for a more canonical 
hour. He asked her to be so good as to arrange 
that Mr. Dosson should be there to receive him 
and to keep Francie out of the way. Delia ac- 
quitted herself to the letter. 

" Well, sir, what have you got to show ? " asked 
Francie's father, leaning far back on the sofa and 
moving nothing but his head, and that very little, 
toward his interlocutor. Probert was placed side- 
wise, a hand on each knee, almost facing him, 
on the edge of the seat. 



92  



" To show, sir — what do you mean ? " 

*.* What do you do for a living ? How do you 
subsist ? " 

" Oh, comfortably enough. Of course it would 
be criminal in you not to satisfy yourself on that 
point. My income is derived from three sources. 
First, some property left me by my dear mother. 
Second, a legacy from my poor brother, who had 
inherited a small fortune from an old relation of 
ours who took a great fancy to him (he went to 
America to see her), and which he divided among 
the four of us in the will he made at the time of 
the war." 

" The war — what war ? " asked Mr. Dosson. 

" Why the Franco-German " 

** Oh, that old war ! " And Mr. Dosson almost 
laughed. " Well ?" he softly continued. 

" Then my father is so good as to make me a 
little allowance ; and some day I shall have more 
— from him." 

Mr. Dosson was silent a moment; then he 
observed, " Why, you seem to have fixed it so you 
live -mostly on other folks." 

"I shall never attempt to live on you, sir!" 
This was spoken with some vivacity by our young 
man ; he felt the next moment that he had said 
something that might provoke a retort. But his 
companion only rejoined, mildly, impersonally : 

" Well, I guess there won't be any trouble about 
that. And what does my daughter say ? " 



 93 

" I haven't spoken to her yet." 

" Haven't spoken to her ? " 

"I thought it more orthodox to break ground 
with you first." 

** Well, when I was after Mrs. Dosson I guess I 
spoke to her quick enough," Francie's father said, 
humorously. There was an element of reproach 
in this aud Qaston Probert was mystified, for the 
inquiry about his meaus a moment before had 
been in the nature of a challenge. " How will you 
feel if she won t have you, after you have exposed 
yourself this way to me ? " the old gentleman 
went on. 

" Well, I have a sort of confidence. It may be 
vain, but God grant not ! I think she likes me 
personally, but what I am afraid of is that she 
may consider that she knows too little about me. 
She has never seen my people — she doesn't know 
what may be before her." 

** Do you mean your family — the folks at home ? " 
said Mr. Dosson. " Don't you believe that. Delia 
has moused around — she has found out. Delia's 
thorough ! " 

" Well, we are very simple, kindly, respectable 
people, as you will see in a day or two for your- 
self. My father and sisters will do themselves the 
honour to wait upon you," the young man de- 
clared, with a temerity the sense of which made 
his voice tremble. 

" We shall be very happy to see them, sir," Mr. 



94 THE KEVERBERATOE. 

Dosson returned, cheerfully. '* Well now, let's 
see," he added, musing sociably. "Don't you 
expect to embrace any regular occupation ? " 

Probert looked at him, smiling. " Have you 
anything of that sort, sir ? " 

" Well, you have me there ! " Mr. Dosson ad- 
mitted, with a comprehensive sigh. " It doesn't 
seem as if I inquired anything, I'm looked after 
so well. The fact is the girls support me." 

** I shall not expect Miss Francie to support 
me," said Gaston Probert. 

"You're prepared to enable her to live in the 
style to which she's accustomed ? " And Mr. 
Dosson turned a speculative eye upon him. 

" Well, I don't think she will miss anything. 
That is, if she does she will find other things 
instead." 

"I presume she'll miss Delia, and even me, a 
little." 

^' Oh, it's easy to prevent that," said Gaston 
Probert. 

" Well, of course we shall be on hand. Con- 
tinue to reside in Paris ? " Mr. Dosson went on. 

*'I will live anywhere in the world she likes. 
Of course my people are here — that's a great tie. 
I am not without hope that it may — with time — 
become a reason for your daughter." 

" Oh, any reason'U do where Paris is concerned. 
Take some lunch ? " Mr. Dosson added, looking at 
his watch. 



 95 

They rose to their feet, but before they had 
gone many steps (the meals of this amiable family . 
were now served in an adjoining room), the young 
man stopped his companion. "I can't tell you 
how kind I think it — the way you treat me, and 
how I am touched by your confidence. You take 
me just as I am, with no recommendation beyond 
my own word." 

"Well, Mr. Probert, if we didn't like you we 
wouldn't smile on you. Recommendations in that 
case wouldn't be any good. And since we do like 
you there ain't any call for them either. I trust 
my daughters ; if I didn't I'd have stayed at home. 
And if I trust them, and they trust you, it's the 
same as if / trusted you, ain't it ? " 

" I guess it is 1 " said Gaston, smiling. 

E[is companion laid his hand on the door but 
he paused a moment. " Now are you very sure ? " 

" I thought I was, but you make me nervous." 

" Because there was a gentleman here last year 
— I'd have put my money on him" 

" A gentleman — last year ? " 

" Mr. Flack. You met him surely. A very fine 
man. I thought she favoured him." 

** Seigneur Dieu!" Gaston Probert murmured, 
under his breath. 

Mr. Dosson had opened the door, he made his 
companion pass into the little dining-room, where 
the table was spread for the noon-day breakfast. 
"Where are the chickens?" he inquired, disap- 



96  



pointedly. Gaston thought at first that he missed 
a dish from the board, but he recognised the next 
moment the old man's usual designation of his 
daughters. These young ladies presently came in, 
but Francie looked away from Mr. Probert. The 
suggestion just dropped by her father had given 
him a shock (the idea of the girl's " favouring " the 
newspaper-man was inconceivable), but the charm- 
ing way she avoided his eye convinced him that 
he had nothing to fear from Mr. Flack. 

That night (it had been an exciting day), Delia 
remarked to her sister that of course she could 
draw back : upon which Francie repeated the 
expression, interrogatively, not understanding it. 
"You can send him a note, saying you won't," 
Delia explained. 

" Won't marry him ? " 

" Gracious, no ! Won't go to see his sister. You 
can tell him it's her place to come to see you 
first." 

" Oh, I don't care," said Francie, wearily. 

Delia looked at her a moment very gravely. " Is 
that the way you answered him when he asked 
you ? " 

''I'm sure I don't know. He could tell you 
best." 

" If you were to speak to me that way I should 
have said, * Oh, well, if you don't want it any more 
than that ! ' " 

" Well, I wish it was you," said Francie. 



 97 

" That Mr. Probert was me ? " 

" No; that you were the one he liked." 

'Francie Dosson, are you thinking of Mr. 
Flack ? " her sister broke out, suddenly. 

" No, not much." 

" Well then, what's the matter ? " 

" You have ideas and opinions ; you know whose 
place it is and what's due and what isn't. You 
could meet them all." 

" Why, how can you say, when that's just what 
I'm trying to find out ! " 

" It doesn't matter any way ; it will never come 
off," said Francie. 

'* What do you mean by that ? " 

" He'll give me up in a few weeks. I shall do 
something." 

** If you say that again I shall think you do it on 
purpose 1 " Delia declared. " Are you thinking of 
George Flack ? " she repeated in a moment. 

" Oh, do leave him alone ! " Francie replied, in 
one of her rare impatiences. 

" Then why are you so queer ? " 

" Oh, I'm tired ! " said Francie, turning away. 
And this was the simple truth ; she was tired of 
the consideration her sister saw fit to devote to the 
question of Mr. Probert's not having, since their 
return to Paris, brought his belongings to see them. 
She was overdone with Delia's theories on this 
subject, which varied from day to day, from the 
fissertion that he was keeping his intercourse with 

H 



98  

his American friends hidden from them because 
they were uncompromising, in their grandeur, to 
the doctrine that that grandeur would descend 
some day upon the HStel de TUnivers et de Chel- 
tenham and carry Francie away in a blaze of glory. 
Sometimes Delia put forth the view that they 
ought to make certain of (jaston's omissions the 
ground of a challenge ; at other times she opined 
that they ought to take no notice of them. Francie, 
in this connection, had no theories, no impulses of 
her own ; and now she was all at once happy and 
freshly glad and in love and sceptical and fright- 
ened and indifferent. Her lover had talked to her 
but little about his kinsfolk, and she had noticed 
this circumstance the more because of a remark 
dropped by Charles Waterlow to the effect that he 
and his father were great friends : the word seemed 
to her odd in that application. She knew Qaston 
saw that gentleman, and the exalted ladies Mr. 
Probert's daughters, very often, and she therefore 
took for granted that they knew he saw her. But 
the most he had done was to say they would come 
and see her like a shot if once they should believe 
they could trust her. She had wished to know 
what he meant by their trusting her, and he had 
explained that it would appear to them too good to 
be true — that she should be kind to him : some- 
thing exactly of that sort was what they dreamed 
of for him. But they had dreamed before and been 
disappointed, and now they were on their guard. 



 99 

From the moment they should feel they were on 
solid ground they would join hands and dance 
round her. Francie's answer to this fanciful state- 
ment was that she didn't know what the young 
man was talking ahout, and he indulged in no at- 
tempt on that occasion to render his meaning more 
clear ; the consequence of which was that he felt 
he made a poor appearance. His uneasiness had 
not passed away, for many things in truth were 
dark to him. He could not see his father fraternis- 
ing with Mr. Dosson, he could not see Margaret and 
Jane recognising an alliance in which Delia was 
one of the allies. He had answered for them be- 
cause that was the only thing to do ; and this only 
just failed to be criminally reckless. What saved 
it was the hope he founded upon Mme. de Br^court 
and the sense of how well he could answer to the 
others for Francie. He considered that Susan had, 
in her first judgment of this young lady, committed 
herself; she had really comprehended her, and her 
subsequent protest when she found what was in 
his heart had been a retractation which he would 
make her in turn retract. The girl had been re- 
vealed to her, and she would come round. A 
simple interview with Francie would suffice for this 
result : he promised himself that at the end of half 
an hour she should be an enthusiastic convert. At 
the end of an hour she would believe that she her- 
self had invented the match — ^had discovered the 
damseL He would pack her off to the others as 

h2 



100 THE EEVERBERATOR. 



the author of the project; she would take it all 
upon herself, would represent her brother even as 
a little tepid. She would show nothing of that sort, 
but boast of lier wisdom and energy ; and she would 
enjoy the comedy so that she would forget she 
had opposed him even for a moment. Qaston 
Probert was a very honourable young man, but his 
programme involved a good many fibs. 



'W » 



VII. 



It may as well be said at once that it was even- 
tually carried out, and that in the course of a 
fortnight old Mr. Probert and his daughters alighted 
successively at the H6tel de TUnivers et de Chel- 
tenham. Francie*s visit with her intended to Mme. 
de Br^court bore exactly the fruit the young man 
had foreseen and was followed the very next day by 
a call from this lady. She took Francie out with 
her in her carriage and kept her the whole after- 
noon, driving her over half Paris, chattering with 
her, kissing her, delighting in her, telling her they 
were already sisters, payiug her compliments which 
made the girl envy her art of beautiful expression. 
After she had carried her home the countess rushed 
off to her father's, reflecting with pleasure that at 
that hour she should probably find her sister Mar- 
guerite there. Mme. de Cliche was with the old 
man in fact (she had three days in the week for 
coming to the Cours la Heine); she sat near 
him in the firelight, telling him presumably her 



102  

troubles ; for Maximo do Cliche was not quite the 
pearl that they originally had supposed. Mme. de 
Br^court knew what Marguerite did whenever she 
took that little ottoman and drew it close to her 
father's chair : she gave way to her favourite vice, 
that of dolefulness, which lengthened her long face 
more; it was unbecoming, if she only knew it. 
The family was intensely united, as we know ; but 
that did not prevent Mme. de Br^court's having a 
certain sympathy for Maxime : he too was one of 
themselves and she asked herself what she would 
have done if she had been a well-constituted man 
with a wife whose cheeks were like decks in a high 
sea. It was the twilight hour in the winter days, 
before the lamps, that especially brought her out ; 
then she began her plaintive, complicated stories, 
to which her father listened with such angelic 
patience. Mme. de Br^court liked his particular 
room in the old house in the Cours la Reine ; it 
reminded her of her mother's life and her young 
days and her dead brother and the feelings con- 
nected with her first going into the world. Al- 
phonse and she had had an apartment, by her 
father's kindness, under that familiar roof, so that 
she continued to pop in and out, full of her fresh 
impressions of society, just as she had done when 
she was a girl. She broke into her sister's confi- 
dences now ; she announced her trouvaille and did 
battle for it bravely. 

Five days later (there had been lively work in 



 103 

the meantime ; Gaston turned so pale at moments 
that she feared it would all result in a mortal illness 
for him and Marguerite shed gallons of tears), Mr. 
Probert went to see the Dossons with his son. 
Mme. de Br&ourt paid them another visit, a kind 
of official affair as she deemed it, accompanied by 
her husband ; and the Baron de Douves and his 
wife, written to by Gaston, by his father and by 
Margaret and Susan, came up from the country 
full of tension and responsibility. M. de Douves 
was the person who took the family, all round, most 
seriously and most deprecated anything in the 
nature of crude and precipitate action. He was a 
very small black gentleman, with thick eyebrows 
and high heels (in the country, in the mud, he wore 
sahots with straw in tliem), who was suspected by 
his friends of believing that he looked like Louis 
XIV. It is perhaps a proof that something of the 
quality of this monarch was really recognised in 
him that no one had ever ventured to clear up this 
point by a question. "Zafamille c'est moi" ap- 
peared to be his tacit formula, and he carried his 
umbrella (he had very bad ones), with a kind of 
sceptral air. Mme. de Br^court went so far as to 
believe that his wife, in confirmation of this, took 
herself in a manner for Mme. de Maintenon : she 
had lapsed into a provincial existence as she might 
have harked back to the seventeenth century ; the 
world she lived in seemed about as far away. She 
was the largest, heaviest member of the family, 



104 THE EEVERBERATOR. 

and in the Vendue she was thought majestic, in 
spite of old clothes, of which she was fond and 
which added to her look of having come down from 
a remote past or reverted to it. She was at bottom 
an excellent woman, but she wrote roy smd/oy like 
her husband, and the action of her mind was 
wholly restricted to questions of relationship and 
alliance. She had an extraordinary patience of 
research and tenacity of grasp of a clue, and viewed 
people solely in the light projected upon them by 
others; that is, not as good or wicked, ugly or 
handsome, wise or foolish, but as grandsons, 
nephews, uncles and aunts, brothers and sisfcers-in- 
law, cousins and second cousins. There was a 
certain expectation that she would leave memoirs. 
In Mme. de Brecourt's eyes this pair were very 
shabby, they did not payer de mine — they fairly 
smelt of their province ; "but for the reality of the 
thing," she often said to herself, " they are worth 
all of us. We are diluted and they are pure, and 
any one with an eye would see it." " The thing '* 
was the legitimist principle, the ancient faith and 
even, a little, the grand air. 

The Marquis de Cliche did his duty with his 
wife, who mopped the decks, as Susan said, for 
the occasion, and was entertained in the red satin 
drawing-room by Mr. Dosson, Delia and Francie. 
Mr. Dosson wanted to go out when he heard of 
the approach of Gaston's relations, and the young 
man had to instruct him that this wouldn't do. 



THE BEVEEBERATOR. 105 

The apartment in question had had a various ex- 
perience, but it had probably never witnessed 
stranger doings than these laudable social efforts. 
Gaston was taught to feel that his family made a 
great sacrifice for him, but in a very few days he 
said to himself that he was safe, now they knew 
the worst. They made the sacrifice, they definitely 
agreed to it, but they judged it well that he should 
measure the full extent of it. ** Gaston must 
never, never, never be allowed to forget what we 
have done for him : " Mme. de Brecourt told him 
that Marguerite de Cliche had expressed herself 
in that sense, at one of the family conclaves from 
which he had been absent. These high commis- 
sions sat, for several days, with great frequency, 
and the young man could feel that if there was 
help for him in discussion his case was promis- 
ing. He flattered himself that he showed infinite 
patience and tact, and his expenditure of the latter 
quality in particular was in itself his only reward, 
for it was impossible he should tell Francie what 
arts he had to practise for her. He liked to think 
however that he practised them successfully ; for 
he held that it was by such arts the civilised man 
is distinguished from the savage. What they cost 
him was made up simply in this — that his private 
irritation produced a kind of cheerful glow in 
regard to Mr. Dosson and Delia, whom he could not 
defend nor lucidly explain nor make people like, 
but whom he had ended, after so many days of 



108  

familiar intercourse, by liking extremely himself. 
The way to get on with them — ^it was an immense 
cimplification — was just to love them ; one could 
do that even if one couldn't talk with them. He 
succeeded in making Mme. de Br^court seize this 
nuance; she embraced the idea with her quick 
inflammability. " Yes," she said, " we must insist 
on their positive, not on their negative merits: 
their infinite generosity, their native delicacy. 
Their native delicacy, above all; we must work 
that ! " And the brother and sister excited each 
other magnanimously to this undertaking. Some- 
times, it must be added, they exchanged a glance 
which expressed a sudden slightly alarmed sense 
of the responsibility they had put on. 

On the day Mr. Probert called at the H6tel de 
rUnivers et de Cheltenham with his son, the 
pair walked away together, back to the Cours la 
Beine, without any immediate conversation. All 
that was said was some words of Mr, Probert's, 
with Gaston's rejoinder, as they crossed the 
Place de la Concorde. 

" We should have to have them to dinner." 
The young man noted his father's conditional, 
as if his acceptance of the Dossons were not yet 
complete; but he guessed all the same that the 
sight of them had not made a difference for the 
worse : they had let the old gentleman down more 
easily than was to have been feared. The call 
had not been noisy — a confusion of sounds ; which 



 107 

was very happy, for Mr. Probert was particular in 
this — ^he could bear French noise but he could not 
bear American. As for English, he maintained that 
there was none. Mr. Dosson had scarcely spoken to 
him and yet had remained perfectly placid, which 
was exactly what Gaston would have chosen. 
Francie's lover knew moreover (though he was a 
little disappointed that no charmed exclamation 
should have been dropped as they quitted the hotel), 
that her spell had worked : it was impossible the 
old man should not have liked her. 

"All, do ask them, and let it be very soon," 
he replied. "They'll like it so much" 

"And whom can they meet — ^who can meet 
them t " 

" Only the family — ^all of us : au complet. Other 
people we can have later." 

"All of us, au complet — that makes eight. And 
the three of them," said Mr. Probert. Then he 
added, " Poor creatures ! " This exclamation gave 
Gaston much pleasure ; he passed his hand into his 
father's arm. It promised well ; it denoted a senti- 
ment of tenderness for the dear little Dossons, con- 
fronted with a row of fierce French critics, judged 
by standards that they had never even heard of. 
The meeting of the two parents had not made the 
problem of their commerce any more clear; 
but young Probert was reminded freshly by his 
father's ejaculation of that characteristic kindness 
which was really what he had built upon. The 



108  



old gentleman, heaven knew, had prejudices, 
but if they were numerous, and some of them very 
curious, they were not rigid. He had also such nice 
inconsistent feelings, such irrepressible indulgences, 
and they would ease everj^thing off. He was in 
short an old darling, and with an old darling, 
in the long run, one was always safe. When 
they reached the house in the Cours la Keine 
Mr. Probert said : " I think you told me you are 
dining out." 

" Yes, with our friends." 

" * Our friends ? * Comme vcms y allez ! Come 
in and see me, then, on your return ; but not later 
than half-past ten." 

From this the young man saw that he had 
swallowed the dose ; if he had made up his mind 
that it wouldn't do he would have announced 
the circumstance without more delay. This re- 
flection was most agreeable, for Gaston was per- 
fectly aware of how little he himself would have 
enjoyed a struggle. He would have carried it 
through, but he could not bear to think of it, and 
the sense that he was spared it made him feel at 
peace with all the world. The dinner at the hotel 
became a little banquet in honour of this state 
of things, especially as Francie and Delia raved, 
as they said, about his papa. 

" Well, I expected something nice, but he goes 
far beyond," Delia remarked. " That's my idea of 
a gentleman." 



 109 

" Ah, for that 1 " said Gaston. 

" He's so sweet. I'm not a bit afraid of him/* 
Francie declared. 

" Why should you be ? " 

" Well, I am of you," the girl went on. 

*' Much you show it 1 " her lover exclaimed. 

"Yes, I am," she insisted, "at the bottom 
of all." 

" Well, that's what a lady should be— of her 
husband." 

" Well, I don't know ; I'm more afraid than that. 
You'll see." 

*' I wish you were . afraid of talking nonsense," 
said Gaston Probert. 

Mr. Dosson made no observation whatever about 
their honourable visitor ; he listened in genial, un- 
prejudiced silence. It is a sign of his prospective 
son-in-law's perfect comprehension of him that 
Gaston knew this silence not to be in any degree 
restrictive : it did not mean that he had not been 
pleased. Mr. Dosson had simply nothing to say ; 
he had not, like Gaston, a sensitive plate in his 
brain, and the important events of his life had 
never been personal impressions. His mind had 
had absolutely no history of that sort, and Mr. 
Probert's appearance had not produced a revolution. 
If the young man had asked him how he liked 
his father he would have said, at the most, " Oh, 
I guess he's all right ! " But what was more 
candid even than this, in Gaston's view (and it 



110 THE REVEBBERATOR. 

was quite touchingly so), was the attitude of the 
good gentleman and his daughters toward the 
others, Mesdames de Douves, de Br^court and de 
Cliche and their husbands, who had now all filed 
before them. They believed that the ladies and 
the gentlemen alike had covered them with en- 
dearments, were candidly, gushingly glad to make 
their acquaintance. They had not in the least 
seen what was manner, the minimum of decent 
profession, and what the subtle resignation of old 
races who have known a long historical discipline 
and have conventional forms for their feelings — 
forms resembling singularly little the feelings 
themselves. Francie took people at their word 
when they told her that the whole manUre d*itre 
of her family inspired them with an irresistible 
sympathy : that was a speech of which Mme. de 
Cliche had been capable, speaking as if for all the 
Proberts and for the old noblesse of France. It 
would not have occurred to the girl that such things 
need have been said as a mere garniture. Her 
lover, whose life had been surrounded with garni- 
ture and who therefore might have been expected 
not to notice it, had a fresh sense of it now : he 
reflected that manner might be a very misleading 
symbol, might cover pitfalls and bottomless gulfs, 
when it had attained that perfection and corre- 
sponded so little to fact. What he had wanted 
was that his people should be very civil at the 
hotel ; but with such a high standard of compli- 



 Ill 

ment where after all was sincerity ? And without 
sincerity how could people get on together when 
it came to their settling down to common life ? 
Then the Dossons might have surprises, and the 
surprises would be painful in proportion as their 
present innocence was great. As to the high 
standard itself there was no manner of doubt ; it 
was magnificent in its way. 



VIII. 

When, on coming home the evening after his 
father had made the acquaintance of the Dossons, 
Gaston went into the room in which the old man 
habitually sat, Mr. Probert said, laying down his 
book and keeping on his glasses : '' Of course you 
will go on living with me. You must understand 
that I don't consent to your going away. You 
will have to occupy the rooms that Susan and 
Alphonse had." 

Qaston observed with pleasure the transition 
from the conditional to the future and also the 
circumstance that his father was quietly reading, 
according to his custom when he sat at home of 
an evening. This proved he was not too much 
off the hinge. He read a great deal, and very 
serious books ; works about the origin of things — 
of man, of institutions, of speech, of religion. 
This habit he had taken up more particularly 
since the circle of his social life had grown so 
much smaller. He sat there alone, turning his 



THE REVEEBEEATOE. 113 

pages softly, contentedly, with the lamp-light 
shining on his refined old head and embroidered 
dressing-gown. Formerly he was out every night 
in the week — Gaston was perfectly aware that to 
many dull people he must even have appeared a 
little frivolous. He was essentially a social 
animal, and indeed — except perhaps poor Jane, 
in her damp old castle in Brittany — they were 
all social animals. That was doubtless part of 
the reason why the family had acclimatised itself 
in France. They had affinities with a society of 
conversation; they liked general talk and old 
high salons, slightly tarnished and dim, containing 
precious relics, where there was a circle round the 
fire and winged words flew about and there was 
always some clever person before the chimney- 
piece, holding or challenging the rest. That 
figure, Gaston knew, especially in the days before 
he could- see for himself, had very often been his 
father, the lightest and most amiable specimen of 
the tjrpe that liked to take possession of the 
hearthrug. People left it to him; he was so 
transparent, like a glass screen, and he never 
triumphed in argument. His word on most 
subjects was not felt to be the last (it was usually 
not more conclusive than a shrugging, inarticulate 
resignation, an *'Ah, you know, what will you 
have ? ") ; but he had been none the less a part of 
the essence of some dozen good houses, most of 
them over the river, in the conservative faubowrg, 

I 



114  

and several to-day emptied receptacles, extin- 
guished fires. They made up Mr. Probert's world 
— a world not too small for him and yet not too 
large, though some of them supposed themselves 
to be very great institutions. Gaston knew the 
succession of events that had helped to make a 
difference, * the most salient of which were the 
death of his brother, the death of his mother and 
above all perhaps the extinction of Mme. de 
Marignac, to whom the old gentleman used still 
to go three or four evenings out of the seven 
and sometimes even in the morning besides. 
Gaston was well aware what a place she had held 
in his father's life and affection, how they had 
grown up together (her people had been friends 
of his grandfather when that fine old Southern 
worthy came, a widower with a young son and 
several negroes, to take his pleasure in Paris in 
the time of Louis Philippe), and how much she 
had had to do with marrying his sisters. He was 
not ignorant that her friendship and aU its 
exertions were often mentioned as explaining 
their position, so remarkable in a society in which 
they had begun after all as outsiders. But he 
would have guessed, even if he had not been told, 
what his father said to that. To offer the Proberts 
a position was to carry water to the fountain ; they 
had not left their own behind them in Carolina ; 
it had been large enough to stretch across the 
sea. As to what it was in Carolina there was no 



 115 

need of being explicit. This adoptive Parisian was 
by nature presupposing, bat he was admirably gentle 
(that was why they let him talk to them before 
the fire — ^he was such a sympathising oracle), and 
after the death of his wife and of Mme. de 
Marignac, who had been her friend too, he was 
gentler than before. Gaston had been able to see 
that it made him care less for everything (except 
indeed the true faith, to which he drew still closer), 
and this increase of indifference doubtless helped 
to explain his collapse in relation to common 
Americans. 

" We shall be thankful for any rooms you will 
give us," the young man said. "We shall fill 
out the house a little, and won't that be rather 
an improvement, shrunken as you and I have 
become ? " 

" You will fill it out a good deal, I suppose, with 
Mr. Dosson and the other girl." 

"Ah, Francie won't give up her father and 
sister, certainly; and what should you think of 
her if she did ? But they are not intrusive ; they 
are essentially modest people; they won't put 
themselves upon us. They have great natural 
discretion." 

" Do you answer for that ? Susan does ; she is 
always assuring one of it," Mr, Probert said. 
" The father has so much that he wouldn't even 
speak to me." 

" He didn't know what to say to you»'* 

I 2 



116  

" How then shall I know what to say to him ? " 

" Ah, you always know ! " Qaston exclaimed. 

"How will that help us if he doesn't know 
what to answer ? " 

" You will draw him out — ^he is full of bonhomie" 

" Well, I won't quarrel with your honhomme (if 
he's silent — there are much worse faults), nor even 
with the fat young lady, though she is evidently 
vulgar. It is not for ourselves I am afraid ; it's 
for them. They will be very unhappy." 

" Never, never ! " said Gaston. " They are too 
simple. They are not morbid. And don't you 
like Francie ? You haven't told me so," he added 
in a moment. 

" She says * Parus,' my dear boy." 

"Ah, to Susan too that seemed the principal 
obstacle. But she has got over it. I mean Susan 
has got over the obstacle. We shall make her 
speak French; she has a capital disposition for 
it ; her French is already almost as good as her 
English." 

" That oughtn't to be difficult. What will yoD 
have ? Of course she is very pretty and I'm sure 
she is good. But I won't tell you she is a marvel, 
because you must remember (you young fellows 
think your own point of view and your own expe- 
rience everything), that I have seen beauties with- 
out number. I have known the most charming 
women of our time — women of an order to which 
Miss Francie, con rispetto parlando, will never 



 117 

begin to belong. I'm difficult about women — how 
can I help it ? Therefore when you pick up a little 
American girl at an inn and bring her to us as a 
miracle, I feel how standards alter. J*ai vu mieux 
que fa, mon cher. However, I accept everything 
to-day, as you know ; when once one has lost one's 
enthusiasm everything is the same, and one might 
as well perish by the sword as by famine." 

" I hoped she would fascinate you on the spot," 
Gaston remarked, rather ruefully. 

" * Fascinate ' — the language you fellows use ! " 

" Well, she will yet." 

" She will never know at least that she doesn't : 
I will promise you that," said Mr. Probert. 

"Ah, be sincere with her, father — she's worth 
it 1 " his son broke out. 

When the old gentleman took that tone, the 
tone of vast experience and a fastidiousness justi- 
fied by ineffable recollections, Gaston was more 
provoked than he could say, though he was also 
considerably amused, for he had a good while since 
made up his mind that there was an element of 
stupidity in it. It was fatuous to square one's 
self so serenely in the absence of a sense : so far 
from being fine it was gross not to feel Francie 
Dosson. He thanked God he did. He didn't 
know what old frumps his father might have fre- 
quented (the style of 1830, with long curls in 
front, a vapid simper, a Scotch plaid dress and a 
body, in a point suggestive of twenty whalebones, 



118  

coming down to the knees), but he could remem- 
ber Mme. de Marignac's Tuesdays and Thursdays 
and Fridays, with Sundays and other days thrown 
in, and the taste that prevailed in that milieu: 
the books they admired, the verses they read and 
recited, the pictures, great heaven ! they thought 
good, and the three busts of the lady of the house, 
in different corners (as a Diana, a Druidess and a 
CroyarUe : her shoulders were supposed to make up 
for her head), effigies which to-day — even the least 
bad, Canova's — would draw down a public casti- 
gation upon their authors. 

** And what else is she worth ? " Mr. Probert 
asked, after a momentary hesitation. 

" How do you mean, what else ? " 

" Her immense prospects, that's what Susan has 
been putting forward. Susan's insistence on them 
was mainly what brought over Jane. Do you 
mind my speaking of them ? " 

Gaston was obliged to recognise, privately, the 
importance of Jane's having been brought over, 
but he hated to hear it spoken of as if he were 
under an obligation to it. " To whom, sir ? " he 
asked. 

"Oh, only to you." 

" You can't do less than Mr. Dosson. As I told 
you, he waived the question of money and he was 
superb. We can't be more mercenary than he," 

" He waived the question of his own, you mean ?" 
said Mr. Probert. 



 1]9 

"Yes, and of yours. But it will be all right.' 
The young man flattered himself that that was as 
far as he was willing to go, in the way of bribery. 

"Well, it's your affair — or your sisters'," hia 
father returned. " It's their idea that it will be 
all right." 

" I should think they would be weary of chat- 
tering ! " Gaston exclaimed, impatiently. 

Mr. Probert looked at him a moment with a 
vague surprise, but he only said, " I think they 
are. But the period of discussion is over. We 
have taken the jump." He added, in a moment, 
as if from the desire to say something more con- 
ciliatory : " Alphonse and Maxime are quite of 
your opinion." 

" Of my opinion ? " 

" That she is charming." 

" Confound them, then, I'm not of theirs ! " 
The form of this rejoinder was childishly perverse, 
and it made Mr. Probert stare again ; but it be- 
longed to one of the reasons for which his children 
regarded him as an old darling that Gaston could 
feel after an instant that he comprehended it. 
The old man said nothing, but took up his book, 
and his son, who had been standing before the fire, 
went out of the room. His abstention from pro- 
test at Gaston's petulance was the more commend- 
able as he was capable, for his part, of thinking it 
important that ces messieurs should like the little 
girl at the hotel. Gaston was not, and it would 



120  

have seemed to him a proof that he was in servi- 
tude indeed if he had accepted such an assurance 
as that as if it mattered. This was especially the 
case as his father's mention of the approval of 
two of his brothers-in-law appeared to point to a 
possible disapproval on the part of the third. 
Francie's lover cared as little whether she dis- 
pleased M. de Br^court as he cared whether she 
displeased Maxime and Eaoul. The old gentleman 
continued to read, and in a few moments Gaston 
came back. He had expressed surprise, just before, 
that his sisters should have found so much to dis- 
cuss in the idea of his marriage, but he looked at 
his father now with an air of having more to say 
— an intimation that the subject must not be con- 
sidered as exhausted. *' It seems rather odd to 
me that you should all appear to accept the step 
I am about to take as a sort of disagreeable neces- 
sity, when I myself hold that I have been so 
exceedingly fortunate/' 

Mr. Probert lowered his book accommodatingly 
and rested his eyes upon the fire. "You won't 
be content till we are enthusiastic. She seems a 
good girl certainly, and in that you are fortunate." 

" I don't think you can tell me what would be 
better — what you would have preferred," said the 
young man. 

" What I would have preferred ? In the first 
place you must remember that I was not madly 
impatient to see you married," 



 121 



" I can imagine that, and yet I can't imagine 
that, as things have turned out, you shouldn't be 
struck with the felicity. To get something so 
charming, and to get it of our own species." 

"Of our own species? Tudieu!** said Mr. 
Probert looking up. 

" Surely it is infinitely fresher and more amusing 
for me to marry an American. There's a dreari- 
ness in the way we have Gallicised." 

"Against Americans I have nothing to say; 
some of them are the best thing the world contains. 
That's precisely why one can chobse. They are 
far from being all like that." 

"Like what, dear father?" 

" Comine ces gens-la. You know that if they 
were French, being otherwise what they are, 
one wouldn't look at them." 

"Indeed one would; they would be such 
curiosities." 

" Well, perhaps they are sufficiently so as it is," 
said Mr. Probert, with a little conclusive sigh. 

" Yes, let them pass for that. They will sui-prise 
you." 

"Not too much, I hope!" cried the old man, 
opening his volume again. 

It will doubtless not startle the reader to learn 
that the complexity of things among the Proberts 
was such as to make it impossible for Gaston to 
proceed to the celebration of his nuptials, with 
all the needful circumstances of material prepara^ 



122  

tion and social support, before some three months 
should have expired. He chafed however but 
moderately at the delay, for he reflected that it 
would give Francie time to endear herself to his 
whole circle. It would also have advantages for 
the Dossons; it would enable them to establish 
by simple but efifective arts the modus vivendi 
with that rigid body. It would in short help 
every one to get used to everything. Mr. Dosson's 
designs and Delia's took no articulate form ; what 
was mainly clear to Gaston was that his fiiture 
wife's relatives had as yet no sense of disconnec- 
tion. He knew that Mr. Dosson would do what- 
ever Delia liked and that Delia would like to 
** start " her sister. Whether or no she expected 
to be present at the finish, she had a definite J 

purpose of seeing the beginning of the race. Mr. 1 

Probert notified Mr. Dosson of what he proposed 
to " do " for his son, and Mr. Dosson appeared 
more amused than anything else at the news. 
He announced, in return, no intentions in regard 
to Francie, and his queer silence was the cause 
of another convocation of the house of Probert. 
Here Mme. de Br^court's valorous spirit won an- 
other victory ; she maintained, as she informed her i 
brother, that there was no possible policy but a 1 
policy of confidence. " Lord help us, is that what 
they call confidence ? " the young man exclaimed, 
guessing the way they all looked at each other; i 
and he wondered how they would look next at 



 123 



poor Mr. Dosson. Fortunately he could always fall 
back, for reassurance, upon that revelation of their 
perfect manners; though indeed he thoroughly 
knew that on the day they should really attempt 
interference — make a row which might render 
him helpless and culminate in a rupture — their 
courtesy would show its finest flower. 

Mr. Probert's property was altogether in the 
United States : he resembled various other persons 
to whom American impressions are mainly accept- 
able in the form of dividends. The manner in 
which he desired to benefit his son on the occasion 
of the latter's marriage rendered certain visitations 
and reinvestments necessary in that country. It 
had long been his conviction that his affairs needed 
looking into; they had gone on for years and 
years without an overhauling. He had thought 
of going back to see, but now he was too old and 
too tired and the effort was impossible. There was 
nothing for it but for Gaston to go, and go quickly, 
though the moment was rather awkward. The idea 
was communicated to him and the necessity ac- 
cepted ; then the plan was relinquished : it seemed 
such a pity he should not wait till after his marriage, 
when he would be able to take Francie with 
him. Francie would be such an introducer. This 
postponement would have taken effect had it not 
suddenly come out that Mr. Dosson himself wanted 
to go for a few weeks, in consequence of some 
news (it was a matter of business), that he had un- 



124  

expectedly received. It was further revealed that 
that course presented difficulties, for he could not 
leave his daughters alone, especially in such a 
situation. Not only would such a proceeding 
have given scandal to the Proberts, but Gaston 
learned, with a good deal of surprise and not a 
little amusement, that Delia, in consequence of 
peculiar changes now wrought in her view of 
things, would have felt herself obliged to protest 
on the score of propriety. He called her 
attention to the fact that nothing would be more 
simple than, in the interval, for Francie to go 
and stay with Susan or Margaret ; Delia herself in 
that case would be free to accompany her father. 
But this young lady declared that nothing would 
induce her to quit the European continent until she 
had seen her sister through, and Gaston shrank 
from proposing that she too should spend five weeks 
in the Place Beauvau or the Rue de Lille. 
Moreover he was startled, he was a good deal 
mystified, by the perverse, unsociable way in which 
Francie asserted that, as yet, she would not lend 
herself to any staying. After, if he liked, but 
not till then. And she would not at the moment 
give the reasons of her refusal ; it was only very 
positive and even quite passionate. 

All this left her intended no alternative but 
to say to Mr. Dosson, '' I am not such a fool as 
I look. If you will coach me properly, and trust 
me, I will rush across and transact your business 



THE EEVERBERATOR. 125 

as well as my father's." Strange as it appeared, 
Francie could resign herself to this separation 
from her lover — ^it would last six or seven weeks 
— rather than accept the hospitality of his 
sisters. Mr. Dosson trusted him; he said to him, 
*• Well, sir, you've got a big brain," at the end of 
a morning they spent with papers and pencils; 
upon which Gaston made his preparations to sail. 
Before he left Paris Francie, to do her justice, 
confided to him that her objection to going in 
such an intimate way even to Mme. de Br^court's 
had been founded on a fear that in close quarters 
she would do something that would make them 
all despise her. Gaston replied, in the first place, 
that this was gammon and in the second he wanted 
to know if she expected never to be in close 
quarters with her new kinsfolk. "Ah, yes, but 
Ln it will be safer-we shaU be married!" she 
returned. This little incident occurred three days 
before the young man started ; but what happened 
just the evening previous was that, stopping 
for a last word at the H6tel de TUnivers et de 
Cheltenham on his way to take the night express 
to London (he was to sail from Liverpool), he 
found Mr. George Flack sitting in the red satin 
saloon. The correspondent of the Reverberator 
had come back. 



IX. 



Mr. Flack's relations with his old friends did 
not, after his appearance in Paris, take on that 
familiarity and frequency -which had marked their 
intercourse a year before : he let them know 
frankly that he could easily see the situation was 
quite diflferent. They had got into the high set 
and they didn't care about the past : he alluded 
to the past as if it had been rich in mutual vows, 
in pledges now repudiated. " What's the matter ? 
Won't you come round there with us some day ? " 
Mr. Dosson asked ; not having perceived for him- 
self any reason why the young journalist should 
not be a welcome and congruous figure in the 
Cours la Heine. 

Delia wanted to know what Mr. Flack was 
talking about : didn't he know a lot of people 
that they didn't know and wasn't it natural they 
should have their own society ? The young man's 
treatment of the question was humorous, and it 
was with Delia that the discussion mainly went 



THE KEVERBERATOR. 127 

forward. When lie maintained that the Dossons 
had " shed *' him, Mr. Dosson exclaimed, " Well, I 
guess you'll grow again ! " And Francie observed 
that it was no use for him to pose as a martyr, in- 
asmuch as he knew perfectly well that with all 
the celebrated people he saw and the way he flew 
round he had the most enchanting time. She was 
aware she was a good deal less accessible than she 
had been the previous spring, for Mesdames de 
Br^court and de Cliche (the former much more 
than the latter) took a considerable number of her 
hours. In spite of her protest to Gaston against 
a premature intimacy with his >sisters, she spent 
whole days in their company (they had so much 
to tell her about what her new life would be, and 
it was generally very pleasant), and she thought it 
would be nice if in these intervals he should give 
himself to her father and even to Delia as he used 
to do. 

But the flaw of a certain insincerity in Mr. 
Flack's nature seemed to be established by his 
present tendency to rare visits. He evidently 
did not care for her father for himself, and though 
Mr. Dosson was the least querulous of men she 
divined that he suspected their old companion 
had fallen away. There were no more wanderings 
in public places, no more tryings of new caf^s. 
Mr. Dosson used to look sometimes as he had 
looked of old when George Flack " located " them 
somewhere ; as jf he expected to see their sharp 



128  

cicerone rashing back to them, with his drab over- 
coat flying in the wind; but this expectation 
usually died away. He missed Gaston because 
Gaston this winter had so often ordered his dinner 
for him, and his society was not sought by the count 
and the marquis, whose mastery of English was 
small and their other distractions great. Mr. Pro- 
bert, it was true, had shown something of a frater- 
nising spirit; he had come twice to the hotel, since 
his son's departure, and he had said, smiling and 
reproachful, "You neglect us, you neglect us!" 
Mr. Dosson had not understood what he meant 
by this till Delia explained after the visitor with- 
drew, and even then the remedy for the neglect, 
administered two or three days later, had not 
borne any particular fruit. Mr. Dosson called 
alone, instructed by his daughter, in the Cours la 
Reine, but Mr. Probert was not at home. He only 
left a card, on which Delia had superscribed in 
advance the words " So sorry ! " Her father had 
told her he would give the card if she wanted, but 
he would have nothing to do with the writing. 
There was a discussion as to whether Mr. Probert's 
remark was an allusion to a deficiency of polite- 
ness on the article of his sons-in-law. Ought not 
Mr. Dosson perhaps to call personally, and not 
simply through the medium of the visits paid by 
his daughters to their wives, on Messieurs de 
Br&jourt and de Cliche ? Once, when this sub- 
ject came up in George Flack's presence, the old 



 129 

man said he would go round if Mr. Flack would 
accompany him. " All right ! " said Mr. Flack, 
and this conception became a reality, with the 
accidental abatement that the objects of the de- 
monstration were absent. " Suppose they get in ? " 
Delia had said lugubriously to her sister. 

" Well, what if they do ? " Francie asked. 

" Why, the count and the marquis won't be 
interested in Mr. Flack." 

"Well then, perhaps he will be interested in 
them. He can write something about them. 
They will like that." 

" Do you think they would ? " Delia demanded, 
in solemn dubiousness. 

" Why, yes, if he should say fine things." 

" They do like fine things," said Delia. " They 
get off so many themselves. Only the way Mr. 
Flack does it — it's a different ^tyle." 

*' Well, people like to be praised in any style." 

" That's so," Delia rejoined, musingly. 

One afternoon, coming in about three o'clock, 
Mr. Flack found Francie alone. She had ex- 
pressed a wish, after luncheon, for a couple of 
hours of independence : she intended to write to 
Gaston, and having accidentally missed a post 
promised herself that her letter should be of 
double its usual length. Her companions re- 
spected her desire for solicitude, Mr. Dosson taking 
himself ofif to his daily session in the reading-room 
of the American bank and Delia (the girls had 

K 



130  

now a luxurious coach at their command) driving 
away to the dressmaker's, a frequent errand, to 
superintend and ux^e forwani the progress of her 
sister's wedding-clothes. Francie was not skilled 
in composition ; she wrote slowly and in address- 
ing her lover had a painful sense of literary re- 
sponsibility. Her father and Delia had a theory 
that when she shut herself up that way she poured 
forth wonderful pages — it was part of her high 
cultivation. At any rate, when George Flack was 
ushered in she was still bending over her blotting- 
book on one of the gilded tables and there was an 
inkstain on her pointed forefinger. It was no dis- 
loyalty to Qaston but only at the most a sense of 
weariness in regard to the epistolary form that 
made her glad to see her visitor. She didn't know 
how to finish her letter ; but Mr. Flack seemed in 
a manner to terminate it. 

" I wouldn't have ventured to propose this, but I 
guess I can do with it, ntJw it's come," the young 
man announced. 

" What can you do with ? " she asked, wiping 
her pen. 

"Well this happy chance. Just you and me 
together." 

" I don't know what it's a chance for." 

" Well, for me to be a little less miserable for a 
quarter of an hour. It makes me so to see you 
look so happy." 

" It makes you miserable ? " 



 131 

" You ought to understand, when I say some- 
thing magnanimous." And settling himself on 
the sofa Mr. Flack continued, " Well, how do you 
get on without Mr. Probert ? " 

" Very well indeed, thank you/' 

The tone in which th6 girl spoke was not an en- 
couragement to free pleasantry, so that if Mr. Flack 
continued his inquiries it was in a guarded and 
respectful manner. He was eminently capable of 
reflecting that it was not in his interest to strike 
her as indiscreet and profane ; he only wanted to 
appear friendly, worthy of confidence. At the 
same time he was not averse to the idea that she 
should still perceive in him a certain sense of in- 
jury, and that could be indicated only by a touch 
of bitterness here and there. The injury, the 
bitterness might make her pity him. " Well, you 
are in the grand Tnonde, I suppose," he resumed at 
last, not with an air of derision but resignedly, 
sympathetically. 

" Oh, Tm not in anything ; I'm just where I Ve 
always been." 

" Tm sorry ; I hoped you would tell me about 
it," said Mr. Flack, gravely. 

" You think too much of that. What do you 
want to know about it for ? " 

" Dear Miss Francie, a poor devil of a journalist 
who has to get his living by studying up things, 
he has to think too much, sometimes, in order to 

K 2 



132  

think, or at any rate to do, enough. We find out 
what we can — as we can/' 

Francie listened to this as if it had had 
the note of pathos. "What do you want to 
study up ? " 

"Everything! I take in everything. It all 
depends on my oppoi-tunity. I try and leam — I 
try and improve. Every one has something to 
tell, and I listen and watch and make my profit 
of it. I hoped yov, would have something to tell. 
I don't believe but what youVe seen a good deal 
of new life. You won't pretend they haven't 
roped you in, charming as you are." 

" Do you mean if they've been kind to me ? 
They've been very kind," Francie said. " They 
want to do even more than I'll let them." 

" Ah, why won't you let them ? " George Flack 
asked, almost coaxingly. 

"Well, I do," the girl went on. "You can't 
resist them, really ; they have such lovely ways." 

"I should like to hear you talk about their 
ways," her companion observed, after a silence. 

"Oh, I could talk enough if once I were to 
begin. But I don't see why it should interest 
you." 

"Don't I care immensely for everything that 
concerns you ? Didn't I tell you that once ? " 

" You're foolish if you do, and you would be 
foolish to say it again," Francie replied. 

" Oh, I don't want to say anything, I've had my 



 133 



lesson. But I could listen to you all day." Francie 
gave an exclamation of impatience and incredulity 
and Mr. Flack pursued: *' Don't you remember 
what you told me that time we had that talk at 
Saint-Germain, on the terrace ? You said I might 
remain your friend." 

" Well, that's all right,'' said the girl 

"Then ain't we interested in the development 
of our friends — in their impressions, their trans- 
formations, their adventures ? Especially a person 
like me, who has got to know life — who has got 
to know the world." 

*' Do you mean to say I could teach you about 
life ? " Francie demanded. 

" About some kinds, certainly. You know a 
lot of people whom it's difficult to get at unless 
one takes some extraordinary measures, as you 
have done." 

" What do you mean ? What measures have I 
taken ? " 

" Well, they have — to get hold of you — and it's 
the same thing. Pouncing on you, to secure you ; 
I call that energetic, and don't you think I ought 
to know ? " asked Mr. Flack, smiling. " I thought 
/ was energetic, but they got ahead of me. 
They're a society apart, and they must be very 



curious." 



" Yes, they're curious," Francie admitted, with a 
little sigh. Then she inquired : " Do you want to 
put them in the paper ? " 



134  



George Flack hesitated a moment ; the air of 
the question was so candid, suggested so complete 
an exemption from prejudice. "Oh, I'm very 
careful about what I put in the paper. I want 
everything, as I told you : don't you remember 
the sketch I gave you of my ideals ? But I want 
it in a certain particular way. If I can't get it in 
the shape I like it I don't want it at all ; genuine, 
first-hand information, straight from the tap, is 
what I'm after. I don't want to hear what some 
one or other thinks that some one or other was 
told that some one or other repeated ; and above 
all I don't want to print it. There's plenty of 
that flowing in, and the best part of the job is to 
keep it out. People just yearn to come in ; they're 
dying to, all over the place ; there's the biggest 
crowd at the door. But I say to them : * You've 
got to do something first, then I'll see ; or at any 
rate you've got to be something ! ' " 

" We sometimes see the Reverberator ; you have 
some fine pieces," Francie replied. 

" Sometimes, only ? Don't they send it to your 
father — the weekly edition? I thought I had 
fixed that," said George Flack. 

" I don't know ; it's usually lying round. But 
Delia reads it more than I; she reads pieces 
aloud. I like to read books ; I read as many as 
I can." 

" Well, it's all h'terature," said Mr. Flack ; " it's 
all the press, the great institution of our time. 



 135 

Some of the finest books have come out first in 
the papers. It's the history of the age." 

" I see you've got the same aspirations," Francie 
remarked, kindly. 

" The same aspirations ? " 

*' Those you told me about that day at Saint- 
Germain." 

" Oh, I keep forgetting that I ever broke out to 
you that way ; everything is so changed." 

" Are you the proprietor of the paper now ? " 
the girl went on, determined not to notice this 
sentimental allusion. 

" What do you care ? It wouldn't even be 
delicate in me to tell you ; for I do remember the 
way you said you would try and get your father to 
help me. Don't say you've forgotten it, because 
you almost made me cry. Any way, that isn't the 
sort of help I want now and it wasn't the sort of 
help I meant to ask you for then. I want sympathy 
and interest ; I want some one to whisper once in 
a while — ' Courage, courage ; you'll come out all 
right.' You see I'm a working man and I don't 
pretend to be anything else," Mr. Flack went on. 
" I don't live on the accumulations of my ancestors. 
What I have I earn — what I am I've fought 
for : I'm a travailleur, as they say here. I rejoice 
in it ; but there is one dark spot in it, all the 
same." 

" And what is that ? " asked Francie. 

" That it makes you ashamed of me." 



13G  

" Oh, how can you say ? " And she got up, as 
if a sense of oppression, of vague discomfort, 
had come over her. Her visitor made her 
fidgety. 

" You wouldn't be ashamed to go round with 
me?'' 

" Round where ? " 

"Well, anywhere: just to have one more walk. 
The very last." George Flack had got up too and 
he stood there looking at her with his bright eyes, 
with his hands in the pockets of his overcoat. As 
she hesitated he continued, " Then I*m not such 
a friend after all." 

Francie rested her eyes for a moment on the 
carpet ; then, raising them — " Where should you 
like to go?" 

" You could render me a service — a real service 
— without any inconvenience, probably, to yourself. 
Isn't your portrait finished ? " 

*' Yes, but he won't give it up." 

" Who won't give it up ? " 

"Why, Mr. Waterlow. He wants to keep it 
near him to look at in case he should take a fancy 
to change it. But I hope he won't change it — it's 
so pretty as it is ! " Francie declared, smiling. 

" I hear it's magnificent, and I want to see it," 
said George Flack. 

'* Then why don't you go ? " 

" I'll go if you'll take me ; that's the service 
you can render me." 



THE EEVERBERATOR. 137 

" Why, I thought you went everywhere — into 
the palaces of kings ! " Francie cried. 

" I go where I'm welcome, not where I'm not. 
I don't want to push into that studio alone ; he 
doesn't like me. Oh, you needn't protest," the 
young man went on ; " if one is sensitive one is 
sensitive. I feel those things in the shade of a 
tone of voice. He doesn't like newspaper-men. 
Some people don't, you know. I ought to tell you 
that frankly." 

Francie considered again, but looking this time 
at her visitor. " Why, if it hadn't been for you " — 
I am afraid she said '' hadn't have been " — " I 
never would have sat to him." 

Mr. Flack smiled at her in silence for an instant. 
" If it hadn't been for me I think you never would 
have met your future husband." 

^' Perhaps not," said Francie ; and suddenly she 
blushed red, rather to her companion's surprise. 

" I only say that to remind you that after all I 
have a right to ask you to show me this one little 
favour. Let me drive with you to-morrow, or next 
day or any day, to the Avenue de Villiers, and I 
shall regard myself as amply repaid. With you I 
sha'n't be afraid to go in, for you have a right to 
take any one you like to see your picture. It's 
always done." 

"Oh, the day you're afraid, Mr. Flack — ! '' 
Francie exclaimed, laughing. She had been 
much struck by his reminder of what they all 



138  

owed him ; for he truly had been their initiator, 
the instrument, under providence, that had opened 
a great new interest to them, and it shocked her 
generosity, the intimation that he saw himself 
cast oflf or disavowed after the prize was gained. 
Her mind had not lingered on her personal in- 
debtedness to him, for it was not in the nature of 
her mind to linger ; but at present she was glad 
to spring quickly, at the first word, into the attitude 
of acknowledgment. It had the eflfect that simpli- 
fication always has, it raised her spirits, made her 
merry. 

" Of course I must be quite square with you," 
the young man said. ** If I want to see the picture 
it's because I want to write about it. The whole 
thing will go bang into the Reverberator. You 
must understand that, in advance. I wouldn't 
write about it without seeing it.'' 

*' J^e&p^re lien ! " said Francie, who was getting 
on famously with her French. " Of course if you 
praise him Mr. Waterlow will like it." 

" I don't know that he cares for my praise and 
I don't care much whether he likes it or not. If 
you like it, that's the principal thing." 

" Oh, I shall be awfully proud." 

" I shall speak of you personally — I shall say 
you are the prettiest girl that has ever come over." 

" You may say what you like," Francie rejoined. 
" It will be immense fun to be in the newspapers. 
Come for me at this hour day after to-morrow." 



THE KEVERBERATOR. 139 



" You're too kind," said George Flack, taking up 
his hat. He smoothed it down a moment, with 
his glove ; then he said — " I wonder if you will 
mind our going alone ? '* 

" Alone ? " 

" I mean just you and me," 

"Oh, don't you be afraid! Father and Delia 
have seen it about thirty times." 

" That will be delightful, then. And it will 
help me to feel, more than anything else could 
make me do, that we are still old friends. I'll 
come at 3.15," Mr. Flack went on, but without 
even yet taking his departure. He asked two 
or three questions about the hotel, whether it 
were as good as last year and there were 
many people in it and they could keep their 
rooms warm ; then, suddenly, in a different 
order and scarcely waiting for the girl's answer, he 
said : " And now, for instance, are they very 
bigoted? That's one of the things I should 
like to know." 

"Very bigoted?" 

" Ain't they tremendous Catholics — always 
talking about the Holy Father, and that sort of 
thing ? I mean Mr. Probert, the old gentleman," 
Mr. Flack added. " And those ladies, and all the 
rest of them." 

" They are very religious," said Francie. " They 
are the most religious people I ever saw. They 
just adore the Holy Father. They know him 



140 THE EEVERBERATOR. 



personally quite well. They are always going 
down to Rome." 

" And do they mean to introduce you to him ? " 

" How do you mean, to introduce me ? " 

"Why, to make you a Catholic, to take you 
also down to Rome/* 

" Oh, we are going to Rome for our voyage de 
noces!" said Francie, gaily. "Just for a peep." 

"And won't you have to have a Catholic 
marriage? They won't consent to a Protestant 
one." 

" We are going to have a lovely one, just like 
one that Mme. de Br^court took me to see at 
the Madeleine." 

"And will it be at the Madeleine too?" 

" Yes, unless we have it at Notre Dame." 

" And how will your father and sister like that ? " 

" Our having it at Notre Dame ? " 

"Yes, or at the Madeleine. Your not having 
it at the American church." 

"Oh, Delia wants it at the best place," said 
Francie, simply. Then she added; "And you 
know father ain't much on religion." 

" Well now, that's what I call a genuine fact, 
the sort I was talking about," Mr. Flack replied. 
Whereupon he at last took himself oflf, repeating 
that he would come in two days later, at 3.15 
sharp. 

Francie gave an account of his visit to her 
sister, on the return of the latter young lady, and 



 141 

mentioned the agreejient they had come to in 
relation to the drive. Delia, at this, looked grave, 
asseverating that she didn't know that it was right 
(" as " it was right, Delia usually said,) that Francie 
should be so intinLate with other gentlemen 
after she was engaged. 

" Intimate ? You wouldn't think it's very 
intimate if you were to see me ! " cried Francie, 
laughing. 

" I'm sure I don't want to see you," Delia 
declared; and her sister, becoming strenuous, 
authoritative, went on : " Delia Dosson, do you 
realise that if it hadn't been for Mr. Flack we 
would never have had that picture, and that if it 
hadn't been for that picture I should never have 
got engaged ? '* 

" It would have been better if you hadn't, if 
that's the way you are going to behave. Nothing 
would induce me to go with you." 

This was what suited Francie; but she was 
nevertheless struck by Delia's rigidity. " I'm only 
going to take him to see Mr. Wateriow," she 
explained. 

" Has he become all of a sudden too shy to go 
alone ? " 

" Well, you know Mr. Wateriow doesn't like 
him — and he has made him feel it. You know 
Gaston told us so." 

" He told us he couldn't bear him : that's what 
he told us," said Delia. 



142 THE EEVERBERATOR. 

" All the more reason I should be kind to him. 
Why, Delia, do realise," Fraocie went on. 

" That's just what I do,'* returned the elder girl; 
" but things that are very diflferent from those you 
want me to. You have queer reasons." 

" I have others too that you may like better. 
He wants to put a piece in the paper about it." 
. *' About your picture ? *' 

"Yes, and about me. All about the whole 
thing." 

Delia stared a moment. " Well, I hope it will 
be a good one ! " she said with a little sigh of 
resignation, as if she were accepting the burden of 
a still larger fate. 



X. 



When Francie, two days later, passed with Mr. 
Flack into Charles Waterlow's studio she found 
Mme. de Cliche before the great canvas. She was 
pleased by every sign that the Proberts took an 
interest in her, and this was a considerable 
symptom, Gaston's second sister's coming all that 
way (she lived over by the Invalides) to look at the 
portrait once more. Francie knew she had seen it 
at an earlier stage ; the work had excited curiosity 
and discussion among the Proberts from the first of 
their making her acquaintance and they went into 
considerations about it which had not occurred to 
the original and her companions — frequently 
(as we know) as these good people had conversed 
on the subject. Qaston had told her that opinions 
diflfered much in the family as to the merit of 
the work and that Margaret, precisely, had gone 
so far as to say that it might be a masterpiece 
of tone but it didn't make her look like a lady. 
His father on the other hand had no objection to 



144  



offer to the character in which it represented her 
but he didn't think it well painted. *' Begardez- 
moi fa, et ga, ct fa, je votes demande ! " he had 
exclaimed, making little dashes at the canvas, to- 
ward spots that appeared to him eccentric, with his 
glove, on occasions when the artist was not at 
hand. The Proberts always fell into French when 
they spoke on a question of art. " Poor dear papa, 
he only understands le vieux j&ii, ! " Gaston had ex- 
plained, and he had still further to expound what 
he meant by the old game. The novelty of Charles 
Waterlow's game had already been a mystifica- 
tion to Mr. Probert. 

Francie remembered now (she had forgotten it) 

that Margaret de Cliche had told her she meant 

to come again. She hoped the marquise thought 

by this time that, on canvas at least, she looked 

a little more like a lady. Mme. de Cliche smiled 

at her at any rate and kissed her, as if in fact 

there could be no mistake. She smiled also at Mr. 

Flack, on Francie's introducing him, and only 

looked grave when, after she had asked where the 

others were — the papa and the grandesosur — ^thegirl 

replied that she hadn't the least idea : her party 

consisted only of herself and Mr. Flack. Then Mme. 

de Cliche became very stern indeed — assumed an 

aspect that brought back Francie's sense that she 

was the individual, among all Gaston's belongings, 

who had pleased her least from the first. Mme. 

de Douves was superficially more formidable but 



 145 



with her the second impression was most com- 
forting. It was just this second impression of 
the marquise that was not. There were perhaps 
others behind it but the girl had not yet arrived 
at them. Mr. Waterlow might not have been 
very fond of Mr. Flack, but he was none the less 
perfectly civil to him, and took much trouble to 
show him all the work that he had in hand, drag- 
ging out canvases, changing lights, taking him oflf 
to see things at the other end of the great room. 
While the two gentlemen were at a distance 
Mme. de Cliche expressed to Francie the con- 
fidence that she would allow her to see her home : 
on which Francie replied that she was not going 
home, she was going somewhere else with Mr. 
Flack. And she explained, as if it simplified the 
matter, that this gentleman was an editor. 

Her interlocutress echoed the term and Francie 
developed her explanation. He was not the only 
editor, but one of the many editors, of a great 
American paper. He was going to publish an 
article about her picture. Gaston knew him 
perfectly; it was Mr. Flack who had been the 
cause of Gaston's being presented to her. Mme. de 
Cliche looked across at him as if the inadequacy 
of the cause projected an unfavourable light upon 
the eflfect ; she inquired whether Francie thought 
Gaston would like her to drive about Paris alone 
with an editor. " Fm sure I don't know. I never 
asked him ! " said Francie. '* He ought to want 

L 



140  

me to be polite to a person who did so much for 
us." Soon after this Mme. de Cliche withdrew, 
without looking afresh at Mr. Flack, though he 
stood in her path as she approached the door. 
She did not kiss our young lady again, and the 
girl observed that her leave-taking consisted of 
the simple words, "Adieu, mademoiselle." She 
had already perceived that in proportion as the Pro- 
berts became majestic they had recourse to French. 

She and Mr. Flack remained in the studio 
but a short time longer; and when they were 
seated in the carriage again, at the door (they 
had come in Mr. Dosson's open landau), her com- 
panion said, "And now where shall we go?" 
He spoke as if on their way from the hotel he 
had not touched upon the pleasant vision of a 
little turn in the Bois. He had insisted then 
that the day was made on purpose, the air full 
of spring. At present he seemed to wish to give 
himself the pleasure of making his companion 
choose that particular alternative. But she only 
answered, rather impatiently: 

" Wherever you like, wherever you like." And 
she sat there swaying her parasol, looking about 
her, giving no order. 

" Au Bois," said George Flack to the coachman, 
leaning back on the soft cushions. For a few 
moments after the carriage had taken its easy 
elastic start they were silent; but presently he 
went on, *' Was that lady one of your relations ? " 



 147 

" Do you mean one of Mr. Probert's ? She is 
his sifter." 

" Is there any particular reason in that why 
she shouldn't say good-morning to me ? " 

" She didn't want you to remain with me. She 
wanted to carry me off." 

" What has she got against me ? " asked Mr. 
Flack. 

Francie seemed to consider a little. "Oh, it's 
these French • ideas." 

"Some of them are very base," said her 
companion. 

The girl made no rejoinder; she only turned 
her eyes to right and left, admiring the splendid 
day, the shining city. The great architectural 
vista was fair: the tall houses, with their 
polished shop-fronts, their balconies, their signs 
with accented letters, seemed to make a glitter 
of gilt and crystal as they rose into the sunny air. 
The colour of everything was cool and pretty and 
the sound of everything gay; the sense of a 
costly spectacle was everywhere. "Well, I like 
Paris, anyway ! " Francie exclaimed at last. 

"It's lucky for you, since you've got to live 
here." 

*'I haven't got to, there's no obligation. We 
haven't settled anything about that." 

"Hasn't that lady settled it for you?" 

" Yes, very likely she has," said Francie, placidly. 
"I don't like her so well as the others." 

L 2 



148  

"You like the others very much?" 

" Of course I do. So would you if they had 
made so much of you." 

" That one at the studio didn't make much of 
me, certainly." 

"Yes, she's the most haughty," said Francie. 

"Well, what is it all about?" Mr. Flack in- 
quired. " Who are they, anyway ? " 

"Oh, it would take me three hours to tell 
you," the girl replied, laughing. " They go back 
a thousand years." 

"Well, we've got a thousand years — I mean 
three hours." And George Flack settled himseK 
more on his cushions and inhaled the pleasant 
air. "I do enjoy this drive, Miss Francie," he 
went on. "It's many a day since I've been to 
the Bois. I don't fool round much among the 
trees." 

Francie replied candidly that for her too the 
occasion was very agreeable, and Mr. Flack pursued, 
looking round him with a smile, irrelevantly 
and cheerfully: "Yes, these French ideas! I 
don't see how you can stand them. Those they 
have about young ladies are horrid." 

" Well, they tell me you like them better after 
you are married." 

"Why, after they are married they're worse — 
I mean the ideas. Every one knows that." 

"Well, they can make you like anything, the 
way they talk," Francie said. 



 149 

" And do they talk a great deal ? " 

" Well, I should think so. They don't do much 
else, and they talk about the queerest things — 
things I never heard of." 

''Ah, that rU engage!" George Flack 
exclaimed. 

" Of course I have had most conversation with 
Mr. Probert." 

« The old gentleman ? " 

" No, very little with him. I mean with Gaston. 
But it's not he that has told me most — it's Mme. 
de Br^court. She relates and relates — it's very 
interesting. She has told me all their histories, all 
their troubles and complications." 

" Complications ? " 

"That's what she calls them. It seems very 
diflferent from America. It's just like a story — 
they have such strange feelings. But there are 
things you can see — ^without being told." 

" What sort of things ? " 

"Well, like Mme. de Clich^'s— " But Francie 
paused, as if for a word. 

"Do you mean her complications?" 

" Yes, and her husband's She has terrible ones. 
That's why one must forgive her if she is rather 
peculiar. She is very unhappy." 

"Do you mean through her husband?" 

"Yes, he likes other ladies better. He flirts 
with Mme. de Brives." 

"Mme. de Brives?" 



160  

"Yes, she's lovely," said Francie. "She isn't 
very young, but she's fearfully attractive. And he 
used to go every day to have tea with Mme. de 
Villepreux. Mme. de Cliche can't bear Mme. de 
Villepreux." 

"Lord, what a low character he must be!" 
George Flack exclaimed. 

" Oh, his mother was very bad. That was one 
thing they had against the marriage." 
" Who had ? — against what marriage ? " 
"When Maggie Probert became engaged." 
"Is that what they call her — Maggie?" 
"Her 'brother does; but every one else calls 
her Margot. Old Mme. de Cliche had a horrid 
reputation. Every one hated her." 

"Except those, I suppose, who liked her too 
much. And who is Mme. de Villepreux?" 
"She's the daughter of Mme. de Marignac." 
"And who is Mme. de Marignac?" 
" Oh, she's dead," said Francie. " She used to be 
a great friend of Mr. Probert — of Gaston's father." 
" He used to go to tea with her ? " 
" Almost every day. Susan says he has never 
been the same since her death." 

" Ah, poor man ! And who is Susan ? " 
"Why, Mme. de Br^court. Mr. Probert just 
loved Mme. de Marignac. Mme. de Villepreux 
isn't so nice as her mother. She was brought 
up with the Proberts, like a sister, and now she 
carries on with Maxime." 



THE RE^rERBERATOR. 151 

"With Maxime?" 

"That's M. de Cliche." 

"Oh, I see — I see 1" murmured George Flack, 
responsively. They had reached the top of the 
Champs Elys^es and were passing below the 
wondrous arch to which that gentle eminence 
forms a pedestal and which looks down even on 
splendid Paris from its immensity and across 
at the vain mask of the Tuileries and the river- 
moated Louvre and the twin towers of Notre 
Dame, painted blue by the distance. The con- 
fluence of carriages — a sounding stream, in which 
our friends become engaged— rolled into the large 
avenue leading to the Bois de Boulogne. Mr. 
Flack evidently enjoyed the scene ; he gazed about 
him at their neighbours, at the villas and gardens 
on either hand ; he took in the prospect of the 
far-stretching brown boskages and smooth alleys 
of the wood, of the hour that they had yet to 
spend there, of the rest of Francie's artless prattle, 
of the place near the lake where they could alight 
and walk a little ; even of the bench where they 
might sit down. " I see, I see," he repeated with 
appreciation. " You make me feel quite as if I 
were in the grand mondey 



XI 



One day, at noon, shortly before the time for 
which Gaston had announced his return, a note was 
brought to Francie from Mme. de Brecourt. It 
caused her some agitation, though it contained a 
clause intended to guard her against vain fears. 
" Please come to me the moment you have received 
this — I have sent the carriage. I will explain 
when you get here what I want to see you about. 
Nothing has happened to Gaston. We are all 
here." The coup4 from the Place Beauvau was 
waiting at the door of the hotel and the girl had 
but a hurried conference with her father and sister ; 
if conference it could be called in which vagueness 
on one side encountered blankness on the other. 
" It's for something bad — something bad," Francie 
said, while she tied her bonnet ; though she was 
unable to think what it could be. Delia, who 
looked a good deal scared, offered to accompany 
her ; upon which Mr. Dosson made the first remark 
of a practical character in which he had indulged 
in relation to his daughter's alliance. 



 153 

" No you won't — no you won't, my dear. They 
may whistle for Francie, but let them see that they 
cant whistle for all of us." It was the first sign 
he had given of being jealous of the dignity of the 
Dossons. That question had never troubled him. 

" I know what it is," said Delia, while she ar- 
ranged her sister's garments. " They want to talk 
about religion. They have got the priests ; there's 
some bishop, or perhaps some cardinal. They want 
to baptise you." 

"You'd better take a waterproof!" Francie's 
father called after her* as she flitted away. 

She wondered, rolling toward the Place Beauvau, 
what they were all there for ; that announcement 
balanced against the reassurance conveyed in the 
phrase about Gaston. She liked them individually 
but in their collective form they made her uneasy. 
In their family parties there was always something 
of the tribunal. Mme. de Br^court came out to 
meet her in the vestibule, drawing her quickly into 
a small room (not the salon — Francie knew it as 
her hostess's "own room," a lovely boudoir), in 
which, considerably to the girl's relief, the rest of 
the family were not assembled. Yet she guessed 
in a moment that they were near at hand — they 
were waiting. Susan looked flushed and strange ; 
she had a queer smile; she kissed her as if she 
didn't know that she was doing it. She laughed as 
she greeted her, but her laugh was nervous; she 
was different every way from anything Francie had 



154  

hitherto seen. By the time our young lady had 
perceived these things she was sitting beside her on 
a sofa and Mine, de Br^court had her hand, which 
she held so tight that it almost hurt her. Susan's 
eyes were in their nature salient, but on this oc- 
casion they seemed to have started out of her head. 

*'We are upside down — terribly agitated. A 
bomb has fallen into the house." 

"What's the matter — ^what's the matter?" Francie 
asked, pale, with parted lips. She had a sudden 
wild idea that Gaston might have found out in 
America that her father had no money, had lost it 
all; that it had been stolen during their long 
absence. But would he cast her oflf for that ? 

"You must understand the closeness of our 
union with you from our sending for you this way — 
the first, the only person — in a crisis. Our joys 
are your joys and our indignations are yours." 

" What is the matter, please ? " the girl repeated. 
Their "indignations" opened up a gulf; it 
flashed upon her, with a shock of mortification 
that the idea had not come sooner, that something 
would have come out : a piece in the paper, from 
Mr. Flack, about her portrait and even (a little) 
about herself. But that was only more mystify- 
ing; for certainly Mr. Flack could only have 
published something pleasant — something to be 
proud of. Had he by some incredible perversity 
or treachery stated that the picture was bad^ 
or even that she was ? She grew dizzy, remember- 



 155 

ing how she had refused him and how little he 
had liked it, that day at Saint-Germain. But they 
had made that up over and over, especially 
when they sat so long on a bench together (the 
time they drove,) in the Bois de Boulogne. 

"Oh, the most awful thing; a newspaper sent 
this morning from America to my father — contain- 
ing two horrible columns of vulgar lies and scandal 
about our family, about all of us, about you, 
about your picture, about poor Marguerite, call- 
ing her ' Margot,' about Maxime and L^onie de 
Villepreux, saying he's her lover, about all our 
affairs, about Gaston, about your marriage, about 
your sister and your dresses and your dimples, about 
our darling father, whose history it professes 
to relate, in the most ignoble, the most revolting 
terms. Papa's in the most awful state 1 " said Mme. 
de Brecourt, panting to take breath. She had spoken 
with the volubility of horror and passion. " You 
are outraged with us and you must sufifer with 
us," she went on. " But who has done it ? Who 
has done it ? Who has done it ? " 

" Why, Mr. Flack— Mr. Flack 1 " Francie quickly 
replied. She was appalled, overwhelmed; but 
her foremost feeling was the wish not to appear 
to disavow her knowledge. 

" Mr. Flack ? do you mean that awful person — ? 
He ought to be shot, he ought to be burnt 
alive. Maxime will kill him, Maxime is in an 
unspeakable rage. Everything is at end, we have 



156 THE REVERBEBATOR 

been served up to the rabble, we shall have to 
leave Paris. How could he know such things? 
and they are all too infamously false I " The poor 
woman poured forth her trouble in questions and 
contradictions and groans; she knew not what 
to ask first, against what to protest "Do you 
mean that person Marguerite saw you with at Mr. 
WaterloVs? Oh, Francie, what has happened? 
She had a feeling then, a dreadful foreboding. 
She saw you afterwards — ^walking with him — 
in the Bois." 

"Well, I didn't see her," the girl said. 

"You were talking with him — ^you were too 
absorbed : that's what Margot says. Oh, Francie, 
Francie ! " cried Mme. de Brecourt, catching her 
breath. 

"She tried to interfere at the studio, but I 
wouldn't let her. He's an old friend — a friend 
of my father's, and I like him very much. What 
my father allows, that's not for others to criticise ! " 
Francie continued. She was frightened, extremely 
frightened, at her companion's air of tragedy and 
at the dreadful consequences she alluded to, con- 
sequences of an act she herself did not know, could 
not comprehend nor measure yet. But there was 
an instinct of bravery in her which threw her into de- 
fence—defence even of George Flack, though it was 
a part of her consternation that on her too he should 
have practised a surprise, a sort of selfish deception. 

"Oh, how can you bear with such wretches — 



 157 

how can your father ? What devil has he 

paid to tattle to him ? " 

" You scare me awfully — ^you terrify me," said 
the girl. "I don't know what you are talking 
about. I haven't seen it, I don't understand it. 
Of course I have talked to Mr. Flack." 

" Oh, Francie, don't say it — don't say it ! Dear 
child, you haven't talked to him in that fashion : 
vulgar horrors, and such a language 1 " Mme. de 
Br^court came nearer, took both her hands now, 
drew her closer, seemed to plead with her. " You 
shall see the paper ; they have got it in the other 
room — the most disgusting sheet. Margot is reading 
it to her husband ; he can't read English, if you can 
call it English : such a style ! Papa tried to translate 
it to Maxime, but he couldn't, he was too sick. 
There is a quantity about Mme. de Marignac — 
imagine only ! And a quantity about Jeanne and 
Raoul and their economies in the country. When 
they see it in Brittany — heaven preserve us ! " 

Francie had turned very white ; she looked for 
a minute at the carpet. " And what does it say 
about me?" 

"Some trash about your being the great 
American beauty, with the most odious details, 
and your having made a match among the * rare 
old exclusives.' And the strangest stuff about 
your father — his having gone into a 'store* at 
the age of twelve. And something about your 
poor sister — heaven help us ! And a sketch of our 



158  

career in Paris, as they call it, and the way that 
we have got on and our great pretensions. And a 
passage about Blanche de Douves, Raoul's sister, 
who had that disease — ^what do they call it? — 
that she used to steal things in shops : do you see 
them reading that ? And how did he know such 
a thing ? it's ages ago — it's dead and buried ! " 

"You told me, you told me yourself," said 
Francie, quickly. She turned red the instant she 
had spoken. 

" Don't say it's you — don't, don't, my darling ! " 
cried Mme. de Br^court, who had stared at her a 
moment. " That's what I want, that's what you 
must do, that's what I see you this way for, 
first, alone. I've answered for you, you know ; 
you must repudiate every responsibility. Margot 
suspects you — she has got that idea — she has 
given it to the others. I have told them they 
ought to be ashamed, that it's an outrage to you. 
I have done everything, for the last hour, to 
protect you. I'm your godmother, you know, and 
you mustn't disappoint me. You're incapable, 
and you must say so, face to face, to my father. 
Think of Gaston, cherie ; he will have seen it over 
there, alone, far from us all. Think of his horror 
and of his faith, of what he would expect of you." 
Mme. de Br^court hurried on, and her companion's 
bewilderment deepened on seeing that the tears 
had risen to her eyes and were pouring down her 
cheeks. **You must say to my father, face 



 159 

to face that you are incapable — ^you are stain- 
less.'' 

" Stainless ? " Francie repeated. " Of course I 
knew he wanted to write a piece about the picture 
— ^and about my marriage." 

"About your marriage — of course you knew. 
Then, wretched girl, you are at the bottom of all ! '* 
wailed Mme. de Brecourt, flinging herself away 
from her, falling back on the sofa, covering her 
face with her hands. 

"He told me — he told me when I went with 
him to the studio!" Francie declared, passion- 
ately. "But he has printed more." 

*'More? I should think so!" And Mme. de 
Brecourt sprang up, standing before her. "And 
you let him — about yourself? You gave him 
facte ? " 

" I told him — ^I told him — I don't know what. 
It was for his paper — ^he wants everything. It's 
a very fine paper." 

"A very fine paper?" Mme. de Brecourt 
stared, with parted lips. "Have you seen, have 
you touched the hideous sheet ? Ah, my brother, 
my brother!" she wailed again, turning away. 

" If your brother were here you wouldn't talk 
to me this way — he would protect me ! " cried 
Francie, on her feet, seizing her little muff and 
moving to the door. 

"Go away, go away or they'll kill you!" 
Mme. de Brecourt went on, excitedly. " After all 



160 THE BEVERBEBATOR. 

I have done for you — rafter the way I have lied 
for you ! *' And she sobbed, trying to repress her 
sobs. 

Francie, at this, broke out into a torrent of tears. 
" m go home. Father, &ther ! " she almost shrieked, 
reaching the door. 

" Oh, your father — ^he has been a nice father, 
bringing you up in such ideas!" These words 
followed her with infinite scorn, but almost as 
Mme. de Brdcourt uttered them, struck by a sound, 
she sprang after the girl, seized her, drew her 
back and held her a moment, listening, before 
she could pass out. " Hush — ^hush — ^they are com- 
ing in here, they are too anxious! Deny — deny 
it — say you know nothing! Tour sister must 
have said things — ^and such things: say it all 
comes from her!*' 

"Oh, you dreadful — is that what you do?" 
cried Francie, shaking herself free. The door 
opened as she spoke and Mme. de Br^ourt 
walked quickly to the window, turning her back. 
Mme. de Cliche was there and Mr. Probert and 
M. de Br^court and M. de Cliche. They entered 
in silence and M. de Br^court, coming last, closed 
the door softly behind him. Francie had never 
been in a court of justice, but if she had had that 
experience these four persons would have reminded 
her of the jury filing back into their box with their 
verdict. They all looked at her hard as she stood 
in the middle of the room ; Mme. de Br^court gazed 



THE KEVERBERATOR. 161 

out of the window, wiping her eyes; Mme. de 
Cliche grasped a newspaper, crumpled and partly 
folded, Francie got a quick impression, moving 
her eyes from one face to another, that old Mr. 
Probert was the worst; his mild, ravaged expres- 
sion was terrible. He was the one who looked at 
her least; he went to the fireplace and leaned 
on the mantel, with his head in his hands. He 
seemed ten years older. 

"Ah, mademoiselle, mademoiselle, mademoi- 
selle ! " said Maxime de Cliche, slowly, impressively, 
in a tone of the most respectful but most poignant 
reproach. 

" Have you seen it — have they sent it to you ? " 
his wife asked, thrusting the paper towards her. 
" It's quite at your service ! " But as Francie 
neither spoke nor took it she tossed it upon the 
sofa, where, as it opened, falling, the girl read 
the name of the Reverberator. Mme. de Cliche 
carried her head very far back. 

" She has nothing to do with it — it's just as 
I told you — she's overwhelmed," said Mme. de 
Br^court, remaining at the window. 

"You would do well to read it — it's worth the 
trouble," Alphonse de Br^court remarked, going 
over to his wife. Francie saw him kiss her as 
he perceived her tears. She was angry at her 
own; she choked and swallowed them; they 
seemed somehow to put her in the wrong. 

"Have you ha no idea that any such mon- 



162 THE KEVEEBERATOR. 

strosity would be perpetrated?" Mme. de Cliche 
went on, coming nearer to her. She had a manner 
of forced cahnness — ^as if she wished it to he un- 
derstood that she was one of those who could be 
reasonable under any provocation, though she were 
trembling within — which made Francie draw back. 
" CPest jpourtant rempli de cho$e$ — which we know 
you to have been told of — ^by what folly, great 
heaven ! It's right and left — no one is spared — ^it's 
a deluge of insult. My sister perhaps will have 
told you of the apprehensions I had — I couldn't 
resist them, though I thought of nothing so awful 
as this, God knows, the day I met you at Mr. 
Waterlow's with your journalist." 

" I have told her everything — don't you see she's 
avMntie ? Let her go, let her go ! " exclaimed 
Mme. de Br^court, still at the window. 

"Ah, your journalist, your journalist, mademoi- 
selle ! " said Maxime de Cliche. " I am very sorry 
to have to say anything in regard to any friend of 
yours that can give you so little pleasure ; but I 
promise myself the satisfaction of administering 
him with these hands a dressing he won't forget, 
if I may trouble you so far as to ask you to Jet 
him know it ! " 

M. de Cliche fingered the points of his 
moustache ; he difiused some powerful scent ; his 
eyes were dreadful to Francie. She wished Mr. 
Probert would say something kind to her ; but she 
had now determined to be strong. They were ever 



 163 

so many against one; Gaston was far away and 
she felt heroic. " If you mean Mr. Flack — I don't 
know what you mean," she said as composedly as 
possible to M. de Cliche. " Mr. Flack has gone 
to London." 

At this M. de Br^court gave a free laugh and 
his brother-in-law replied, " Ah, it's easy to go 
to London." 

" They like such things there ; they do them 
more and more. It's as bad as America I " Mme. 
de Cliche declared. 

" Why have you sent for me — what do you all 
want me to do ? You might explain — I am only 
an American girl ! " said Francie, whose being 
only an American girl, did not prevent her 
pretty head from holding itself now as high as 
Mme. de Clich^'s. 

Mme. de Br^court came back to her quickly, 
laying her hand on her arm. "You are very 
nervous — ^you had much better go home. I will 
explain everything to them — I will make them 
understand. The carriage is here — it had orders 
to wait." 

" I'm not in the least nervous, but I have made 
you all so," Francie replied, laughing. 

"I defend you, my dear young lady — I insist 
that you are only a wretched victim, like ourselves," 
M. de Br&ourt remarked, approaching her with 
a smile. '* I see the hand of a woman in it, you 
know," he went on, to the others ; " for there are 

M 2 



164 THE REVERBERATOR 



strokes of a vulgarity that a man doesn't sink 
to (he can't, his very organisation prevents him) 
even if he be the greatest cad on earth. But 
please don't doubt that I have maintained that 
that woman is not you." 

"The way you talk — I don't know how to 
write,'' said Francie. 

"My poor child, when one knows you as I 
do ! " murmured Mme. de Brecourt, with her arm 
around her. 

"There's a lady who helps him — ^Mr. Flack 
has told me so," Francie continued. "She's a 
literary lady — ^herein Paris — shewriteswhat he tells 
her. T think her name is Miss Topping, but she 
calls herself Florine — or Dorine," Francie added. 

" Miss Dosson, you're too rare ! " Marguerite de 
Cliche exclaimed, giving a long moan of pain 
which ended in an incongruous laugh. "Then 
you have been three to it," she went on ; " that 
accounts for its perfection ! " 

Francie disengaged herself again from Mme. 
de Brecourt and went to Mr. Probert, who stood 
looking down at the fire, with his back to her. 
" Mr. Probert, I'm very sorry at what I've done to 
distress you ; I had no idea you would all feel so 
badly. I didn't mean any harm. I thought you 
would like it." 

The old man turned a little, bending his eyes 
on her, but without taking her hand as she had hoped. 
Usually when they met he kissed her. He did not 



 165 



look angry but he looked very ill. A strange in- 
articulate sound, a kind of exclamation of amaze- 
ment and mirth, came from the others when she 
said she thought they would like it; and indeed 
poor Francie was far from being able to judge of 
the droll effect of that speech " Like it — like it ? " 
said Mr. Probert, staring at her as if he were a 
little afraid of her. 

" What do you mean ? She admits — she admits 1 " 
cried Mme. de Cliche to her sister. " Did you 
arrange it all that day in the Bois — ^to punish me 
for having tried to separate you ? " she pursued, 
to the girl, who stood gazing up piteously at the 
old man. 

" I don't know what he has published — I haven't 
seen it — I don't understand. I thought it was 
only to be a piece about me." 

" About me ! " M. de Cliche repeated in English. 
" Mle est divine ! " He turned away, raising his 
shoulders and hands and then letting them fall. 

Mme. de Br^court had picked up the news- 
paper ; she rolled it together, saying to Francie that 
she must take it home, take it home immediately 
— then she would see. She only seemed to wish to 
get her out of the room. But Mr. Probert had 
fixed the girl with his sick stare. "You gave 
informg-tion for that ? You desired it ? " 

" Why, I didn't desire it, but Mr. Flack did." 

" Why do you know such ruffians ? Where was 
your father ? " the old man groaned. 



166  

" I thought he would just praise my picture and 
give pleasure to Mr. Waterlow/' Francie went on. 
" I thought he would just speak about my being 
engaged and give a little account ; so many people 
in America would be interested." 

" So many people in America — ^that's just the 
dreadful thought, my dear,'' said Mme. de Br^court, 
kindly. " Voyons, put it in your muff and tell us 
what you think of it." And she continued to 
thrust forward the scandalous journal. 

But Francie took no notice of it ; she looked 
round from Mr. Probert at the others. " I told 
Gaston I should do something you wouldn't 
like." 

" Well, hell believe it now ! " cried Mme. de 
Cliche. 

" My poor child, do you think he will like it any 
better ? " asked Mme. de Br^court. 

Francie fastened her eyes on her a moment. 
" He'll see it over there — he has seen it now." 

" Oh, my dear, you'll have news of him. Don't 
be afraid ! " laughed Mme. de Cliche. 

" Did he send you the paper ? " the girl went on, 
to Mr. Probert. 

" It was not directed in his hand," said M. de 
Br^court. " There was some stamp on the band 
— it came from the oflSce." 

"Mr. Flack — is that his hideous name? — 
must have seen to that," Mme. de Br^court 
suggested. 



 167 



" Or perhaps Florine," M. de Cliche interposed. 
" I should like to get hold of Florine." 

" I did — I did tell him so ! '* Francie repeated, 
with her innocent face, alluding to her statement 
of a moment before and speaking as if she 
thought the circumstance detracted from the 
ofifence. 

**■ So did I — so did we all ! " said Mme. de 
Cliche. 

" And will he suflfer — as you suffer ? " Francie 
continued, appealing to Mr. Probert. 

" Suffer, suffer ? He'll die ! " cried the old man. 
" However, I won t answer for him ; he'll tell you 
himself, when he returns." 

" Hell die ? " asked Francie, with expanded 
eyes. 

" Hell never return — how can he show him- 
self ? " said Mme. de Cliche. 

" That's not true — hell come back to stand by 
me ! " the girl flashed out. 

" How could you not feel that we were the last 
— the very last ? " asked Mr. Probert, very gently. 
" How could you not feel that my son was the 
very last — ? " 

" G^tBt un sens qui lui manque ! " commented 
Mme. de Clichd. 

" Let her go, papa — do let her go home," 
Mme. de Br^court pleaded. 

" Surely. That's the only place for her to-day 1" 
the elder sister continued. 



168  

"Yes, my child — you oughtn't to be here. 
It's your father — ^he ought to understand," said 
Mr. Probert. 

" For God's sake don't send for him — ^let it all 
stop ! " Mme. de Cliche exclaimed. 

Francie looked at her ; then she said, " Good- 
bye, Mr. Probert — good-bye, Susan." 

" Give her your arm — take her to the carriage," 
she heard Mme. de Br^court say to her husband. 
She got to the door she hardly knew how — she 
was only conscious that Susan held her once more 
long enough to kiss her. Poor Susan wanted to 
comfort her ; that showed how bad (feeling as she 
did) she believed the whole business would yet be. 
It would be bad because Gaston — Gaston : Francie 
did not complete that thought, yet only Gaston 
was in her mind as she hurried" to the carriage. 
M. de Br^court hurried beside her ; she would not 
take his arm. But he opened the door for her 
and as she got in she heard him murmur strangely, 
" You are charming, mademoiselle — charming, 
charming ! " 



XII. 

Her absence had not been long and when she 
re-entered the familiar salon at the hotel she found 
her father and sister sitting there together as if 
they were timing her — a prey to curiosity and 
suspense. Mr. Dosson however gave no sign of 
impatience ; he only looked at her in silence 
through the smoke of his cigar (he profaned the 
red satin splendour with perpetual fumes,) as she 
burst into the room. No other word than the one 
I use expresses the tell-tale character of poor 
Francie's ingress. She rushed to one of the tables, 
flinging down her muff and gloves, and the next 
moment Delia, who had sprung up as she came in, 
had caught her in her arms and was glaring into 
her face with a " Francie Dosson — what have you 
been through?" Francie said nothing at first, 
only closing her eyes and letting her sister do what 
she would with her. "She has been crying, 
father — she has,'* Delia went on, pulling her down 
upon a sofa and almost shaking her as she con- 



170  

tinued. "Will you please tell? I've been 
perfectly wild ! Yes you have, you dreadful — I " 
the elder girl declared, kissing her on the eyes. 
They opened at this compassionate pressure and 
Francie rested them in their beautiful distress on 
her father, who had now risen to his feet and 
stood with his back to the fire. 

" Why, daughter," said Mr. Dosson, " you look 
as if you had had quite a worry." 

" I told you I should — I toljd you, I told you ! " 
Francie broke out, with a trembling voice. " And 
now it's come ! " 

" You don't mean to say you've done anything ? " 
cried Delia, very white. 

" It's all over — it's all over ! " Francie pursued, 
turning her eyes to her sister. 

" Are you crazy, Francie ? " this young lady 
asked. " I'm sure you look as if you were." 

" Ain't you going to be married, my child ? " 
asked Mr. Dosson, benevolently, coming nearer 
to her. 

Francie sprang up, releasing herself from her 
sister, and threw her arms around him. "Will 
you take me away, father — will you take me right 
away ? " 

" Of course I will, my precious. I'll take you 
anywhere. I don't want anything — it wasn't my 
idea ! " And Mr. Dosson and Delia looked at 
each other while the girl pressed her face upon 
his shoulder. 



 171 

" I never heard such trash — ^you can't behave 
that way ! Has he got engaged to some one else 
— in America ? " Delia demanded. 

*' Why, if it's over it's over. I guess it's all 
right," said Mr. Dosson, kissing his younger 
daughter. 'Til go back or I'll go on. I'll go 
anywhere you lik« ! " 

"You won't have your daughters insulted, I 
presume ! " Delia cried. " If you don't tell me 
this moment what has happened I'll drive straight 
round there and find out." 

" Have they insulted you, sweetie ? " asked the 
old man, bending over the girl, who simply leaned 
upon him with her hidden face, with no sound of 
tears. 

Francie raised her head, turning round upon 
her sister. " Did I ever tell you anything else — 
did I ever believe in it for an hour ? " 

"Oh, well, if you've done it on purpose — to 
triumph over me — ^we might as well go home, 
certainly. But I think you had better wait till 
Gaston comes." 

" It will be worse when he comes — if he thinks 
the same as they do." 

*' Have they insulted you — ^have they?" Mr. 
Dosson repeated ; while the smoke of his cigar, 
curling round the question, gave him the air of 
asking it with placidity. 

" They think I've insulted them — ^they're in an 
awful state — they're almost dead. Mr. Flack has 



172  

put it into the paper — everything, I don't know 
what — and they think it's too fearful. They were 
all there together — all at me at once, groaning and 
carrying on. I never saw people so aflfected." 

Delia listened in bewilderment, staring. *'So 
aflfected ? " 

"Ah, yes, there's a good deal of that," said 
Mr. Dosson. 

" It's too real — too terrible ; you don't under- 
stand. It's all printed there — that they're immoral, 
and everything about them; everything that's 
private and dreadful." 

" Immoral, is that so ? " Mr. Dosson asked. 

" And about me too, and about Gaston and my 
marriage, and all sorts of personalities, and all 
the names, and Mme. de Villepreux, and every- 
thing. It's all printed there and they've read it. 
It says that one of them steals." 

" Will you be so good as to tell me what you are 
talking about ? " Delia inquired, sternly. " Where 
is it printed and what have we got to do with it ? " 

" Some one sent it, and I told Mr. Flack." 

" Do you mean his paper ? Oh the horrid brute ! " 
Delia cried, with passion. 

" Do they mind so what they see in the papers ? " 
asked Mr. Dosson. " I guess they haven't seen 
what I've seen. Why, there used to be things 
about me !" 

" Well, it is about us too, about every one. They 
think it's the same as if I wrote it." 



 173 

" Well, you know what you could do " said Mr. 
DossoD, smiling at his daughter. 

" Do you mean that piece about your picture — 
that you told me about when you went with him 
again to see it ? " Delia asked. 

-" Oh, I don't know what piece it is ; I haven't 
seen it." 

"Haven't seen it? Didn't they show it to 
you ? " 

" Yes — ^but I couldn't read it. Mme. de Br^court 
wanted me to take it — ^but I left it behind." 

"Well, that's like you — ^like the Tauchnitzes 
littering up our track. I'll be bound I'd see it," 
said Delia. "Hasn't it come, doesn't it always 
come ? 

"I g-uess we haven't had the last — ^unless it's 
somewhere round," said Mr. Dosson. 

" Father, go out and get it — ^you can buy it on 
the boulevard ! " Delia continued. " Francie, what 
did you want to tell him ? " 

"I didn't know; I was just conversing; he 
seemed to take so much interest." 

" Oh, he's a deep one 1 " groaned Delia. 

" Well, if folks are immoral you can't keep it 
out of the papers — and I don't know as you ought 
to want to," Mr. Dosson remarked. " If they are 
I'm glad to know it, lovey." And he gave his 
younger daughter a glance apparently intended to 
show that in this case he should know what 
to do. 



174  

But Francie was looking at her sister as if her 
attention had been arrested. " How do you mean 
— ' a deep one ' ? " 

*•' Why, he wanted to break it ofiF, the wretch 1 " 

Francie stared ; then a deeper flush leapt to her 
face, in which already there was a look of fever. 
"To break off" my engagement?" 

" Yes, just that. But I'll be hanged if he shall ! 
Father, will you allow that?" 

" Allow what ? " 

" Why Mr. Flack's vile interference. You won't 
let him do as he likes with us, I suppose, will 
you ? " 

' It's all done — it's all done ! " said Francie. The 
tears had suddenly started into her eyes again. 

" Well, he's so smart that it is likely he's too 
smart," said Mr. Dosson. "But what did they 
want you to do about it ? — that's what I want to 
know." 

" They wanted me to say I knew nothing about 
it— but I couldn't." 

" But you didn't and you don't — ^if you haven't 
even read it ! " Delia returned. 

'* Where is the d — d thing ? " her father asked, 
looking helplessly about him. 

" On the boulevard, at the very first of those 
kiosks you come to. That old woman has it — the 
one who speaks English — she always has it. Do 
go and get it — do!" And Delia pushed him, 
looked for his hat for him. 



 175 

" I knew he wanted to print something and I 
can't say I didn't 1 *' Francie said. " I thought he 
would praise my portrait and that Mr. Waterlow 
would like that, and Gaston and every one. And 
he talked to me about the paper — he is always 
doing that and always was — and I didn't see the 
harm. But even just knowing him — they think 
that's vile." 

" Well, I should hope we can know whom we 
like ! " Delia declared, jumping in her mystifi- 
cation and alarm from one point of view to 
another. 

Mr. Dosson had put on his hat — he was going 
out for the paper. " Why, he kept us alive last 
year," he said, 

" Well, he seems to have killed us now ! " Delia 
cried. 

*' Well, don't give up an old friend," said Mr. 
Dosson, with his hand on the door. " And don't 
back dovm on anything you've done." 

" Lord, what a ftiss about an old newspaper 1 " 
Delia went on, in her exasperation. " It must be 
about two weeks old, anyway. Didn't they ever 
see a society -paper before ? " 

" They can't have seen much," said Mr, Dosson. 
He paused, still with his hand on the door. 
" Don't you worry — Gaston will make it all 
right." 

'•' Gaston ?— it will kill Gaston ! " 

" Is that what they say ? " Delia demanded. 



176  



" Gaston will never look at me again." 

"Well, then, he'll have to look at me, said 
Mr. Dosson. 

''Do you mean that he'll give you up — ^that 
he'll be so abject ? " Delia went on. 

" They say he's just the one who will feel it most. 
But I'm the one who does that," said Francie, with 
a strange smile. 

"They're stuflSng you with lies — because they 
don't like it. He'll be tender and true," answered 
Delia. 

" When they hate me ? — Never ! " And Francie 
shook her head slowly, still with her touching 
smile. " That's what he cared for most — to make 
them like me." 

" And isn't he a gentleman, I should like to 
know ? " asked Delia. 

"Yes, and that's why I won't marry him — if 
I've injured him." 

"Pshaw! he has seen the papers over there. 
You wait till he comes," Mr. Dosson enjoined, 
passing out of the room. 

The girls remained there together and after a 
moment Delia exclaimed : " Well, he has got to 
fix it — that's one thing I can tell you." 

" Who has got to fix it ? " 

"Why, that villainous man. He has got to 
publish another piece saying it's all false or all a 
mistake." 

" Yes, you had better make him," said Francie, 



THE REVERBERATOB. 177 



with a weak laugh. "You had better go after 
him — down to Nice." 

"You don't mean to say he has gone to 
Nice ? " 

" Didn't he say he was going there as soon as he 
came back from London — going right through, 
without stopping ? " 

" I don't know but he did," said Delia. Then 
she added — " The coward ! " 

" Why do you say that ? He can't hide at Nice 
— they can find him there." 

" Are they going after him ? " 

" They want to shoot him — to stab him, I don't 
know what — those men." 

" Well, I wish they would," said Delia. 

" They had better shoot me. I shall defend him. 
I shall protect him," Francie went on. 

" How can you protect him ? You shall never 
speak to him again." 

Francie was silent a moment. " I can protect 
him without speaking to him. I can tell the 
simple truth — that he didn't print a word but 
what I told him." 

"That can't be so. He fixed it up. They 
always do, in the papers. Well now, he has got 
to bring out a piece praising them up — praising 
them to the skies : that's what he has got to do ! " 
Delia declared, with decision. 

" Praising them up ? They'll hate that worse," 
Francie returned, musingly. 

N 



178 THE REVEBBERATOR. 



Delia stared. "What on earth do they want 
then ? " 

Francie had sunk upon the sofa ; her eyes were 
fixed on the carpet. She made no reply to her 
sister's question but presently she said, " We had 
better go to-morrow, the first hour that's possible." 

" Go where ? Do you mean to Nice ? " 

" I don't care where. Anywhere, to get away." 

" Before Gaston comes — ^without seeing him ? " 

" I don't want to see him. When they were all 
ranting and raving at me just now I wished he 
was there — I told them so. But now I feel 
dififerently — I can never see him again." 

*' I don't suppose you're crazy, are you ? " cried 
Delia. 

"I can't tell him it wasn't me — I can't, I 
can't I " the younger girl pursued. 

Delia planted herself in front of her. " Francie 
Dosson, if you're going to tell him you've done 
anything wrong you might as well stop before you 
begin. Didn't you hear what father said ? " 

" I'm sure I don't know," Francie replied, list- 
lessly. 

" ' Don't give up an old friend — there's nothing 
on earth so mean.' Now isn't Gaston Probert an 
old friend ? " 

" It will be very simple — he will give me up»" 

" Then he'll be a low wretch." 

" Not in the least — he'll give me up as he took 
me. He would never have asked me to marry 



 179 



him if he hadn't been able to get them to accept 
me : he thinks everything in life oithem. If they 
cast me off now hell do just the same. He'll 
have to choose between us, and when it comes to 
that he'll never choose me." 

"He'll never choose Mr. Flack, if that's what, 
you mean — if you are going to identify yourself 
so with him .'" 

" Oh, I wish he'd never been born ! " Francie 
suddenly shivered. And then she added that she 
was sick — she was going to bed, and her sister 
took her off to her room. 

Mr. Dosson, that afternoon, sitting by Francie's 
bedside, read out from the copy of the Ee- 
verberator which he had purchased on the 
boulevard the dreadful "piece" to his two 
daughters. It is a remarkable fact that as a family 
they were rather disappointed in this compo- 
sition, in which their curiosity found less to repay 
it than it had expected, their resentment against 
Mr. Flack less to stimulate it, their imaginative 
effort to take the point of view of the Proberts 
less to sustain it, and their acceptance of the 
promulgation of Francie's innocent remarks as a 
natural incident of the life of the day less to 
make them reconsider it. The letter from Paris 
appeared lively, "chatty," even brilliant, and so 
far as. the personalities contained in it were 
concerned Mr. Dosson wanted to know if they 
were not aware over here of the charges brought 

N 2 



180 THE REVERBEBATOR. 

every day against the most prominent men in 
Boston. "If there was anything in that style 
they might talk," he said ; and he scanned the 
efifusion afresh with a certain surprise at not 
finding in it some imputation of pecuniary mal- 
versation. The efifect of an acquaintance with 
the text was to depress Delia, who did not exactly 
see what there was in it to take hack or explain 
away. However, she was aware there were some 
points they didn't understand, and doubtless these 
were the scandalous places — the things that had 
thrown the Proberts into a state. But why should 
they be in a state if other people didn't under- 
stand the allusions — they were peculiar, but 
peculiarly incomprehensible — any better than she 
did ? The whole thing struck Francie as infinitely 
less lurid than Mme. de Br^court's account of it, 
and the part about herself and her portrait seemed 
to make even less of the subject than it easily 
might have done. It was scanty, it was "skimpy," 
and if Mr. Waterlow was oflfended it would not be 
because they had published too much about him. 
If was nevertheless clear to her that there were a 
lot of things that she had not told Mr. Flack, as well 
as a great many that she had : perhaps these were 
the things that that lady had put in — Fiorine or 
Dorine — the one she had mentioned at Mme. 
de Br^court's. 

All the same, if the communication in the Re- 
verberator gave them at the hotel less of a sensa- 



THE REVERBEBATOR. 181 



tion than had been announced and bristled so much 
less than was to have been feared with explana- 
tions of the anguish of the Proberts, this did not 
diminish the girl's sense of responsibility nor make 
the case a whit less grave. It only showed how sensi- 
tive and fastidious the Proberts were and therefore 
with what difficulty they could forgive. Moreover 
Franciemadeanother reflection as she lay there — for 
Delia kept her in bed nearly three days, feeling that 
for the moment at any rate that was an efifectual re- 
ply to the wish she had signified that they should 
leave Paris. Perhaps they had gotcoarse and callous, 
Francie said to herself; perhaps they had read so 
many articles like that that they had lost their deli- 
cacy, the sense of certain diiferences and decencies. 
Then, very weak and vague and passive as she was 
now, in the bedimmed room, in the soft Parisian bed, 
and with Delia treating her as much as possible 
, like a sick person, she thought of the lively and 
chatty letters that they had always seen in the 
papers and wondered whether they all meant a 
violation of sanctities, a convulsion of homes, a 
burning of smitten faces, a rupture of girls' engage- 
ments. It was present to her as an agreeable nega- 
tive, I must add, that her father and sister took no 
strenuous view of her responsibility or of their own : 
they neither brought the matter up to her as a crime 
nor made her worse through her feeling that they 
hovered about in tacit disapproval. There was a 
pleasant, cheerfulhelplessness inher father in regard 



182 THE KEVERBERATOR. 

to this as in regard to everything else. There could 
be no more discussion among them on such a ques- 
tion than there had ever been, for none was needed 
to illustrate the fact that for these candid minds the 
newspapers and all they contained were a part of 
the general fatality of things, of the recurrent fresh- 
ness of the universe, coming out like the sun in 
the morning or the stars at night. The thing that 
worried Francie most while Delia kept her in bed 
was the apprehension of what her father might 
do : but this was not a fear of what he might do 
to Mr. Flack. He would go round perhaps to Mr. 
Probert's or to Mme. de Br^court's to reprimand 
them for having made things so rough for his 
" chicken." It was true she had scarcely ever seen 
him reprimand any one for anjrthing ; but on the 
other hand nothing like that had ever happened 
before to her or to Delia. They had made each 
other cry once or twice but no one else had ever 
made them, and no one had ever broken out on 
them that way and frightened them half to death. 
Francie wanted her father not to go round; she 
had a sense that those other people had somehow 
stores of censure, of superiority in any discussion, 
which he could not command. She wanted nothing 
done and no communication to pass — only a 
proud, unbickering silence on the part of the 
Dossons. If the Proberts made a noise and they 
made none it would be they who would have the 
best appearance. Moreover, now, with each elaps- 



THE REVERBEBATOB. 183 

ing day she felt that she did wish to see Gasfton 
about it. Her desire was to wait, counting the 
hours, so that she might just explain, saying two 
or three things. Perhaps these things would not 
make it better — very likely they would not ; but 
at any rate nothing would have been done in the 
interval, at least oi\ her part and her father's and 
Delia's, to make it worse. She told her father 
that she should not like him to go round, and 
she was in some degree relieved at perceiving 
that he did not seem very clear as to what it was 
open to him to say to the Proberts. He was not 
afraid but he was vague. His relation to almost 
everything that had happened to them as a family 
for a good while back was a sense of the absence 
of precedents, and precedents were particularly 
absent now, for he had never before seen a lot 
of people in a rage about a piece in the paper. 
Delia also reassured her ; she said she would see 
to it that their father didn't dash oflf. She com- 
municated to her indeed that he had not the 
smallest doubt that Gaston, in a few days, would 
blow them all up much higher than they had 
blown her and that he was very sorry he had let 
'her go round on that sort of summons to Mme. 
de Br^court's. It was for her and the rest to 
come to Francie and to him, and if they had 
anything practical to say they would arrive in a 
body yet. If Mr. Dosson had the sense of his 
daughter's having been roughly handled he derived 



184 THE KEVEBBERATOR. 



some of the consolation of amusement from his 
persistent humorous view of the Proberts as a 
" body." If they were consistent with their char- 
acter or with their complaint they would move 
en masse upon the hotel, and he stayed at home a 
good deal, as if he were waiting for them. Delia 
intimated to her sister that this vision cheered 
them up as they sat, they two, in the red salon 
while Francie was in bed. Of course it did not ex- 
hilarate this young lady, and she even looked for 
no brighter side now. She knew almost nothing 
but her sharp little ache of suspense, her pre- 
sentiment of Gaston's horror, which grew all the 
while. Delia remarked to her once that he would 
have seen lots of society-papers over there, he 
would have become familiar ; but this only sug- 
gested to the girl (she had strange new moments 
of quick reasoning at present,) that that really 
would only prepare him to be disgusted, not to 
be indifferent. His disgust would be colder than 
anything she had ever known and would complete 
her knowledge of him — make her understand him 
properly for the first time. She would just meet 
it as briefly as possible ; it would finish the busi- 
ness, wind up the episode, and all would be over. 
He did not write ; that proved it in advance ; 
there had now been two or three posts without a 
letter. He had seen the paper in Boston or in 
New York and it had struck him dumb. It was 
very well for Delia to say that of course he didn't 



THE REVERBERATOB. 185 



write when he was on the sea : how could they 
get his letters even if he did ? There had been 
time before — before he sailed; though Delia 
represented that people never wrote then. They 
were ever so much too busy at the last and they 
were going to see their correspondents in a few 
days anyway. The only missives that came to 
Francie were a copy of the Eeverberator, 
addressed in Mr. Flack's hand and with a great 
inkmark on the margin of the fatal letter, and a 
long note from Mme. de Br^court, received . forty- 
eight hours after the scene at her house. This 
lady expressed herself as follows : 

'* My dear Francie, — I felt very badly after you had 
gone yesterday morning, and I bad twenty minds to go 
and see you. But we have talked it over conscientiously 
and it appears to us that we have no right to take any such 
step till Gaston arrives. The situation is not exclusively 
ours but belongs to him as well, and we feel that we ought 
to make it over to him in as simple and compact a form as 
possible. Therefore, as we regard it, we had better not 
touch it (it's so delicate, isn't it, my poor child ?) but leave 
it just as it is. They think I even exceed my powers in 
writing you these simple lines, and that once your partici- 
pation has been constatSe (which was the only advantage of 
that dreadful scene), everything should stop. But I have 
liked you, Francie, I have believed in you, and I don't 
wish you to be able to say that in spite of the thunderbolt 
you have drawn down upon us I have not treated you with 
tenderness. It is a thunderbolt indeed, my poor and inno> 
cent but disastrous little friend ! We are hearing more of 
it already — ^the horrible Republican papers here have {as 
we know) already got hold of the unspeakable sheet and are 
preparing to reproduce the article : that is such parts of it 
as they may put forward (with innuendoes and sous-entendua 
to eke out the rest) without exposing themselves to a suit 
for defamation. Poor L^onie de Villepreux has been with 



186 THE KEVERBERATOR. 

us constantly and Jeanne and her husband have telegraphed 
that we may expect them day after to-morrow. They are 
evidently immensely imotionnis, for they almost never 
telegraph. They wish so to receive Gaston, We have 
determined all the same to be intensely quiet, and that will 
be sure to be his view. Alphonse and Maxime now 
recognise that it is best to leave Mr. Flack alone, hard as 
it is to keep one^s hands off him. Have you anything to 
lui ffLire aire — to my precious brother when he arrives ? 
But it is foolish of me to ask you that, for jroa had much 
better not answer this. You will no donbt have an oppor- 
tunity to say to him — whatever, mv dear Francie, you can 
say I It will matter comparatively little that you may 
never be idbJa to say it to your friend, with every 
aUowaBcc, 

"Suzanne de BRficouET." 

Francie looked at this letter and tossed it away 
without reading it. Delia picked it up, read it to 
her father, who didn't understand it, and kept it 
in her possession, poring over it as Mr. Flack had 
seen her pore over the cards that were left while 
she was out or over the registers of American 
travellers. They knew of Gaston's arrival by his 
telegraphing from Havre (he came back by the 
French line), and he mentioned the hour — " about 
dinner-time" — at which he should reach Paris. 
Delia, after dinner, made her father take her to 
the circus, so that Francie should be left alone to 
receive her intended, who would be sure to hurry 
round in the course of the evening. The girl 
herself expressed no preference whatever on this 
point, and the idea was one of Dollars masterly 
ones, her flashes of inspiration. There was never 
any difficulty about imposing such conceptions on 



 187 



her father. But at half-past ten, when they 
returned, the young man had not appeared, and 
Francie remained only long enough to say, "I 
told you so ! " with a white face and to march ofif 
to her room with her candle. She locked herself 
in and her sister could not get at her that night. 
It was another of Delia's inspirations not to try, 
after she had felt that the door was fast. She 
forbore^ in the exercise of a great discretion, but 
she herself in the ensuing hours slept not a wink. 
Nevertheless, the next morning, as early as ten 
o'clock, she had the energy to drag her father out 
to the banker's and to keep him out two hours. 
It would be inconceivable now that Gaston should 
not turn up before the d^jiuiier. He did turn 
up ; about eleven o'clock he came in and found 
Francie alone. She perceived, in the strangest 
way, that he was very pale, at the same time that he 
was sunburnt ; and not for an instant did he smile 
at her. It was very certain that there was no 
bright flicker in her own face, and they had the 
most singular, the most unnatural meeting. As 
he entered the room he said — " I could not come 
last evening ; they made it impossible ; they were 
all there and we were up till three o'clock this 
morning." He looked as if he had been through 
terrible things, and it was not simply the strain 
of his attention to so much business in America. 
What passed next she could not remember after- 
wards; it seemed only a few seconds before he 



188  



said to her, slowly, holding her hand (before this 
he had pressed his lips to hers, silently), '' Is it 
true, Francie, what they say (and they swear to 
it !) that you told that blackguard those horrors — 
that that infamous letter is only a report of your 
talk?" 

" I told him everything — it's all me, me, ME! " 
the girl replied, exaltedly, without pretending to 
hesitate an instant as to what he might mean. 

Gaston looked at her with deep eyes ; then he 
walked straight away to the window and remained 
there in silence. Francie said nothing more. 
At last the young man went on, " And I who 
insisted to them that there was no natural 
delicacy like yours ! " 

" Well, you'll never need to insist about any- 
thing any more ! " she cried. And with this she 
dashed out of the room by the nearest door. When 
Delia and Mr. DoSson returned the red salon was 
empty and Francie was again locked into her 
room. But this time her sister forced an entrance. 



si 



XIIT. 

Mr. Dosson, as we know, was meditative, and 
the present occasion could only minister to that 
side of his nature, especially as, so far at least as 
the observation of his daughters went, it had not 
urged him into uncontrollable movement. Bub 
the truth is that the intensity, or rather the con- 
tinuity, of his meditations did engender an act 
which was not perceived by these young ladies, 
though its consequences presently became definite 
enough. While he waited for the Proberts to 
arrive in a phalanx and noted that they failed to do 
so he had plenty of time to ask himself — and also 
to ask Delia — questions about Mr. Flack. So far 
as they were addressed to his daughter they were 
promptly answered, for Delia had been ready from 
the first, as we have seen, to pronounce upon the 
conduct of the young journalist. Her view of it 
was clearer every hour ; there was a difference 
however in the course of action which she judged 
this view to demand. At first he was to be blown 



190  

up for the mess he had got them into (profitless as 
the process might be and vain the satisfaction) ; 
he was to be visited with the harshest chastise- 
ment that the sense of violated confidence could 
inflict. Now he was simply to be dropped, to be 
cut, to be let alone to his dying day: the girl 
quickly recognised that this was a much more dis- 
tinguished way of showing displeasure. It was in 
this manner that she characterised it, in her 
frequent conversations with her father, if that can 
be called conversation which consisted of his 
serenely smoking while she poured forth argu- 
ments which combined both variety and repetition. 
The same cause will produce consequences the 
most diverse : a truth according to which the 
catastrophe that made Delia express freely the 
hope that she might never again see so much as 
the end of Mr. Flack's nose had just the opposite 
effect upon her father. The one thing he wanted 
positively to do at present was to let his eyes 
travel over his young friend's whole person : it 
seemed to him that that would really make him 
feel better. If there had been a discussion about 
this the girl would have kept the field, for she had 
the advantage of being able to tell her reasons, 
whereas her father could not have put his into 
words. Delia had touched on her deepest con- 
viction in saying to Francie that the correspondent 
of the Beverberator had played them that trick 
on purpose to get them into such trouble with the 



 191 

Proberts that he might see his own hopes bloom 
again under cover of their disaster. This had 
many of the appearances of a strained interpreta- 
tion, but that did not prevent Delia from placing 
it before her father several times an hour. It 
mattered little that he should remark, in return, 
that he didn't see what good it could do Mr. Flack 
that Francie — and he and Delia, Tor all he could 
guess — should be disgusted with him; to Mr. 
Dosson's mind that was such a queer way of 
reasoning. Delia maintained that she understood 
perfectly, though she couldn't explain — and at any 
rate she didn't want the manoeuvrinof creature to 
come flying back from Nice, She didn't want 
him to know that there had been a scandal, that 
they had a grievance against him, that any one 
had so much as heaid of his article or cared what 
he published or didn't publish: above all she 
didn't want him to know that the Proberts had 
cooled oflf. Mixed up with this high rigour on 
Miss Dosson's part was the oddest secret com- 
placency of reflection that in consequence of what 
Mr. Flack had published the great American 
community was in a position to know with what 
fine folks Francie and she were associated. She 
hoped that some of the people who used to call on 
them when they were " oflf to-morrow " would take 
the lesson to heart. 

While she glowed with this consolation as well 
as with the resentment for which it was required 



192 THE KEVERBERATOR. 



her father quietly addressed a few words, by 
letter, to George Flack. This communication 
was not of a minatory order; it expressed 
on the contrary the loose sociability which was 
the essence of Mr. Dosson's nature. He wanted 
to see Mr. Flack, to talk the whole thing over, 
and the desire to hold him to an account would 
play but a small part in the interview. It was 
much more definite to him that the soreness of 
the Proberts was a kind of unexpected insanity 
(so little did his experience match it), than that 
a newspaper-man had misbehaved in trying to 
turn out an attractive article. As the newspaper- 
man happened to be the person with whom he 
had most consorted for some time back he felt 
drawn to him in the presence of a new problem, 
and somehow it did not seem to Mr. Dosson to 
disqualify him as a source of comfort that it was 
just he who had been the fountain of injury. 
The injury was a sort of emanation of the crazy 
Proberts. Moreover Mr. Dosson could not dislike 
at such short notice, a man who had smoked 
so many of his cigars, ordered so many of his 
dinners and helped him so loyally to spend his 
money : such acts constituted a bond, and when 
there was a bond people gave it a little jerk | 

in time of trouble. His letter to Nice was the I 

little jerk. ^ 

The morning after Francie had turned her back 
on Gaston and left him planted in the salon (he 



 193 

Lad remained ten minutes, to see if she would 
reappear, and then had marched out of the hotel), 
she received by the first post a letter from him, 
written the evening before. It conveyed his deep 
regret that their meeting in the morning should 
have been of •so painful, so unnatural a character, 
and the hope that she did not consider, as her 
strange behaviour had seemed to suggest, that 
she had anything to complain of. There was too 
much he wanted to say and above all too much 
he wanted to ask, for him to consent to the indefi- 
nite postponement of a necessary interview. There 
were explanations, assurances, de part et cHautre, 
with which it was manifestly impossible that 
either of them should dispense. He would there- 
fore propose that she should see him, and not be 
wanting in patience to that end, on the following 
evening. He did not propose an earlier moment 
because his hands were terribly full at home. 
Frankly speaking, the state of things there was 
of the worst. Jane and her husband had just 
arrived and had made him a violent, an unexpected 
scene. Two of the French newspapers had got 
hold of the article and had given the most perfi- 
dious extracts. His father had not stirred out of 
the house, had not put his foot inside of a club, 
for more than a week. Marguerite and Maxime 
were immediately to start for England, for an 
indefinite stay. They couldn't face their life in 
Paris. For himself, he was in the breach, fighting 

o 



194  

hard and making, on her behalf, asseverations 
which it was impossible for him to believe, in 
spite of the dreadful defiant confession she had 
appeared to throw at him in the morning, that 
she would not virtually confirm. He would come 
in as soon after nine as possible ; the morrow, up 
to that time, would be severe in the Cours la 
Heine, and he begged her in the meantime not 
to doubt of his perfect tenderness. So far from 
his distress having made it less he had never yet 
felt so much that she had, in his affection, a 
treasure of indulgence to draw upon. 

A couple of hours after this letter arrived 
Francie lay on one of the satin sofas with her eyes 
closed and her hand clinched upon it in her pocket. 
Delia sat near her with a needle in her fingers, 
certain morsels of silk and ribbon in her lap, several 
pins in her mouth, and her attention wandering 
constantly from her work to her sisters face. 
The weather was now so completely vernal that 
Mr. Dosson was able to sit in the court, and he 
had lately resumed this practice, in which he 
was presumably at the present moment absorbed. 
DeUa had lowered her needle and was watching 
Francie, to see if she were not asleep — she had 
been perfectly still for so long — ^when her glance 
was drawn to the door, which she heard pushed open. 
Mr. Flack stood there, looking from one to the 
other of the young ladies, as if to see which of 
them would be most agreeably surprised by his visit. 



THE KEVERBERATOR. 195 

"I saw your father down stairs — he says it's 
all right," said the journalist, advancing and smil- 
ing. " He told me to come straight up — I had 
quite a talk with him." 

" All right — all right ? " Delia Dosson repeated, 
springing up. "Yes, indeed, I should say so." 
Then she checked herself, asking in another 
manner : " Is that so ? father sent you up ? " 
And then, in still another: "Well, have you 
had a good time at Nice ? " 

"You'd better all come down and see. It's 
lovely down there. If you'll come down I'll go 
right back. I guess you want a change," Mr. 
Flack went on. He spoke to Delia but he looked 
at Francie, who showed she had not been asleep 
by the quick consciousness with which she raised 
herself on her sofa. She gazed at the visitor with 
parted lips, but she said nothing. He hesitated a 
moment, then came toward her, smiling, with his 
hand out. His bright eyes were brighter than 
ever, but they had an odd appearance of being 
smaller, like penetrating points. "Your father 
has told me all about it. Did you ever hear of 
anything so ridiculous ? " 

"All about what? — all about what?" said 
Delia, whose attempt to represent happy ignorance 
seemed likely to be spoiled by an intromission of 
ferocity. She might succeed in appearing ignorant, 
but she could scarcely succeed in appearing 
happy. Francie had risen to her feet and had 

2 



196  

suffered Mr. Flack to possess himself for a moment 
of her hand, but neither of the girls had asked 
the young man to sit down. " I thought you were 
going to stay a month at Nice," Delia continued. 

"Well, I was, but your father's letter started 
me up." 

"Fathers letter?" 

" He wrote me about the row — didn't you know 
it? Then I broke. You didn't suppose I was 
going to stay down there when there were such 
times up here." 

" Gracious ! " Delia exclaimed. 

" Is it pleasant at Nice ? Is it very gay ? Isn't 
it very hot now?" Francie asked. 

" Oh, it's all right. But I haven't come up here 
to talk about Nice, have I ? " 

•* Why not, if we want to ? " Delia inquired. 

Mr. Flack looked at her for a moment very 
hard, in the whites of the eyes ; then he replied, 
turning back to her sister: "Anything you like, 
Miss Francie. With you one subject is as good 
as another. Can't we sit down? Can't we be 
comfortable?" he added. 

" Comfortable ? of course we can ! " cried Delia, 
but she remained erect while Francie sank upon 
the sofa again and their companion took posses- 
sion of the nearest chair. 

" Do you remember what I told you once, that 
the people will have the plums ? " George Flack 
asked of the younger girl. 



 197 

She looked for an instant as if she were trying 
to recollect what he had told her; then she said, 
" Did father write to you ? " 

" Of course he did. That's why I'm here/' 

" Poor father, sometimes he doesn't know what 
to do I " Delia remarked. 

"He told me the Reverberator has made a 
sensation. I guessed that for myself, when I saw 
the way the papers here were after it. That thing 
will go the round you'll see ! What brought me 
was learning from him that they have got their 
backs up." 

" What on earth are you talking about ? " cried 
Delia. 

Mr. Flack turned his eyes on hers in the same 
way as a moment before; Francie sat there 
serious, looking hard at the carpefc. " What game 
are you trying. Miss Delia? It ain't true you 
care what I wrote, is it ? " he pursued, addressing 
himself again to Francie. 

She raised her eyes. "Did you write it 
yourself ? " 

"What do you care what he wrote — or what 
does any one care ? " Delia broke in. 

" It has done the paper more good than any- 
thing — every one is so interested," said Mr. Flack, 
in the tone of reasonable explanation. " And you 
don't feel that you have anything to complain of, 
do you ? " he added, to Francie, kindly. 

"Do you mean because I told you?" 



198  

"Why, certainly. Didn't it all spring out of 
that lovely drive and that walk in the Bois that 
we had, when you took me to see your portrait ? 
Didn't you understand that I wanted you to know 
that the public would appreciate a column or 
two about Mr. Waterlow's new picture, and about 
you as the subject of it, and about your being 
engaged to a member of the grand monde, and 
about what was going on in the grand monde, 
which would naturally attract attention through 
that ? Why, Miss Francie, you talked as if you 
did." 

"Did I talk a great deal?" asked Francie. 

"Why, most freely — it was too lovely. Don't 
you remember when we sat there in the Bois ? " 

" Oh, rubbish ! " Delia ejaculated. 

" Yes, and Mme. de Cliche passed." 

"And you told me she was scandalised. And 
we laughed — it struck us as idiotic. I said it 
was affected and pretentious. Your father tells 
me she is scandalised now — she and all the rest 
of them — at their names appearing in the B.ever- 
berator. I don't hesitate to declare that that's 
affected and pretentious too. It ain't genuine — 
and if it is it doesn't count. They pretend to be 
shocked because it looks exclusive, but in point 
of fact they like it first-rate." 

"Are you talking about that old piece in 
the paper? Mercy, wasn't that dead and buried 
days and days ago ? " Delia ejaculated. She 



 199 

hovered there in a fever of irritation, fidgeted 
by the revelation that her father had summoned 
Mr. Flack to Paris, which struck her almost like 
a treachery because it seemed to denote a plan. 
A plan, and an uncommunicated plan, on Mr. 
Dosson's part was unnatural and alarming; and 
there was further provocation in his appearing 
to shirk the responsibility of it by not having 
come up, at such a moment, with Mr. Flack. 
Delia was impatient to know what he wanted 
anyway. Did he want to slide back to a common, 
though active, young man ? Did he want to put 
Mr. Flack forward with a shallow extemporised 
optimism as a substitute for the alienated Gaston ? 
If she had not been afraid that something still more 
complicating than anything that had happened yet 
might come to pass between her two companions 
in case of her leaving them together she would 
have darted down to the court to appease her con- 
jectures, to challenge her farther and tell him she 
should be very much obliged to him if he wouldn't 
meddle. She felt liberated however, the next 
moment, for something occurred that struck 
her as a quick indication of her sister s present 
emotion. 

" Do you know the view I take of the matter, 
according to what your father has told me ? " Mr. 
Flack inquired. " I don't mean that he suggested 
the interpretation, but my own knowledge of 
the world (as the world is constituted over here !) 



200 THE REVERBERATOK. 

forces it upon my mind. They are scandalised, 
they are horrified. They never heard anything so 
dreadful. Miss Francie, that ain't good enough ! 
They know what's in the papers every day of 
their lives and they know how it got there. They 
are simply making the thing a pretext to break 
— ^because they don't think you're fashionable 
enough. They're delighted to strike a pretext they 
can work, and they're all as merry together round 
there as a lot of boys when school don't keep. 
That's my view of the business." 

'* Oh — how can you say such a thing ? " drawled 
Francie, with a tremor in her voice that struck her 
sister. Her eyes met Delia's at the same moment, 
and this young woman's heart bounded with the 
sense that she was safe. Mr. Flack's indelicacy 
attempted to prove too much (though Miss Dosson 
had crude notions about the license of the press 
she felt, even as an untutored woman, what a 
false step he was now taking), and it seemed to 
her that Francie, who was revolted (the way she 
looked at her, in horror, showed that), could be 
trusted to check his advance. 

'* What does it matter what he says, my dear ? " 
she cried. " Do make him drop the subject — he's 
talking very wild. I'm going down to see what 
father means — I never heard of anything so flat ! " 
At the door she paused a moment to add mutely, 
with a pressing glance, " Now just wipe him out 
— mind ! " It was the same injunction she had 



THE KEVERBERATOR. 201 

launched at her from afar that day, a year before, 
they all dined at Saint-Germain, and she could 
remember how effective it had been then. The 
next moment she flirted out. 

As soon as she had gone Mr. Flack moved 
nearer to Francie. " Now look here, you are not 
going back on me, are you ? " 

" Going back on you — what do you mean ? " 
" Ain't we together in this thing ? Surely we 



! are." 



" Together — ^together ? " Francie repeated, look- 
ing at him. 

" Don't you remember what I said to you — in 
the clearest terms — ^before we went to Waterlow's, 
before our drive ? I notified you that I should 
make use of the whole thing." 

" Oh, yes, I understood — it was all for that. I 
told them so. I never denied it." 

*' You told them so?" 

" When they were crying and going on. I told 
them I knew it — I told them I gave you the 
tip, as they say. * 

She felt Mr. Flack's eyes on her, strangely, as 
she spoke these words ; then he was still nearer 
to her — he had taken her hand. " Ah, you're too 
sweet!" She disengaged her hand and in the 
effort she sprang up ; but he, rising too, seemed to 
press always nearer — she had a sense (it was dis- 
agreeable) that he was demonstrative — so that she 
retreated a little before him. " They were all 



202  

there roaring and raging, trying to make you 
believe you have outraged them ? " 

"All but young Mr. Probert. Certainly they 
don t like it/' 

"The cowards!" said George Flack. **And 
where was young Mr. Probert ? " 

" He was away — I've told you — in America." 

" Ah, yes, yonr father told me. But now he has 
come back doesn't he like it either ? " 

"I don't know, Mr. Flack," Francie replied, 
impatiently. 

" Well, I do, then. He's a coward too — he'll do 
what his papa tells him — and the countess and 
the duchess and all the rest : he'll just back down 
— he'll give you up." 

" I can't talk to you about that," said Francie. 

"Why not? why is he such a sacred subject, 
when we are together ? You can't alter that. It 
was too lovely, your standing up for me — ^your 
not denying me ! " 

" You put in things I never said. It seems to 
me it was very different," the girl remarked. 

"Everything ts different when it's printed. 
What else would be the good of papers ? Besides, 
it wasn't I ; it was a lady who helps me here — 
you've heard me speak of her : Miss Topping. She 
wants so much to know you — she wants to talk 
with you." 

" And will she publish that ? " Francie asked, 
gravely. 



 203 

Mr. Flack stared a moment. " Lord, how they 
have worked on you I And do you think it's 
bad ? " 

*' Do I think what's bad ? " 

" Why, the letter we are talking about." 

" Well— I don't like it." 

" Do you think I was dishonourable ? " 

The girl made no answer to this, but after a 
moment she said, '* Why do you come here this 
way — why do you ask me such questions ? " 

He hesitated ; then he broke out : " Because I 
love you — don't you know that ? " 

" Oh, please don't ! " she almost moaned, turning 
away. 

" Why won't you understand it — why won't you 
understand the rest? Don't you see how it has 
worked round — the heartless brutes they've turned 
into, and the way our life — ^yours and mine — is 
bound to be the same ? Don't you see the base 
way they treat you and that / only want to do 
anything in the world for you ? " 

Francie made no immediate response to this 
appeal, but after a moment she began : " Why did 
you ask me so many questions that day ? " 

" Because I always ask questions — it's my 
business to ask them. Haven't you always seen 
me ask you and ask every one all I could ? Don't 
you know they are the very foundation of my 
work ? I thought you sympathised with my work 
so much — you used to tell me you did." 



204  

" Well, I did/' said Francie. 

" You put it in the past, I see. You don't then 
any more." 

If this remark was on her visitor's part the sign 
of a rare assurance the girl's gentleness was still 
unruffled by it. She hesitated, she even smiled ; 
then she replied, " Oh yes, I do — only not so 
much." 

" They have worked on you ; but I should have 
thought they would have disgusted you. I don't 
care — even a little sympathy will do — whatever 
you've got left." He paused, looking at her, but 
she remained silent ; so he went on : " There was 
no obligation for you to answer my questions — 
you might have shut me up, that day, with a 
word." 

" Really ? " Francie asked, with all her sweet 
good faith in her face. " I thought I had to — for 
fear I should appear ungrateful." 

'' Ungrateful ? " 

" Why to you — after what you had done. Don't 
you remember that it was you that introduced us 

? " And she paused, with a kind of weary 

delicacy. 

"Not to those snobs that are screaming like 
frightened peacocks. I beg your pardon — I haven't 
that on my conscience ! " 

" Well, you introduced us to Mr. Waterlow and 
he introduced us to — to his friends," Francie 
explained, blushing, as if it were a fault, for the 



 205 

inexactness engendered by her magnanimity. 
" That's why I thought I ought to tell you what 
you'd like/' 

" Why, do you suppose if I'd known where that 
first visit of ours to Waterlow was going to bring 

you out I'd have taken you within fifty miles " 

He stopped suddenly; then in another tone, 
" Lord, there's no one like you ! And you told 
them it was all you?" 

" Never mind what I told them." 

" Miss Francie," said George Flack, " if you'll 
marry me I'll never ask a question again. I'll go 
into some other business.'' 

" Then you didn't do it on purpose ? " Francie 
asked. 

" On purpose ? " 

" To get me into a quarrel with them — so that 
I might be free again." 

" Well, of all the ideas ! " the young man 

exclaimed, staring. " Your mind never produced 
that — it was your sister's." 

" Wasn't it natural it should occur to me, since 
if, as you say, you would never consciously have 
been the means " 

" Ah, but I was the means ! " Mr. Flack 
interrupted. "We must go, after all, by what 
did happen." 

" Well, I thanked you when I drove with you 
and let you draw me out. So we're square, aren't 
we ? " The term Francie used was a colloquialism 



206  

generally associated with levity, but her face, as 
she spoke, was none the less deeply serious — 
serious even to pain. 

" We're square ? " Mr. Flack repeated. 

" I don't think you ought to ask for anything 
more. Good-bye." 

*' Good-bye ? Never ! " cried the young man. 

He had an air of flushing with disappointment 
which really showed that he had come with a 
certain confidence of success. 

Something in the way Francie repeated her 
" Good-bye ! " indicated that she perceived this 
and that in the vision of such a confidence 
there was little to please her. " Do go away ! " 
she broke out. 

''Well, I'll come back very soon," said Mr. 
Flack, taking his hat. 

" Please don't — I don't like it." She had now 
contrived to put a wide space between them. 

" Oh, you tormentress ! " he groaned. He went 
toward the door, but before he reached it he 
turned round. " Will you tell me this, anyway ? 
Are you going to marry Mr. Probert — after 
this ? " 

" Do you want to put that in the paper ? " 

" Of course I do— and say you said it !" Mr. 
Flack held up his head. 

They stood lookiug at each other across the 
large room. " Well then — I ain't. There ! " 

" That's all right," said Mr. Flack, going out. 



XIV. 

When Gaston Probert came in that evening he 
was received by Mr. Dosson and Delia, and when 
he asked where Francie was he was told by Delia 
that she would show herself half an hour later. 
Francie had instructed her sister that as Gaston 
would have, first of all, information to give their 
father about the business he had transacted in 
America he wouldn't care for a lot of women in 
the room. When Delia made this speech before 
Mr. Dosson the old man protested that he was not 
in any hurry for the business ; what he wanted to 
find out most was whether he had a good time — 
whether he liked it over there. Gaston might 
have liked it, but he did not look as if he had had 
a very good time. His face told of reverses, of 
suffering ; and Delia declared to him that if she 
had not received his assurance to the contrary she 
would have believed he was right down sick. He 
confessed that he had been very sick at sea and 
was still feeling the effect of it, but insisted that 



208  

there was nothing the matter with him now. He 
sat for some time with Mr. Dosson and Delia, and 
never once alluded to the cloud that hung over 
their relations. The girl had schooled her father 
to reticence on this point, and the manner in 
which she had descended upon him in the morning, 
after Mr, Flack had come up stairs, was a lesson 
he was not likely soon to forget. It had been 
impressed upon him that she was indeed wiser 
than he could pretend to be, and he was now 
mindful that he must not speak of the " piece in 
the paper " unless young Probert should speak of 
it first. When Delia rushed down to him in the 
court she began by askiog him categorically whom 
he had wished to do good to by sending Mr. Flack 
up to their parlour. To Francie or to her ? Why, 
the way they felt then, they detested his very 
name. To Mr. Flack himself? Why, he had 
simply exposed him to the biggest snub he had 
ever got in his life. 

" Well, hanged if I understand ! '* poor Mr. 
Dosson had said. " I thought you liked the piece 
— you think it's so queer they don't like it." 
" They," in the parlance of the Dossons, now never 
meant anything but the Proberts in congress 
assembled. 

" I don't think anything is queer but you ! " 
Delia had retorted ; and she had let her father 
know that she had left Francie in the very act of 
"handling" Mr. Flack. 



THE REVEKBEKATOR. 209 

*'Is that so?" the old gentleman had asked, 
helplessly. 

Francie's visitor came down a few minutes later 
and passed through the court and out of the hotel 
without looking at them. Mr. Dosson had been 
going to call after him, but Delia checked him 
with a violent pinch. The unsociable manner of 
the young journalist's departure added to Mr. 
Dosson's sense of the mystery of things. I think 
this may be said to have been the only incident in 
the whole business that gave him a personal pang. 
He remembered how many of his cigars he had 
smoked with Mr. Flack and how universal a parti- 
cipant he had made him. This struck him as the 
failure of friendship, and not the publication of 
details about the Proberts. Deep in Mr. Dosson's 
spirit was a sense that if these people had done 
bad things they ought to be ashamed of themselves 
and he couldn't pity them, and if they hadn't 
done them there was no need of making such a 
rumpus about other people knowing. It was there- 
fore, in spite of the young man's rough exit, still 
in the tone of American condonation that he had 
observed to Delia : " He says that's what they like 
over there and that it stands to reason that if you 
start a paper you've got to give them what they 
like. If you want the people with you, you've 
got to be with the people." 

"Well, there are a good many people in the 
world. I don't think the Proberts are with us much." 



210  



'* Oh, he doesn't mean them," said Mr. Dosson. 

"WeU, Ido!" cried Delia. 

At one of the ormolu tables, near a lamp with a 
pink shade, Gaston insisted on making at least 
a partial statement. He did not say that he might 
never have another chance, but Delia felt with 
despair that this idea was in his mind. He was 
very gentle, very polite, but distinctly cold, she 
thought ; he was intensely depressed and for half 
an hour uttered not the least little pleasantry. 
There was no particular occasion for that when he 
talked about " preferred bonds " with her father. 
This was a language Delia could not translate, 
though she had heard it from childhood. He had 
a great many papers to show Mr. Dosson, records 
of the mission of which he had acquitted himself, 
but Mr. Dosson pushed them into the drawer of 
the ormolu table with the remark that he guessed 
they were all right. Now, after the fact, he ap- 
peared to attach but little importance to Gaston's 
achievements — an attitude which Delia perceived 
to be slightly disconcerting to the young man. 
Delia understood it : she had an instinctive sense 
that her father knew a great deal more than Gaston 
could tell him even about the work he had com- 
mitted to him, and also that there was in such 
punctual settlements an eagerness, a literalism 
totally foreign to Mr. Dosson's domestic habits. 
If Gaston had cooled off he wanted at least to be 
able to say that he had rendered them services in 



THE BEVERBERATOR 211 

America ; but now her father, for the moment at 
least, scarcely appeared to think his services worth 
speaking of: a circumstance that left him with 
more of the responsibility for his cooling. What 
Mr. Dosson wanted to know was how everything 
had struck him over there, especially the Pickett 
Building and the parlour-cars and Niagara and 
the hotels he had instructed him to go to, giving 
him an introduction in two or three cases to the 
gentleman in chai'ge of the office. It was in relation 
to these themes that Gaston was guilty of a want of 
spring, as the girl phrased it to herself; that he 
evinced no superficial joy. He declared however, 
repeatedly, that it was a most extraordinary country 
—most extraordinary and far beyond anything he 
had had any conception of. " Of course I didn't 
like everything,*' he said, ** any more than I like 
everything anywhere." 

"Well, what didn't you like?" Mr. Dosson 
genially inquired. 

Gaston Probert hesitated. "Well, the light 
for instance." 

"The light— the electric?" 

"No, the solar! I thought it rather hard, 
too much like the scratching of a slate-pencil." 
As Mr. Dosson looked vague at this, as if the 
reference were to some enterprise (a great lamp- 
company) of which he had not heard — conveying 
a suggestion that he was perhaps staying away 
too long, Gaston immediately added : " I really 

p 2 



212  

think Francie might come in. I wrote to her 
that I wanted particularly to see her." 

"I will go and call her — 1*11 make her come/' 
said Delia, going out. She left her companions 
together and Gaston returned to the subject of Mr. 
Munster, Mr. Dosson*s former partner, to whom he 
had taken a letter and who had shown him every 
sort of civility. Mr. Dosson was pleased at this ; 
nevertheless he broke out, suddenly — 

" Look here, you know ; if youVe got anything 
to say that you don't think very acceptable you 
had better say it to me!' Gaston coloured, "but 
his reply was checked by Delias quick return. 
She announced that her sister would be obliged 
if he would go into the little dining-room — he 
would find her there. She had something to 
communicate to him that she could mention 
only in private. It was very comfortable ; there 
was a lamp and a fire. "Well, I guess she can 
take care of herself!" Mr. Dosson, at this, com- 
mented, laughing. " What does she want to say 
to him ? " he demanded, when Gaston had passed 
out. 

" Gracious knows ! She won't tell me. But it's 
too flat, at his age, to live in such terror." 

"In such terror?" 
Why, of your father. You've got to choose.'* 
How, to choose ? " 

Why, if there's a person you like and ho 
doesn't like." 



it 

<c 
it 



 213 

" You mean you can't choose your father," said 
Mr. Dosson, thoughtfully. 

" Of course you can't." 

"Well then, please don't like any one. But 
perhaps / should like him," added Mr. Dosson, 
faithful to his cheerful tradition. 

" I guess you'd have to 1 " said Delia. 

In the small salle-d'Tnanger, when Gaston went 
in, Francie was standing by the empty table, and 
as soon as she saw him she said — " You can't say 
I didn't tell you that I should do something. I 
did nothing else, from the first. So you were 
warned again and again; you knew what to 
expect." 

" Ah, don't say that again ; if you, knew how 
it acts on my nerves!" the young man groaned. 
"You speak as if you had done it on purpose — 
to carry out your absurd threat." 

" Well, what does it matter, when it's all over ? " 

" It's not all over. Would to God it were ! " 

The girl stared. "Don't you know what I 
sent for you to come in here for? To bid you 
good-bye." 

" Francie, what has got into you ? " he said. 
"What deviltry, what poison?" It would have 
been a singular sight to an observer, the opposi- 
tion of these young figures, so fresh, so candid, so 
meant for confidence, but now standing apart and 
looking at each other in a wan defiance which 
hardened their faces. 



214  



" Don't they despise me — don't they hate me ? 
You do yourself ! Certainly you'll be glad for me 
to break oflf and spare you such a difficulty, such 
a responsibility." 

"I don't understand; it's like some hideous 
dream I " Gaston Probert cried. " You act as if 
you were doing something for a wager, and you talk 
so. I don't believe it — I don't believe a word of it." 

" What don't you believe ? " 

" That you told him — that you told him know- 
ingly. If you'll take that back (it's too monstrous !) 
if you'll deny it and declare you were practised upon 
and surprised, everything can still be arranged." 

" Do you want me to lie ? " asked Francie Dosson. 
" I thought you would like it." 

" Oh, Francie, Francie ! " moaned the wretched 
youth, with tears in his eyes, 

" What can be arranged ? What do you mean 
by everything ? " she went on. 

"Why, they'll accept it; they'll ask for 
nothing more. It's your participation they can't 
forgive." 

" They can't ? Why do you talk to me about 
them ? I'm not engaged to them." 

" Oh, Francie, I am ! And it's they who are 
buried beneath that filthy rubbish ! " 

She flushed at this characterisation of Mr. Flack's 
epistle ; then she said, in a softer voice : " I'm 
very sorry — very sorry indeed. But evidently I'm 
not delicate." 



 215 

He looked at her, helpless and bitter. "It's 
not the newspapers, in your country, that would 
have made you so. Lord, they're too incredible ! 
And the ladies have them on their tables." 
■ *' You told me we couldn't here — that the Paris 
ones are too bad," said Francie. 

" Bad they are, God knows ; but they have never 
published anything like that — poured forth such a 
flood of impudence on decent, quiet people who 
only want to be left alone." 

Francie sank into a chair by the table, as if she 
were too tired to stand longer, and with her arms 
spread out on the lamp-lit plush she looked up at 
him. " Was it there you saw it ? " 

" Yes, a few days before I sailed. I hated them 

from the moment I got there 1 looked at them 

very little. But that was a chance. I opened 
the paper in the hall of an hotel (there was a big 
marble floor and spittoons I) and my eyes fell upon 
that horror. It made me ill." 

" Did you think it was me ? " 

" About as soon as I supposed it was my father. 
But I was too mystified, too tormented." 

" Then why didn't you write to me, if you 
didn't think it was me?" 

" Write to you ? I wrote to you every three days." 

"Not after that." 

" Well, I may have omitted a post at the last. 
— I thought it might be Delia," Gaston added 
in a moment. 



216  

" Oh, she didn't want me to do it — the day I 
went with him, the day I told him. She tried 
to prevent me." 

" Would to God then she had ! " 

" Haven't you told them she's delicate too ? "" 
Francie asked, in her strange tone. 

Gaston made no answer to this; but he broke 
out — " What power, in heaven's name, has he got 
over you ? What spell has he worked ? " 

"He's an old friend — he helped us ever so 
much when we were first in Paris." 

"But, my dearest child, what friends — what a 
man to know!" 

" If we hadn't known him we shouldn't have 
known you. Remember that it was Mr. Flack who 
brought us that day to Mr. Waterlow's." 

" Oh, you would have come some other way," 
said Gaston. 

"Not in the least. We knew nothing about 
any other way. He helped us in everything — he 
showed us everything. That was why I told him 
— when he asked me. I liked him for what he 
had done." 

Gaston, who had now also seated himself, 
listened to this attentively. "I see. It was a 
kind of delicacy." 

"Oh, a kind!" She smiled. 

He remained a little with his eyes on her face. 
"Was it for me?" 

" Of course it was for you." 



 217 

" Ah, how strange you are ! " he exclaimed, 
tenderly. " Such contradictions — on sy perd, I 
wish you would say that to them, that way. 
Everything would be right." 

" Never, never ! " said the girl. " I have wronged 
them, and nothing will ever be the same again. 
It was fatal. If I felt as they do I too would 
loathe the person who should have done such a 
thing. It doesn't seem to me so bad — the thing 
in the paper; but you know best. You must go 
back to them. You know best," she repeated. 

" They were the last, the last people in France, 
to do it to. The sense of excruciation — of pollu- 
tion," Gaston rejoined, making his reflections 
audibly. 

"Oh, you needn't tell me — I saw them all 
there!" Francie exclaimed. 

" It must have been a dreadful scene. But you 
didn't brave them, did you?" 

"Brave them — what are you talking about? 
To you that idea is incredible ! " 

"No, it isn't," he said, gently. 

" Well,'go back to them — ^go back," she repeated. 
At this he half threw himself across the table, 
to seize her hands; but she drew away and, as 
he came nearer, pushed her chair back, springing 
up. " You know you didn't come here to tell me 
you are ready to give them up." 

He rose to his feet, slowly. "To give them 
up? I have been battling with them till I'm 



218 THE KEVERBERATOR. 

II - - - ' 

ready to drop. You don't know how they feel — 
how they must feel/' 

"Oh yes, I do. All this has made me older, 
every hour." 

" It has made you more beautiful," said Gaston 
Probert. 

"I don't care. Nothing will induce me to 
consent to any sacrifice." 

"Some sacrifice there must be. Give me time 
— ^give me time, I'll manage it. I only wish they 
hadn t seen you there in the Bois." 

" In the Bois ? " 

" That Marguerite hadn't seen you — with that 
blackguard. That's the image they can't get over." 

"I see you can't either, Gaston. Well, I was 
there and I was very happy. That's all I can say. 
You must take me as I am." 

" Don't — don't ; you infuriate me ! " he pleaded, 
frowning. 

Francie had seemed to soften, but she was in 
a sudden flame again. "Of course I do, and I 
shall do it again. We are too different. Every- 
thing makes you so. You. can't give them tip 
— ever, ever. Good-bye — ^good-bye ! That's all 
I wanted to tell you." 

"I'll go and throttle him!" Gaston said, 
lugubriously. 

" Very well, go ! Good-bye." She had stepped 
quickly to the door and had already opened it, 
vanishing as she had done the last time. 



 219 

" Francie, Francie ! *' he exclaimed, following 
her into the passage. The door was not the one 
that led into the salon; it communicated with 
the other apartments. The girl had plunged 
into these — he already heard her locking herself 
in. Presently he went away, without taking leave 
of Mr. Dosson and Delia. 

" Why, he acts just like Mr. Flack," said the 
old man, when they discovered that the interview 
in the dining-room had come to an end. 

The next day was a bad day for Charles 
Waterlow; his work, in the Avenue de Villiers, 
was terribly interrupted. Gaston Probert invited 
himself to breakfast with him at noon and re- 
mained till the time at which the artist usually 
went out — an extravagance partly justified by a 
previous separation of several weeks. Durino* 
these three or four hours Gaston walked up and 
down the studio, while Waterlow either sat or 
stood before his easel. He put his host out 
vastly and acted on his nerves, but Waterlow 
was patient with him because he was very sorry 
for him, feeling the occasion to be a great crisis. 
His compassion, it is true, was slightly tinged 
with contempt: nevertheless he looked at the 
case generously, perceived it to be one in which a 
friend should be a friend — in which he, in par- 
ticular, might see the distracted fellow through. 
Gaston was in a fever ; he broke out into passion- 
ate arguments which were succeeded by fits of 



220  

gloomy silence. He roamed about continually, 
with his hands in his pockets and his hair in a 
tangle; he could take neither a decision nor a 
momentary rest. It struck Waterlow more than 
ever before that he was after all essentially a 
foreigner; he had the sensibility of one, the 
sentimental candour, the need for sympathy, the 
communicative despair. A real young Anglo- 
Saxon would have buttoned himself up in his 
embarrassment and been dry and awkward and 
capable and unconscious of a drama ; but Gaston 
was effusive and appealing and ridiculous and 
graceful — natural, above all, and egotistical. 
Indeed, a real young Anglo-Saxon would not 
have had this particular embarrassment at all 
for he would not have parted to such an extent 
with his moral independence. It was this weak- 
ness that excited Waterlow's secret scorn : family 
feeling was all very well, but to see it erected 
into a superstition affected him very much in 
the same way as the image of a blackamoor upon 
his knees before a fetish. He now measured for 
the first time the root it had taken in Gaston's 
nature. To act like a man. the poor fellow must 
pull up the root, but the operation was terribly 
painful — was attended with cries and tears and 
contortions, with baffling scruples and a sense 
of sacrilege, the sense of siding with strangers 
against his own flesh and blood. Every now and 
then he broke out — " And if you see her — as she 



THE REVEKBEKATOK. 221 

looks just now (she's too lovely — too touching!) 
you would see how right I was originally — when 
I found in her such a revelation of that type, 
the French Renaissance, you know, the one we 
talked about." But he reverted with at least 
equal frequency to the idea that he seemed 
unable to throw oflF, that it was like something 
done on purpose, with a refinement of cruelty; 
such an accident to them, of all people on earth, 
the very last, the very last, those who he verily 
believed would feel it more than any family in 
the world. When Waterlow asked what made 
them so exceptionally ticklish he could only say 
that they just happened to be so ; it was his father's 
influence, his very genius, the worship of privacy 
and good manners, a hatred of all the new 
familiarities and profanations. The artist in- 
quired further, at last, rather wearily, what in 
two words was the practical question his friend 
desired that he should consider. Whether he 
should be justified in throwing over Miss Francina 
— was that it ? 

" Oh heavens, no ! For what sneak do you take 
me ? She made a mistake, but any one might do 
that. It's whether it strikes you that I should be 
justified in throwing them over." 

"It depends upon the sense you attach to 
justification." 

"1 mean — should I be miserably unhappy — 
would it be in their power to make me so ? " 



222  

" To try— certainly, if they are capable of any- 
thing so nasty. The only honourable conduct for 
them is to let you alone." 

"Ah, they won't do that — they like me too 
much ! " Gaston said, ingenuously. 

" It's an odd way of liking. The best way to 
show that would be to let you marry the girl you 
love." 

" Certainly — ^but they are profoundly convinced 
that she represents such dangers, such vulgarities, 
such possibilities of doing other things of the same 
sort, that it's upon t}iem my happiness would be 
shattered." 

" Well, if you yourself have no secret for per- 
suading them of the contrary I'm afraid I can't 
teach you one." 

" Yes, I ought to do it myself," said Gaston, in 
the candour of his meditations. Then he went on, 
in his torment of inconsistency — " They never 
believed in her from the first. My father was 
perfectly definite about it. At heart they never 
accepted her ; they only pretended to do so because 
I guaranteed that she was incapable of doing a 
thing that could ever displease them. Then no 
sooner was my back turned than she perpetrated 
that ! " 

"That was your folly," Waterlow remarked, 
painting away. 

" My folly — to turn my back ? " 

" No, no— to guarantee." 



THE REVEKBERATOR. 223 

" My dear fellow — ^wouldn't you ? " Gaston asked, 
staring. 

" Never in the world." 

" You would have thought her capable — — ? " 

" CapcMlissima ! and I shouldn't have cared." 

" Do you think her then capable of doing it 
again ? " 

" I don't care if she is ; that's the least of all 
questions." 

" The least ? " 

"Ah, don't you see, wretched youth/' said 
Waterlow, pausing from his work and looking 
up — "don't you see that the question of her 
possibilities is as nothing compared to that 
of yours ? She's the sweetest young thing 
I ever saw ; but even if she happened not to 
be I should urge you to marry her, in simple 
self-preservation." 

" In self-preservation ? " 

" To rescue from destruction the last remnant of 
your independence. That's a much more important 
matter even than not treating her shabbily. They 
are doing their best to kill you morally — to render 
you incapable of individual life." 

" They are — they are ! " Gaston declared, with 
enthusiasm. 

" Well then, if you believe it, for heaven's sake 
go and marry her to-morrow ! " Waterlow threw 
down his implements and added, " And come out 
of this — into the air." 



224  

Qaston however was planted in his path on the 
way to the door. "And if she does break out 
again, in the same way ? " 

" In the same way ? " 

" In some other manifestation of that terrible 
order?" 

" Well/' said Waterlow, " you will at least have 
got rid of your family." 

" Yes, if she does that I shall be glad they are 
not there ! They're right, pouriarU, they're right," 
Gaston went on, passing out of the studio with his 
friend. 

"They're right?" 

"It was a dreadful thing." 

" Yes, thank heaven I It was the finger of 
providence, to give you your chance." This was 
ingenious, but, though he could glow for a moment 
in response to it, Francie's lover — ^if lover he may 
in his most infirm aspect be called — ^looked as 
if he mistrusted it, thought it slightly sophistical. 
What really shook him however was his com- 
panion's saying to him in the vestibule, when they 
had taken their hats and sticks and were on the 
point of going out : " Lord, man, how can you be 
so impenetrably dense ? Don't you see that she's 
really of the softest, finest material that breathes, 
that she's a perfect flower of plasticity, that every- 
thing you may have an apprehension about will 
drop away from her like the dead leaves from a 
rose and that you may make of her any perfect and 



THE REVERBERATOB. 225 

enchanting thing you yourself have the wit to 
conceive ? " 

" Ah, my dear friend ! '* Gaston Probert 
murmured, gratefully, panting. 

"The limit will be yours, not hers," Waterlow 
added. 

" No, no, I have done with limits," his com- 
.panion rejoined, ecstatically. 

That evening at ten o'clock Gaston went to thet 
H6tel de TUnivers et de Cheltenham and requested 
the German waiter to introduce him into the 
dining-room attached to Mr. Dosson's apartments 
and then go and tell Miss Francina he was await- 
ing her there. 

" Oh, you'll be better there than in the zalon 
— they have villed it with their luccatch," said 
the man, who always addressed him in an inten- 
tion of English and was not ignorant of the tie 
that united the visitor to the amiable American 
family, or perhaps even of the modifications it had 
lately undergone. 

"With their luggage?" 

"They leave to-morrow morning — oh, I don't 
think they themselves known for where, sir." 

" Please then say to Miss Francina that I have 
called on very urgent business — that I'm pressed, 
pressed ! " 

The eagerness of the sentiment which possessed 
Gaston at that moment is communicative, but 
perhaps the vividness with which the waiter placed 

Q 



226 THE REVERBEKATOR. 

it before the young lady is better explained by 
the fact that her lover slipped a five-franc piece 
into his hand. At any rate she entered the dining- 
room sooner than Gaston had ventured to hope, 
though she corrected this promptitude a little by 
stopping short, drawing back, when she saw how 
pale he was and how he looked as if he had been 
crying. 

" I have chosen — I have chosen," he said 
gently, smiling at her in contradiction to these 
indications. 

" You have chosen ? '* 

" I have had to give them up. But I like it so 
much better than having to give you up ! I took 
you first with their assent. That was well enough 
— it was worth trying for. But now I take you 
without it. We can live that way too." 

" Ah, I*m not worth it. You give up too much ! '* 
cried the girl. " We're going away — ^it's all over." 
She turned from him quickly, as if to carry out 
her meaning, but he caught her more quickly 
still and held her — held her fast and long. She 
had only freed herself when her father and sister 
broke in, from the salon, attracted apparently by 
the audible commotion. 

" Oh, I thought you had at least knocked over 
the lamp!" Delia exclaimed. 

"You must take me with you if you are going 
away, Mr. Dosson," Gaston said. "I will start 
whenever you like." 



THE REVERBEKATOR. 227 

*' All right — where shall we go ? " the old man 
asked. 

" Hadn't you decided that?" 

*' Well, the girls said they would tell me/* 

" We were going home," said Francie. 

" No we weren't — not a bit ! " Delia declared. 

" Oh, not there," Gaston murmured, pathetically, 
looking at Francie. 

"Well, when youVe fixed it you can take the 
tickets," Mr. Dosson observed. 

" To some place where there are no newspapers," 
Gaston went on. 

" I guess you'll have hard work to find one." 

" Dear me, we needn't read them ! We wouldn't 
have read that one if your family hadn't forced 
us," Delia said to her prospective brother-in-law. 

"Well, I shall never be forced — I shall never 
again in my life look at one," he replied. 

"You'll see — ^you'll have to!" laughed Mr. 
Dosson. 

" No, you'll tell us enough." 

Francie had her eyes on the ground ; they were 
all smiling but she. "Won't they forgive me, 
ever?" she asked, looking up. 

" Yes, perfectly, if you can persuade me not to 
marry you. But in that case what good will their 
forgiveness do you ? " 

" Well, perhaps it's better to pay for it." 

"To pay for it?" 

" By suflfering something. For it was dreadful." 



228  

" Oh, for all youll sufiFer 1" Gaston exclaimed, 

shining down at her. 

" It was for you — only for you, as I told you," 
the girl went on. 

"Yes, don't tell me again — I don't like that 
explanation ! I ought to let you know that my 
father now declines to do anything for me," the 
young man added, to Mr. Dosson. 

" To do anything for you ? " 

**To give me any money." 

"Well, that makes me feel better," said Mr. 
Dosson. 

"There'll be enough for all — especially if 
we economise in newspapers," Delia declared, 
jocosely. 

"Well, I don't know, after all — the Kever- 
berator came for nothing," her father went on, in 
the same spirit. 

" Don't you be afraid he'll ever send it now ! " 
cried the girl. 

"I'm very sorry — because they were lovely," 
Francie said to Gaston, with sad eyes. 

"Let us wait to say that till they come back 
to us," Gaston returned, somewhat sententiously. 
He really cared little at this moment whether 
his relatives were lovely or not. 

" I'm sure you won't have to wait long ! " Delia 
remarked, with the same cheerfulness. 

" * Till they come back ' ? " Mr. Dosson repeated. 
"Ah, they can't come back now. We won't take 



 229 

them in ! " The words fell from his lips with a 
mild unexpected austerity which imposed itself, 
producing a momentary silence, and it is a sign of 
Gaston's complete emancipation that he did not 
in his heart resent this image of eventual favours 
denied to his race. The resentment was rather 
Delia's, but she kept it to herself, for she was 
capable of reflecting with complacency that the 
key of the house would after all be hers, so that 
she could open the door for the Proberfcs if they 
should knock. Now that her sister's marriage was 
really to take place her consciousness that the 
American people would have been told so was 
still more agreeable. The party left the Hotel de 
rUnivers et de Cheltenham on the morrow, but it 
appeared to the German waiter, as he accepted 
another five-franc piece from the happy and now 
reckless Gaston, that they were even yet not at 
all clear as to where they were going. 


